<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0158
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0158.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Southmark Corp.
   Leaves Chapter 11,
   Starts Distributions
   ----
   By Christi Harlan
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C8
</SO>
<CO>
   SM WNEWS
</CO>
<IN>
BANKRUPTCIES (BCY)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
REAL ESTATE INVESTMENTS (REA)
</IN>
<LP>
   DALLAS -- Southmark Corp. said it emerged from Chapter 11
proceedings and began distributions to creditors and
shareholders under the reorganization plan approved last
month by a U.S. Bankruptcy Court judge.
   In accordance with the plan, Southmark said it transferred
$76 million in cash along with new securities to various
agents on behalf of its creditors and shareholders. Holders
of old Southmark securities will receive their portions of
the cash, new notes, new preferred stock and new common stock
upon surrender of their old certificates.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   As part of its reorganization plan under Chapter 11 of the
federal Bankruptcy Code, Southmark also transferred $100
million in assets to San Jacinto Savings Association, its
Houston-based thrift unit. The company said it won't have
management control of San Jacinto.
   The thrift will be exempted from the planned liquidation
of most of Southmark's assets. The proceeds of the
liquidation will be used to redeem the new notes and new
preferred stock of the reorganized real estate and financial
services concern.
   The company proposed deferring payment of some legal and
other professional fees incurred with its reorganization
until April 15, 1991, to maintain adequate working capital.
The deferral, agreed to by professionals in the case, total
about $8 million, the company said.
   Southmark also said Glen Adams was named chairman,
president and chief executive officer. Mr. Adams, as
previously announced, succeeds Arthur G. Weiss, who resigned.
   Mr. Adams previously managed the liquidation of Great
Western Sugar Co. and its subsidiaries. He has also held
senior positions at Texas Industries Inc. and Electronic Data
Systems Corp.
   Eight of Southmark's 10 directors also resigned and will
be succeeded by directors to be nominated by the company's
unsecured creditors' committee. The company said the two
remaining directors, James A. Colquitt and Arthur L. Crowe,
agreed to remain in office for a transition period of about
one week.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0157
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0157.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Iraqi Chief Links
   Kuwait Pullout
   To Israeli Move
   ---
   U.S. Rejects the Initiative,
   Aimed at Rallying Arabs,
   And Readies Blockade
   ----
   By Gerald F. Seib and Walter S. Mossberg
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST FORGN
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
PETROLEUM (PET)
FOOD PRODUCTS (FOD)
</IN>
<GV>
EXECUTIVE (EXE)
STATE DEPARTMENT (STD)
DEFENSE DEPARTMENT (DEF)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Iraq's Saddam Hussein, his options for
ending the Persian Gulf crisis growing increasingly
unpleasant, assumed the role of embattled Arab hero in
offering his first rough proposal for a negotiated end to the
confrontation.
   The Iraqi leader, in an "initiative" designed as much to
rally Arab public opinion as to launch meaningful
negotiations, announced yesterday that he will withdraw his
troops from Kuwait only if Israel withdraws from the West
Bank and Syria from Lebanon. He apparently hopes to lure
support from Arabs who have spurned him so far by suggesting
that Iraq will use its occupation of Kuwait as a lever to
solve the Arab world's most frustrating problem, the 23-year
Israeli occupation of land claimed by Palestinians.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Even as Saddam Hussein was searching for a ploy to ease
his isolation, though, the international pressure against him
clicked up another notch. The White House yesterday disclosed
that Kuwait's ousted government has formally asked the U.S.
to enforce the total trade embargo the United Nations has
imposed on Iraq, allowing the U.S. and other nations to
immediately begin stopping ships carrying Iraqi goods.
   Secretary of State James Baker, speaking on ABC News'
"This Week," said the Kuwaiti request gives the U.S. and
other countries "a legal basis for stopping the export of oil
and that sort of thing." The U.S. maintains that under the
U.N. charter, the Kuwaiti request triggers steps for the
collective enforcement of international sanctions.
   Mr. Baker declined to use the word blockade, but said that
"interdiction" of Iraqi shipments would begin "almost
instantly." In a statement, the White House said it would do
"whatever is necessary" to ensure compliance with the
sanctions.
   Other Bush administration officials said that the
international naval force in the area -- consisting of
American, British, French, Canadian, Soviet, German and
Australian ships -- may be used both to stop oil exports from
leaving Iraq and Kuwait and to stop shipments of food and
other goods from going in. President Bush implied as much
yesterday when reporters asked whether the interdiction would
apply to food. The president responded, "Everything,
everything." While shying away from actually using the word
"blockade," Mr. Bush acknowledged that the U.S. and others
were trying to block shipping to Iraq. "No point getting into
all these semantics," he said. "The main thing is to stop the
oil from coming out of there."
   The naval interdiction force is part of an overall
American strategy that officials say is designed to leave the
Iraqi leader with only the stark choice of backing out of
Kuwait or launching new attacks to change his situation.
Though they insist they aren't trying to lure Saddam Hussein
into an attack, officials hope that if he strikes again, the
U.S. and its allies will have such an impressive force in
place in Saudi Arabia that they will be able to crush him in
retaliation.
   Iraq's first option, of course, may be simply to sit tight
and hope it can endure a trade embargo longer than the West
can live without Iraqi and Kuwaiti oil. Speaking on the ABC
program, Abdul Amir al-Anbari, Iraq's ambassador to the U.N.,
asserted that an embargo on Iraq could plunge the U.S. into a
"depression" and the rest of the world into an economic
"crisis."
   Iraq clearly is trying to woo back more Arab support in
case the conflict drags on, hoping that its neighbors
eventually will help it survive a prolonged war of economic
attrition with the West. So Saddam Hussein on Friday tried to
scare other Arab leaders into supporting him by calling on
Arabs to rise up in a holy war against leaders who invited
American and other Western soldiers into Saudi Arabia to
protect the oil-rich kingdom.
   Then yesterday, he tried to entice Arab leaders with his
proposal for a diplomatic solution linking his occupation of
Kuwait with Israel's occupation of the West Bank. The
proposal also called for replacing American and other Western
troops in Saudi Arabia with Arab forces. The Bush
administration immediately said it "categorically" rejects
the proposals. And President Bush yesterday, asked whether he
was at least glad Iraq is discussing negotiations, replied:
"I don't see anything to be pleasing in there at all."
   American strategists are calculating, though, that the
trade sanctions -- enforced by an effective though perhaps
undeclared naval blockade -- will hold tightly enough to
convince Iraq that it will lose in the long run by simply
standing pat.
   At that point, rather than go through the humiliation of
backing out of Kuwait, the Iraqis might well conclude that
they need to lash out in some way to shake things up. In that
event, Saddam Hussein appears to have three choices.
   The first would be to launch the much-feared direct
invasion of Saudi Arabia, hoping to seize some Saudi oil
fields and improve his bargaining position. But that option
is growing less and less likely as thousands of American,
British, Egyptian, Syrian and Moroccan forces assemble in and
around Saudi Arabia to protect the kingdom. The Saudis even
have in their possession 48 Kuwaiti jet fighters, virtually
the entire Kuwaiti air force, which managed to escape the
Iraqi invasion, Saudi officials said. The Saudi "window of
vulnerability . . . is closing very fast," Prince Bandar bin
Sultan, the Saudi ambassador to Washington, said over the
weekend.
   The second possibility would be to start a fight with
Israel, in hopes that all Arabs would have to move behind
Iraq in a fight against their common Israeli enemy. In such
an event, Saddam Hussein also might calculate, the Saudis
would be under pressure to kick out U.S. troops because of
America's close ties with Israel.
   Iraq could start hostilities with Israel either through a
direct attack or by attacking Jordan. Israel has publicly
declared that it will respond to an Iraqi attack on Jordan
because it won't allow Iraq's dangerous army to take control
of Jordan's long border with Israel.
   Iraq's third attack option would be to start an undeclared
war on the U.S. and other Western nations through terrorism.
Two Middle East terrorists with records of successful attacks
against Western targets, Abu Nidal and Abu Abbas, have ties
to Baghdad. And even terrorist groups that opposed Iraq in
its war with Iran show signs of swinging behind Saddam
Hussein now that he is in a confrontation with the U.S.
   And Iraq still has thousands of Americans and other
Westerners under its control in Iraq and Kuwait. They aren't
being allowed to leave and could become hostages.
   If Iraq chooses a simple war of nerves and economic
attrition, the Bush administration knows a long stalemate
could try the patience of the American public and the West in
general, and could open the possibility that moderate Arabs
-- even including Saudi Arabia -- might drop out of the
effort against Iraq and accept some deal from Saddam Hussein.
   But U.S. officials have sized up Saddam Hussein as a man
who, despite some recklessness, will back down if he must.
"This is a guy who is impulsive, and therefore capable of big
miscalculations," says one senior administration official
involved in managing the crisis. The official adds, though,
that "at the same time, we think he is someone who is capable
of rational judgments when it comes to power. And when he
finds something is unprofitable, then one can see certain
accommodations."
   Thus, administration aides will be trying to calculate
whether Saddam Hussein's proposed diplomatic formula for
getting out of Kuwait represents the first sign he is
searching for a way out or simply is a public relations
stunt.
   There are disagreements among experts about how much
pressure will be needed to make Saddam Hussein decide he's up
against the wall and whether simple economic pressure will
ever be enough. The biggest worry is that if he decides he
needs a way out of his predicament but doesn't see a
face-saving method, he could lash out in dangerous and
unpredictable ways.
   U.S. officials claim they already see signs Saddam Hussein
is getting nervous. In the first days after President Bush
announced the dispatching of U.S. troops, they note, the
Iraqi leader made several nationwide addresses indirectly --
having them read by a television announcer. "That shows he's
nervous about pinpointing his location, either because he's
afraid we'll find him, or that internal enemies will," says
one U.S. official.
   The unpredictability of Iraq's leader is a principal
reason the U.S. is going to such great lengths to build a
mammoth force in and around Saudi Arabia. Pentagon officials
say the goal is to put 40,000 troops in the region by the end
of the month. But the administration isn't putting any upper
limit on how high the force could go after that, calculating
that it would be a mistake to underestimate and an advantage
to keep Saddam Hussein guessing. U.S. commanders in charge of
planning for Middle East crises have indicated in the past
that they were capable of deploying as many as 300,000
troops.
   And the U.S. is taking similar steps to ensure that its
naval force is adequate to carry out a blockade of Iraq and
support a war if necessary. Over the weekend, Pentagon
officials confirmed reports that a fourth U.S. aircraft
carrier -- the John F. Kennedy -- and its powerful group of
support ships could head for the Middle East within a few
days. Three other carriers and their escort vessels already
are stationed within striking distance of Iraq or are
steaming toward the area.
   But unless the military situation changes drastically,
military officials say, the most likely plan will be for the
Kennedy to eventually replace the carrier Dwight D.
Eisenhower, which has been on patrol since March and was
scheduled to return to port before hostilities erupted in
Kuwait.
   ---
   Andy Pasztor contributed to this article.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0156
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0156.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Movies:
   Cartoon `Cels' Animate a Sellers' Market
   ----
   By Jim Herron Zamora
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<CO>
   DIS TWX
</CO>
<IN>
RECREATION, ENTERTAINMENT, TOYS, MOVIES, PHOTOGRAPHY, SPORTS (REC)
</IN>
<LP>
   There's nothing Mickey Mouse about collecting celluloid
frames of Walt Disney's famous rodent.
   Animation art, once prized only by a small circle of
cartoon memorabilia buffs and perhaps parents looking to
spruce up the kids' room, is now big time. At the heart of
the collection craze are 9-by-12-inch "cels" -- individually
hand-painted celluloid frames -- tens of thousands of which
go into each cartoon.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Experts caution that investing in cels requires
sophistication. Despite the growing popularity of the
often-colorful pieces that galleries, auction houses and
well-heeled collectors now consider fine art, prices for some
high-end cels have dropped recently, for example, as more
large private collections have gone on the market. And then
there are questions of whether both the art and its value
might, quite literally, chip away with time.
   Mike Glad, though, continues to add to his 1,000-piece
collection. "It's like buying a piece of art. A piece of
history. A piece of childhood," says the 43-year-old Fremont,
Calif., auto-store owner, who savors the "magical feeling
when you freeze that same frame on your TV set and say, `I've
got it right here.'"
   Though there are followings for the likes of Bugs Bunny,
Woody Woodpecker, Fred Flintstone and the latter-day Teenage
Mutant Ninja Turtles -- their studio sells cels of Leonardo
and friends for $60 to $80 each -- Disney characters capture
the greatest interest.
   Especially Mickey. New York restaurateur Peter Merolo, 37
years old, says acquiring a cel is like "buying a heartbeat
of Mickey Mouse." He claims to have sold a black-and-white
cel from the 1934 Disney short "Orphan's Benefit" in a
private transaction a year ago for $450,000. That was a year
after buying it for $50,000, he says.
   Cels surviving from early Disney cartoons and movies such
as "Pinocchio" and "Snow White" similarly attract serious
money in auction houses. Top auction prices ranged from
$20,000 in 1984 to $286,000 in 1989, the current record. Cels
capturing memorable moments often are most prized. One from
the 1955 film "Lady and the Tramp," showing the title
characters falling in love over a plate of spaghetti,
recently sold for $104,500.
   Even less-coveted Disney originals, such as those in
pedestrian poses or lacking a background, often sell for
$1,000 or more. In fact, dealers and collectors say, the
biggest growth in interest recently is for those cels, Disney
or otherwise, under $5,000. Appreciation last year of 40% or
more wasn't unusual for these, says Howard Lowery, a Burbank,
Calif., dealer.
   It is big money for pieces of plastic once tossed out or
sold for a pittance. After completing production, many film
companies dumped or destroyed cels or erased them for reuse.
Those featuring the Warner Bros. panoply of Bugs Bunny, Daffy
Duck, Porky Pig and others are especially scarce. After
closing its cartoon studio in 1962, Warner burned several
hundred thousand to make space for its publicity department.
Disney old-timers tell of parties at which folks slid around
the floor on them once a cartoon was in the can.
   "I'm flattered that people want to buy something we
thought was trash," says Woody Woodpecker's 90-year-old
creator, Walter Lantz. A Disney artist in the 1930s, he later
ran his own Hollywood production company until "sort of
retiring" in 1988. Mr. Lantz says he "must have buried
hundreds of thousands of {the cels} because no storage
company wanted them."
   Created to last "about two weeks -- long enough to get
from the ink and paint department to the camera department,"
many older cels are in poor condition, says Ron Stark, whose
S/R Industries in Agoura, Calif., specializes in restoring
and preserving them. But some collectors and consultants say
restoration lowers the value, thus posing a danger for
investment-minded buyers.
   "Animation cels are not blue-chip; you could buy them and
they may disintegrate on you in a couple of years, especially
the ones made before 1940" of nitrate material, says Disney
archivist David R. Smith. Others disagree. "If preserved
properly, they could last for 1,000 years," says Mr. Merolo.
   Disney, which as early as the 1940s marketed cels through
a San Francisco art gallery, saw cels as collectibles earlier
than most other studios. But it hardly anticipated the
current market. For decades Disneyland sold cels for $1.25
each. And, indeed, there have been some windfalls for folks
checking attics or garages.
   In the late 1970s, Chicago-based Circle Fine Art Corp.
began carrying cels at its nationwide group of galleries.
(Two of its galleries today carry animation art exclusively.)
But it wasn't until a December 1984 Christie's auction of
several hundred cels from the personal collection of John
Basmajian, a retired Disney employee, that cels caught fire
with collectors. In the bidding, a Mickey cel sold for a
then-record-breaking $20,900.
   "I thought the Basmajian collection would depress the
market," says S/R Industries' Mr. Stark, who evaluated about
1,000 cels for the Basmajian family. "Instead, it catapulted
animation art into a whole new period." Buyers included movie
directors Steven Spielberg and George Lucas. Soon, attention
to the trendy collectibles was prompting baby boomers raised
on the Jetsons and Rocky and Bullwinkle to seek
less-expensive cels.
   The surprising auction prices also encouraged other former
studio employees to put their private collections on the
market. That has flattened and even lowered values of some
top-tier items that turned out to be less rare than buyers
had thought. At a June animated-art auction, Sotheby's
biggest-ticket item -- a 1933 Mickey from "The Mail Pilot" --
sold for $115,500, below the expectations of some observers,
though still $45,500 above the top range of Sotheby's
estimate.
   Still, many dealers and collectors believe the rarest
pre-1960 animation pieces are likely to trickle into
availability now, exciting instead of depressing the market.
Sure, there could be more surprises for big investors, says
Mr. Spielberg's buyer, Russ Cochran. "If somebody ever opens
a bank vault and finds 100 cels from "Steamboat Willie"
{Mickey's first cartoon}, these investors that paid six
figures are going to eat it. But these investors are betting
against it, and I'm betting with them."
   Cels now offer a new line of profit for Disney and other
studios after production ends on a cartoon. In June 1989,
Disney organized a special auction of 394 cels from "Who
Framed Roger Rabbit," taking in about $1.4 million. Another
auction, of cels from "The Little Mermaid," is set for Dec.
15 at Sotheby's in New York.
   The popularity of cheaper cels also has spawned a new
"limited edition" industry -- offering newly hand-painted,
sometimes artist-signed celluloids that re-create cartoon
scenes in numbered groups of perhaps 100 to 1,000.
   While shunned by many serious collectors, limited editions
give some aging original animators long-delayed recognition
-- and cozy retirement incomes. Chuck Jones and Fritz
Freleng, two original Bugs Bunny artists who say they don't
receive any residuals from Warner and, in fact, pay Warner a
royalty on limited-edition sales, are churning out signed
cels for galleries around the nation. These, and
limited-edition cels from the Disney organization, start at
$200 or less, and in some unusual cases have appreciated 25%
or more annually, says Michael Halbreich, co-owner of Cricket
Gallery, Wyckoff, N.J.
   Critics such as animation author Jerry Beck say limited
editions lack archival value, and thus "will never be worth
as much as a genuine production cel." He says a production
cel "is a piece of a movie, but a limited-edition cel is
nothing but a piece of plastic with paint on it."
   Still, says the 83-year-old Mr. Freleng, who also is
drawing new cels featuring his Pink Panther creation, "My
name has become more important because there are not many of
us left."
   And Betty Boop limited editions have helped Grim Natwick
cash in at last. "I never thought I would get Betty back
after all these years," says Mr. Natwick, who drew the
curly-haired character for Fleischer Studios in the 1930s,
and who plans to still be drawing cels for gallery sale when
he turns 100 on Thursday.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0155
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0155.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   LEISURE &amp; ARTS:
   Old Violins, New Fiddles
   ----
   By Barbara Jepson
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A8
</SO>
<LP>
   New York -- Andreas Holschneider, the president of
Deutsche Grammophon, must be gnashing his teeth over Trevor
Pinnock's resignation as music director of the Classical
Band. In April 1989, DG had signed a six-year contract with
the British conductor and harpsichordist for 18 recordings
with his new, 50-member period-instruments orchestra, the
first of its size in the U.S. It was a surprisingly juicy
deal for a group that had yet to play a single note.
   Now, Mr. Pinnock has departed, the Band's first recording
session has been canceled and the German company is in the
process of deciding whether to pull out or to record the
ensemble with another conductor. To complicate matters, Sony
Classical, DG's rival and chief raider of late, is about to
sign up the Band for at least 10 recordings with the German
conductor Bruno Weil, whose guest performance last February
at Carnegie Hall was somewhat better received than Mr.
Pinnock's efforts.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Officially, Mr. Pinnock left because of legitimate
concerns about the Band's continued financial viability;
funds are still being sought for its coming Avery Fisher Hall
series here. But it's no secret that the 43-year-old
conductor was disheartened by the negative reviews of his
Band's inaugural season and disgruntled over the way his
manager, Liviu Blumenthal, the Band's executive director, had
handled some of its affairs.
   Meanwhile Mr. Weil was just named principal guest
conductor, despite his limited experience with
period-instrument ensembles. The promise of a recording
contract apparently means more than appropriate artistic
credentials these days.
   What does all this say about the current status of the
historical-performance movement, which attempts to re-create
musical compositions using the instruments and stylistic
conventions of their time? During the 1980s, British
ensembles such as Christopher Hogwood's Academy of Ancient
Music, Mr. Pinnock's English Concert and Roger Norrington's
London Classical Players came to international prominence by
playing ear-opening performances of baroque and classical
masterpieces on plain gut strings, wooden flutes, valveless
horns, fortepianos and other antique instruments. They
changed our notions of how this music should be played.
   As a result, symphony orchestras now program fewer works
by Bach, Handel and Vivaldi and routinely reduce their
100-member forces for Haydn or Mozart. Mainstream conductors
such as Simon Rattle, Charles Mackerras and David Zinman are
among those who have incorporated the stylistic traits of
historical performance into their music-making.
   At the same time, the early-music specialists have
parlayed their successes into guest-conducting stints with
the likes of the Metropolitan Opera, the Berlin Philharmonic
and the Boston Symphony Orchestra. And classical-record
companies have had a bonanza rerecording their catalogs with
a new crop of best-selling maestros. This has been especially
true since Mr. Norrington spearheaded the move into the
19th-century repertoire, tackling Schubert, Berlioz and
Wagner.
   But now that we've all passed the aural seduction stage,
the whole notion of authenticity is being examined more
closely. In an essay for the New York Review of Books, the
pianist-scholar Charles Rosen notes the perils of asking not
"what the composer wanted, but only what he got." In a recent
New York Times piece, musicologist Richard Taruskin cites
ways in which historical specialists "pick and choose" the
performance practices they wish to follow, carefully
duplicating the original instruments, for example, but
ignoring the 18th-century habit of improvisation.
   In an interview last summer, Charles Dutoit, music
director of the Montreal Symphony, argued that
period-instrument groups "are using microphones to record
their performances which enable them to sound fuller. And I
question whether they're all using plain gut strings when
they play Berlioz. They've created the image of something
new, but there's much marketing behind that."
   Which brings us back to the founding of the Classical
Band. With the London scene growing increasingly overcrowded,
the enterprising Britons turned their eyes to American
shores. In 1986, Mr. Hogwood revitalized the 175-year-old
Handel &amp; Haydn Society of Boston, turning it into a 35-member
period-instrument group. Mr. Pinnock had bigger ideas. In
1989, he founded the Classical Band with $150,000 in funds
from Bristol-Myers and the DG contract in hand.
   Unfortunately, he peopled the Band with a curious mixture
of crack early-music specialists and conventional violinists
who had never played on gut strings. At its Columbia
University "preview," to which the press was unwisely
invited, the conventional fiddlers simply removed their chin
rests and restrung their modernized 18thor 19th-century
fiddles with gut -- which smacks of deceptive packaging. And
their inexperience showed in the poor string tone and lack of
ensemble.
   This was followed by a disappointing inaugural season in
the full glare of critical scrutiny at Carnegie Hall. A less
glamorous venue was deemed inappropriate for someone of Mr.
Pinnock's stature and, no doubt, less appealing to potential
donors. In short, something that could have been a boon for
American period-instrument musicians and concertgoers alike
got off to a horrendously bad start.
   The Band's recent performance under Mr. Weil at the Mostly
Mozart Festival was again plagued by raggedness in the
violins. But on the whole the playing was the most polished
I've heard from the group in the three concerts I've
attended. Mr. Weil's buoyant, fluid reading of Schubert's
Fifth came off best, with particularly impressive
contributions from flutists Christopher Kreuger and Sandra
Miller. For the first time, the group's potential was
evident. Now all they need is to find sponsors to back them
until they reach the standard of their competition.
   So DG will probably cut its losses, and Sony Classical,
lacking a Pinnock or Norrington, will fill a gap in its
catalog with the curious choice of a period-instrument group
led by a nonspecialist. That is a fitting commentary on the
current status of the historical-performance movement, which
I think has passed its peak. Its most valuable insights have
already spread as far as they can. What's left now are
opportunities for career advancement and profit. In other
words, business, as usual.
   ---
   Ms. Jepson is a free-lance music writer in New York.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0154
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0154.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Credit Markets:
   Japan
   Cut Buying
   Of Treasurys
   ---
   If Curtailed Purchases
   Continue, U.S. Rates
   Unlikely to Fall Much
   ----
   By Marcus W. Brauchli
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C1
</SO>
<CO>
   JAPAN X.TMP
</CO>
<IN>
CDS, INTEREST RATES, COMMERCIAL PAPER (FIN)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   TOKYO -- Don't look for Japanese investors to resume big
buying of U.S. Treasury bonds any time soon.
   Japan's institutional investors sharply curtailed their
usual bidding at the U.S. Treasury's $32.25 billion quarterly
securities auction last week, acquiring only a fraction of
the U.S. government debt they usually buy. Analysts warn that
if this trend continues, U.S. long-term interest rates aren't
likely to fall significantly, despite a slowing economy,
because the Treasury will be forced to offer fatter yields to
lure the Japanese back or attract other investors.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   At Thursday's sale of 30-year Treasury bonds, the final
segment of the three-part auction, Japanese investors
purchased between only 5% and 15% of the $10.26 billion of
bonds sold. That was down sharply from as much as 50% at some
previous 30-year bond auctions. It's a trend that analysts
and Japanese investors expect to persist.
   "The Japanese have got all the dollars they need," said
Robert Alan Feldman, an economist with Salomon Brothers Inc.
in Tokyo. Besides, added Koichi Torihara, an international
investment manager at DaiIchi Kangyo Bank Ltd., the world's
largest bank: "It's not the right time to do long-term
investments."
   The implications of Japan's waning hunger for Treasury
securities are important for the U.S. Without big Japanese
interest, "the bonds have to be bought by domestic
investors," said Scott Pardee, chairman of the U.S.
subsidiary of Yamaichi Securities Co. in New York. And now,
U.S. investors are demanding higher rates to compensate for
expectations of rising inflation, especially since oil prices
began soaring after Iraq's invasion of Kuwait.
   Furthermore, a big problem is that Americans don't save
enough to finance the federal budget deficit and U.S.
industry's needs. Analysts estimate the shortfall to be about
$100 billion. If foreigners don't pony up the difference,
U.S. long-term rates will have to rise sufficiently to
attract U.S. and foreign investors.
   "To the extent that our savings can't cover our fiscal
deficit, the savings and loan bailout, the state budget
deficits and the legitimate needs of U.S. industry, then our
rates are going to have to go up," said Mr. Pardee.
   Analysts say that's what happened at Wednesday's $11.5
billion auction of 10-year Treasury notes. The average yield
on the securities was set at 8.77%. But because there wasn't
enough demand at that yield, the Treasury was forced to
accept bids as high as 8.84% to unload its notes.
   Higher interest rates just now could be bad news for a
faltering U.S. economy already faced with the prospect of
higher oil prices and slowing growth. If the cost of money
rises, said Salomon's Mr. Feldman, "it will make it that much
harder to get the U.S. economy back on its feet." It would
also bloat an already huge federal budget deficit.
   Even government officials in Japan are aware of the
hazards for the U.S. but say there is nothing they can do.
"It's early to draw any conclusions," said Makoto Utsumi,
Japan's vice minister of finance for international affairs.
"But it's clearly very, very bad timing."
   The main factor sapping Japanese interest in U.S. Treasury
securities is fear of the unknown. Japanese investors see no
reason to keep stocking up on U.S. debt when they see U.S.
military forces in a standoff with Iraq in the Middle East,
the U.S. economy slowing down and little difference between
U.S. and Japanese interest rates. Moreover, there's a
widespread belief in Tokyo that the dollar soon will weaken.
"The visibility is almost zero for investors," said Mr.
Utsumi. "They can't have any clear perspective."
   Japanese investors are equally blunt. "It's not good sense
to buy U.S. Treasurys," said Hideaki Nishisaka, a manager at
Daido Mutual Life Insurance Co., which has $20 billion in
assets. The company has trimmed its holdings of U.S. Treasury
bonds to about two-thirds the amount it would consider a full
load, he said.
   Japanese investors' declining appetite for U.S. Treasurys
isn't altogether new. In the first quarter, the latest for
which data is available, they sold a net $3.9 billion of U.S.
government securities. Last week's auction continued "a trend
that we've seen all year," said William M. Brachfeld, an
executive vice president at the U.S. unit of Daiwa Securities
Co. in New York. "There are many {Japanese} who speculate,
who come in and out all the time. But in terms of investors,
someone who sticks and stays there, you're not seeing that."
   Japanese investors haven't shunned all foreign bonds.
Yamaichi's Mr. Pardee said these investors have been
attracted to West German government bonds. One reason is that
German bond yields equal those in the U.S., while German
inflation is lower and its currency is expected to remain
strong. And while higher oil prices will boost German
inflation as well as America's, Mr. Pardee said Germany has a
better record in controlling prices.
   The waning Japanese appetite for U.S. government debt is
evident everywhere. Before Thursday's auction of 30-year U.S.
Treasury bonds, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank already had decided to
sit out the auction, even though it can borrow dollars and
avoid the foreign-exchange risk of owning dollar-denominated
bonds that other, yen-based, investors might face.
   At Dai-Ichi Mutual Life Insurance Co., with more than $100
billion in assets, the international investment division was
on holiday last week, in the midst of a record U.S. debt
auction. The insurer isn't related to Dai-Ichi Kangyo.
   "The problems in the Middle East hurt interest" at the
U.S. Treasury sale, said Aaron Cohen, a senior analyst at
Daiwa Securities Co. With U.S. troops poised to challenge
Iraq's invasion of Kuwait, the prospect of a major regional
conflict is real. In the past, the U.S. was considered a safe
haven for international money in times of crisis. But today,
investors in Japan say, the Japanese economy is better
positioned to weather higher oil prices than the U.S.
economy. Because investors in Japan already hold large
amounts of U.S. government debt, they don't want to add to
their risk by buying more.
   And though the recent Mideast tensions have driven the
dollar higher, institutional investors don't expect the U.S.
currency's strength to last. They cite the troubled outlook
for the U.S. economy and, in a bit of circular logic, their
waning interest in buying dollar-denominated U.S. Treasurys.
"Looking ahead, we expect the dollar to go back down by the
last quarter of the year," said Mr. Cohen.
   The possibility of foreign-exchange losses for yen-based
investors who buy dollar-denominated bonds makes the
ever-narrower difference between the yields on Japanese and
U.S. government bonds seem insignificant. At the end of
trading in Tokyo Friday, the No. 119 benchmark 10-year
Japanese government bond yielded 7.98%, or 7.37% when
calculated on a semiannual compound yield basis. That
compares with a semiannual compound yield of 8.67% for
10-year U.S. Treasurys.
   Even if Japanese life insurance companies didn't foresee
risks in increasing their U.S. Treasury holdings, many
couldn't afford to. Kozo Nishimoto, a managing director at
Meiji Mutual Life Insurance Co., notes that asset growth at
the company, with $66 billion in assets, is slowing. Last
year, the growth was only 85% of what it was the year
previously. "We cannot increase our investments like we did
before," he said.
   Aware of the drawbacks many Japanese investors see, the
big Japanese securities houses didn't push their clients to
invest in U.S. bonds at last week's auction, some securities
dealers say. "There wasn't much evidence of interest, and we
can't create it," said one dealer.
   ---
   Friday's Market Activity
                                                                                                       

   Prices of U.S. Treasury notes and bonds ended unchanged to
moderately lower as one of the market's most volatile weeks
in recent years drew to a close.
   For the entire week, the Treasury market posted
significant losses with the price of the benchmark 30-year
bond falling about 2 1/2 points, or about $25 for a bond with
a $1,000 face amount, according to Salomon Brothers Inc.
   During Friday's session, bond prices gyrated wildly. Bonds
rose during early trading on news that the producer price
index, a measure of inflation on the wholesale level, fell
modestly in July. Bond prices then plunged more than one
point as traders tried to clear out some of the inventory
they accumulated during last week's Treasury refunding.
   Menacing talk from Iraqi President Saddam Hussein and some
confident comments from President Bush contributed to
Friday's volatility.
   Late in the day, bonds bounced off their lows on
bargain-hunting and ended as much as about 3/8 point lower.
The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 99 21/32, down
from 100 2/32 on Thursday. The yield rose to 8.77% from
8.75%.
   In the corporate market, junk bonds languished. Most junk
bonds, speculative-grade securities with low or no credit
ratings, finished 1/4 to 1/2 point lower.
   Among leading losers were the junk bonds of casinos
operated by real estate developer Donald Trump. Trump Castle
Funding Corp.'s 13 3/4% first mortgage bonds slipped 1/2
point to 49 1/2, while Trump Taj Mahal Funding Corp.'s 14%
securities fell one point to 41 1/2.
   An article in Friday's edition of The Wall Street Journal
reported that Merrill Lynch &amp; Co. quit work on restructuring
$1.3 billion of Trump's casino bond debt.
   ---
   Michael R. Sesit and Constance Mitchell in New York
contributed to this article.
   ---
                       Japanese Buyers
                                                                                                       

   Estimated purchases of newly issued U.S. Treasury
securities by Japanese investors at quarterly auctions, in
percent.
                                                                                                       

                                       AUCTION DATE
                                AUG.'90  FEB.'90  AUG.'89
                                                                                                       

   Three-year notes              10-30%   35-40%   15-20%
   Ten-year notes                10-15%   20-25%   20-25%
   Thirty-year bonds              5-15%   20-25%   35-40%
                                                                                                       

   Note: Auctions range in size from $10 billion to $11.5
billion.
                                                                                                       

   Source: Japanese owned primary dealers of U.S. Treasury
securities.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0153
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0153.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology:
   GE Pushes to Develop Recyclable Plastic
   ---
   Competitors Skeptical
   About Some of Its Goals
   ----
   By Amal Kumar Naj
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B5
</SO>
<CO>
   GE GM DD
</CO>
<IN>
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
ENVIRONMENT (ENV)
AUTO PARTS AND EQUIPMENT INCLUDING TIRES (AUP)
CHEMICALS, PLASTICS (CHM)
</IN>
<LP>
   PITTSFIELD, Mass. -- General Electric Co. is reworking the
formulation of its plastics in an effort to make those
materials more recyclable.
   Competitors at Dow Chemical Co. and Du Pont Co. also are
moving in that direction, but think some GE goals may be
difficult to attain.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   At GE's $5 billion-a-year plastics division here,
officials say manufacture of recyclable plastic resins will
be crucial to long-term success. Pressures from
environmentalists and customers are building, they note, to
solve problems of toxicity, performance and raw material
compatibility that devalue recycled plastics.
   For consumers, the push for recyclability will mean higher
prices for many products, GE says. Reformulating
flame-resistant resins used for computer housings, for
example, has added 15% to the resins' manufacturing cost.
John S. Razzano, manager of GE Plastics' high-performance
polymer and coatings, said GE hasn't passed on the increases
to its customers because those markets are competitive. "But
sooner or later, prices of such recyclable plastics will go
up. The additives and development costs will be expensive,"
he said.
   Mr. Razzano declined to estimate the total cost of
research and development aimed at recycling technologies.
They account for about 30% of GE Plastics' technical efforts,
however, and are expected to increase to between 50% and 60%
within five years.
   Attacking the toxicity problem, GE recently discontinued
certain bromine compounds used to make plastics
flame-retardant, prompting a complete formula change.
Although the bromine compounds were safe in primary use, they
give off harmful dioxin when the plastics containing them are
remelted. "Balancing the formulation to maintain the
plastics' performance was a major technical challenge," Mr.
Razzano said.
   GE also is changing resin formulas for plastics used in
such products as computer and machine housings. These
polymers get their yellow pigment from cadmium, which is
carcinogenic. It doesn't pose any danger in the plastic, but
it can come loose in acidic environments. A non-toxic
substitute would make these polymers recyclable into building
materials and toys. GE said it is also working with pigment
suppliers to develop non-metallic pigments that duplicate
cadmium's high temperature resistance.
   A bigger problem for GE researchers is that additives that
give plastics such essential properties as durability,
strength and impact resistance degrade significantly when the
products are chopped up and melted. "We are just beginning to
uncover these surprises," says Michael O'Mara, manager of
chemical research at GE's corporate research and development
center in Schenectady, N.Y. "A lot of additives in packages
have to be removed, and that means we have to use different
chemistry."
   Incompatible resins may be the toughest problem of all.
Currently, such items as plastic beverage bottles, milk jugs,
bags, computer housing and car bumpers must be separated
carefully before they can be reused. That is because the
different polymers of which they are made don't blend when
melted together. The industry's attempt to have plastic
products coded with numbers to help consumers and recyclers
sort them hasn't worked well.
   "Complete segregation of plastics at the consumer end
isn't feasible," says Mr. Razzano. "While separation by
recycling centers will continue to be a part of our overall
strategy, we have to assume that we won't get perfect
separation."
   Thus GE researchers are attempting to develop
"compatiblizers," chemicals that can bind different forms of
polymers into one homogeneous resin. Development of these
binding agents are critical to recycling some of GE's major
high-performance plastics.
   A lot of GE polycarbonate plastics are used in automobile
bumpers, for instance. But they aren't compatible with
plastics used in fenders and car doors. And even if these
different plastic parts were sorted in a junkyard, it would
probably be asking too much of a recycler to separate bumpers
by car makes, which in many cases have different polymers.
   Researchers are aiming to develop a "universal
compatiblizer" that can fit four or five different polymers
into its chemical structure, the way cement holds sand and
stones of different size to form concrete. This approach may
also require the use of special additives to stabilize a
particular polymer in the mixture, and the researchers say
they will have to learn how to do that without interfering
with the rest of the mixture.
   Scott Fritschel, solid waste program manager at Du Pont,
doesn't think that a "universal compatiblizer" is feasible.
He said Du Pont has developed additives to make specific
groups of polymers more recyclable, but isn't attempting
anything so ambitious as GE's effort to meld vastly
dissimilar resins into a single compound. "We are making
incremental steps, rather than quantum leaps," he said.
   One source of pressure for recyclable plastics is auto
makers' concern that future legislation could force them to
bear the burden of recycling plastics contained in
automobiles. General Motors Corp., for example, is working
with suppliers of "sheet molded composites," which make up
entire body panels in several GM vehicles. In one technique,
GM is testing, as a passive participant, the recycling of
automotive plastics into roof shingles and other construction
materials. A GM spokesman said that the auto maker is urging
suppliers to explore recycling technologies, but it also is
doing some advance research in this area on its own.
   "Four or five years ago, we didn't have to worry about
recycling, but the society is taking a different view of the
manufacturers as to how they account for the final
disposition of the material. What we are doing is trying to
develop a mechanism to make plastics a two-way material,"
says Glen Hiner, senior vice president of GE Plastics.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0152
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0152.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   China's News Agency Faces Tough Task
   ---
   Hong Kong Bureau Aims
   For Right Poitical Path
   ----
   By Jesse Wong and Julia Leung
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6A
</SO>
<CO>
   FREST
</CO>
<IN>
MEDIA, PUBLISHING, BROADCASTING, ELECTRONIC PUBLISHING (MED)
</IN>
<LP>
   HONG KONG -- As China's de facto consulate in this British
colony, the local branch of the Xinhua news agency has long
acted as loyal foot soldier in the central government's
diplomatic offensives.
   Rallying to Beijing's xenophobia of the 1960s, Xinhua
helped orchestrate street riots then by fanning anti-colonial
sentiment in Hong Kong.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   When Chinese communism took a moderate turn in the early
1980s, the agency dutifully changed strategy. To erase public
memories of Beijing's former excesses, it courted the
colony's wealthy and sang capitalism's praises.
   None of that compares, though, with the struggle Xinhua
now faces.
   The agency has been rocked by the flight of Xu Jiatun,
head of the Hong Kong branch until he retired in February.
While in office, he had failed to take a firm stand against
the pro-democracy protests that roiled the Chinese capital
last year. Apparently fearing retribution, he fled to the
U.S. four weeks ago. The affair has touched off an internal
inquiry into Mr. Xu's previous activities in Hong Kong. As if
all this isn't trouble enough, the branch is locked in a pay
dispute with its mid-level staff members.
   Such ideological wavering and squabbling over money
represent extraordinary lapses for an institution that
habitually toes the party line. Zhou Nan, Mr. Xu's successor,
appears untainted by the turmoil. And in his public dealings
with Hong Kong authorities, he, perhaps more dutifully than
Mr. Xu, reflects the tough political line adopted by Beijing
since it crushed the democracy movement one year ago. But to
many outsiders, Mr. Zhou faces a bigger challenge by far from
the disarray within the organization he heads.
   "Clearly, Xinhua's operations in Hong Kong have been hit
badly in terms of public image and staff morale," says
Anthony Cheung, a senior lecturer in public and social
administration at the City Polytechnic of Hong Kong. "Mr.
Zhou is going to have his hands full putting his own house
back in order."
   Mr. Zhou's troubled domain mirrors in many ways the
chaotic state of China's politics today. While alarmed by
communism's decline in Eastern Europe, the Chinese leadership
evidently lacks consensus on how to save itself from the same
fate. Facing a widespread desire for democracy, it vacillates
between brutal repression and appeasement. For the ailing
economy as well, harsh socialist remedies are being applied
in tandem with half-baked capitalist experiments. With the
leadership guided seemingly by few consistent goals other
than self-preservation, party functionaries can't help
becoming demoralized.
   Some of these policy contradictions are felt acutely in
Hong Kong. Governed for 150 years by Britain, the colony is
to return to China's rule in 1997. As a matter of national
pride, Beijing is keen to see the transition embraced by the
colony's mainly ethnic-Chinese population. Yet these very
same people, steeped in their Western-oriented values, also
rank among the loudest critics of communist rule in China.
That leaves Beijing trying alternately to cow and to placate
them. As the Chinese government's main policy tool in Hong
Kong, Xinhua seems stuck with an impossible task.
   "What's happening at Xinhua is a reflection of the
spiritual confusion that pervades the Chinese government,"
says a local businessman familiar with the Beijing political
scene. "There're so many zigzags at the top that you never
know if what's called a policy one day will be branded a
mistake the next."
   Such insecurity has permeated the hundreds of
China-controlled entities in Hong Kong since last June 4,
when soldiers fired on protesters in Beijing's Tiananmen
Square. In the immediate aftermath, staff from just about all
the organizations -- from the local branch of the Bank of
China to the Hong Kong Federation of Trade Unions, a leftist
labor organizer -- took part in public rallies to condemn the
crackdown. Virtually all have since fallen silent.
   An estimated 100,000 to 200,000 Hong Kong residents
recently joined in a march to mark the anniversary of the
Tiananmen killings. The rally, which ended with the marchers
assembling outside the Xinhua office building, didn't include
the many banners in evidence in Hong Kong protests last year
that identified the participation of those China-controlled
organizations.
   The price for their momentary indiscretion last year is
being borne mostly by Xinhua's Hong Kong unit. The agency's
unique responsibility arises from China's refusal to
recognize British sovereignty over Hong Kong. Rather than
establish a formal consulate in what it considers its own
territory, Beijing uses the agency to represent its
interests. In China and dozens of locations around the world,
Xinhua is a state-run news agency. In Hong Kong, it is that
and much more.
   The colony's proximity to China and its large
ethnic-Chinese population give rise to extensive bilateral
ties. Hong Kong generates about 30% to 40% of China's
foreign-currency earnings. It offers glimpses into modern
business management and technology to the thousands of
Chinese officials who visit every year. As the ties have
proliferated, so has the number of state-run entities, which
require supervision and periodic indoctrination. All this
gives an exalted status to Xinhua's local branch, China's
highest authority in Hong Kong.
   With 1997 approaching, the unit's profile is being
elevated even more. In its frequent second-guessing of the
colonial administration, Xinhua has come to be viewed widely
as a parallel authority in the territory. Local residents
bring their grievances to the agency. On a major issue such
as the replacement airport that the Hong Kong government
wants to build, many local and foreign banks are withholding
support pending a final say from Xinhua.
   Despite this considerable status, the about 600 Xinhua
staff members in Hong Kong are paid subsistence wages by
local standards.
   The bulk of the staff -- whether hired locally or posted
from China -- is drawn from the party faithful. And for
decades, they appeared to have accepted serving the party as
sufficient reward. It thus came as a surprise to many
outsiders when the local recruits rebelled en masse a couple
of months ago over a pay dispute. Offered a 10% raise, they
demanded an increase comparable to the 15% average in the
private sector. Mr. Zhou, having agreed to consider the
demand, apparently hasn't been able to work out a solution so
far.
   But his predecessor's dramatic flight has left Mr. Zhou
his biggest challenge.
   Along with several relatives, Mr. Xu left China in early
May. Two associates who claim to have assisted him have
released snapshots showing the grandfatherly Mr. Xu
sightseeing in California. The two -- one a Buddhist monk
from Taiwan and the other a Hong Kong journalist -- gave few
details on his whereabouts or why he left. In the U.S.,
authorities have confirmed his presence there but declined
comment otherwise. Beijing likewise has said nothing beyond
confirming that he has gone abroad.
   Although neither government characterizes Mr. Xu's move as
a defection, Chinese officials in Hong Kong privately confirm
that he left China without obtaining the exit authorization
that is required of all senior government personnel.
   Mr. Zhou has since held several rounds of meetings with
high-level Chinese officials stationed in Hong Kong to
discuss the affair. Mr. Xu's action was described by Mr. Zhou
as an "unauthorized departure," says an official who attended
one of the meetings. Mr. Zhou said further "that Mr. Xu will
face serious consequences unless he returns voluntarily," the
official adds.
   Among steps aimed ostensibly at damage control, a few
Xinhua officials deemed close to Mr. Xu have been called to
Beijing for questioning. The agency denies that a shake-up of
the Hong Kong branch is in the offing. Still, some Chinese
officials stationed in the territory say they expect such a
shake-up to take place once the inquiry is complete. Some
also say that new measures are being drafted by Beijing to
further restrict overseas travel by senior officials.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0151
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0151.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Crowding the River Bank Will Be
   Hundreds of Labrador Retrievers
   ----
   By Asra Q. Nomani
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<LP>
   CHICAGO -- There are horse races, dog races, even turtle
races. But duck races?
   Suddenly, they're all the rage. Duck dashes have recently
been held on the Missouri and Mississippi rivers and the
Elizabeth Park Canal outside Detroit. Later this month, an
estimated 50,000 ducks are expected to compete here on the
Chicago River.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But don't expect thousands of sore losers to fly away and,
well, befoul the festive event. These duck races, a new type
of charity fund-raiser, use fist-sized, nontoxic,
yellow-rubber ducks sporting black sunglasses and painted-on
smiles.
   The child-abuse unit of the Illinois Masonic Medical
Center is sponsoring Chicago's giant birdbath. Organizers
here and elsewhere rent the racing ducks from leasing
companies and then round up sponsors to adopt the birds,
usually for $5 a duck. Each duck is numbered on its
underbelly, and that and other information is fed into a
computer program called Quack Track.
   For the Chicago race, the web-footed racers will be dumped
off the Michigan Avenue bridge and propelled along the river
by fire-department water cannons. Their top speed usually is
nine miles an hour. The first duck that pops out of a chute
at the finish line wins. Among the prizes: a paddle boat.
   The race "is pretty strange," concedes George Broustis, an
administrative aide at the Metropolitan Water Reclamation
District here. City officials say it's the weirdest river
event since folks began dyeing the river green each St.
Patrick's Day.
   Charity groups are all aflutter over the fund-raiser.
"It's so warm and fuzzy," says Susan Harris, a race organizer
at Illinois Masonic. Still, the ducks ruffled feathers in
Santa Rosa, Calif., when environmentalists opposed a race on
the Russian River. They feared the ducks would float into the
Pacific Ocean, 13 miles downstream, and end up choking sea
lions.
   Great American Duck Races, a Phoenix, Ariz., company that
leases the ducks, says the number of races it supplies is
soaring -- to 38 last year from eight in 1988. This year's
total should top 100, and 105 are scheduled for next year.
   For the Chicago race, the unresolved question is how to
dump that many ducks into the river all at the same time.
Some ideas already nixed: by dump truck, helicopter, laundry
chute or cement mixer. "The ducks might get smooshed,"
worries Dawn Cielec, a race volunteer from Motorola Inc., a
corporate sponsor.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0150
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0150.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict -- Brotherly Hate:
   Gulf Crisis Underscores
   Historical Divisions
   In the Arab `Family'
   ---
   Stress Caused by Iraq Attack
   Renews Region's Grudges
   And Shifts Some Alliances
   ---
   Is Arafat on a Banana Skin?
   ----
   By Geraldine Brooks and Tony Horwitz
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<LP>
   Libya's Col. Moammar Gadhafi certainly wasn't about to
take the risk.
   Arriving at the airport in Casablanca last summer for an
Arab League summit, the colonel eyed a traditional welcoming
platter of camel's milk and dates, picked up one date as if
to eat it, then slipped it into his pocket. Few of the other
Arab kings, presidents and emirs arriving on the tarmac were
inclined to risk the untested food.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   When Arab leaders gather to demonstrate brotherhood, the
paradigm is Cain and Abel. Jordan's King Hussein travels with
a private chef, and not just because he's a picky eater. He
was 15 when he watched a Palestinian gun down his grandfather
at the Al Aqsa mosque in Jerusalem. But bodyguards and
food-tasters are no bar to florid proclamations that "the
great Arab heart beats as one."
   In speaking of the ties that bind them, Arabs constantly
invoke the image of family. The current Gulf conflict, they
say, is a squabble between brothers, best settled behind
closed doors. "Fraternal Iraq" was how Egyptian President
Hosni Mubarak referred to Baghdad at last Friday's summit in
Cairo -- before ordering his own troops in to protect Saudi
Arabia. Saddam Hussein depicts his midnight raid on Kuwait as
reuniting an Arab family shattered by colonialism.
   To Western ears, such cant sounds cynical. But to many
Arabs, it resonates back 1,000 years, to a lost age when
unity and greatness were indeed real. Dreams of Arab
brotherhood also feed on the resentment bred during
intervening centuries, when foreign armies, from the
Crusaders to the Israelis, humiliated Arabs and carved up
their land.
   Saddam Hussein's action has exposed these fault lines in
the region, just as revolution in Eastern Europe has laid
bare old feuds between nations and ethnic groups. When the
sand settles on the current Gulf crisis, these historical
tensions will remain, leaving the Arab world in greater flux
than it has been since World War I. "Saddam," says
Palestinian political scientist, Sa'eb Erakat, "may have
opened the gates of hell in the Middle East."
   The very notion of a monolithic Arab nation has always
contained elements of Western simplification, Arab fantasy
and Israeli propaganda (20 hostile nations encircling the
tiny Jewish state, like Indians attacking a wagon train).
While there have been flashes of modern accord -- in the
1960s, under the charismatic leadership of Egypt's Gamal
Abdel Nasser -- the Gulf flare-up shows how deep the
divisions go. A short list of Arab hates reads like an
adaptation of the Tom Lehrer song, "National Brotherhood
Week": The Iraqis hate the Syrians, the Yemenis hate the
Saudis, the Jordanians hate the Kuwaitis -- and everybody
hates the Jews.
   Such enmities are inevitable in a culture so vast and
varied. Arab territory spans five time zones and is home to
some 185 million people; Casablanca is closer to Boston than
it is to Oman. Kuwait has a per capita income of $23,000;
Yemen's is about $500.
   Most Arabs are Moslem, but there also are some 10 million
Christians, including the Iraqi foreign minister, Tariq Aziz,
and the radical Palestinian leader, George Habash. At a
synagogue in downtown Baghdad, Jews still gather in prayer,
and there are thousands of Jews in Yemen, Syria and North
Africa. Ethnically, the region includes blue-eyed Berbers,
black Nubians, Kurdish tribesmen and fair-haired Circassians.
   At its most basic, to be Arab means to speak Arabic. But
while the classical, written tongue of the Koran is uniform,
dialects are so varied that an Iraqi talking to a Libyan is
roughly like a Scottish shepherd speaking to a Mississippi
farmer. Palestinians living in Tunisia often speak to their
neighbors in French, just to be understood.
   For Westerners, time spent in the Arab world leaves
contradictory impressions: There is the impoverished
Palestinian family that piles a guest's plate with the
choicest morsels; and then the handless corpse of a pregnant
nurse, butchered by fellow Palestinians who said she
collaborated with Israel. There are evening strolls along the
Tigris River in Baghdad, where the only danger is stumbling
on an embarrassed couple kissing; and then the stench of the
desert battlefield as trucks driven by heedless Iraqi
soldiers grind tread marks into a mass of fresh Iranian
corpses.
   A language that gave the world algebra also has bequeathed
it the word "assassin," which originally referred to
hashish-eating fanatics who murdered Christians. "Infidel" is
one of the most common words in the Koran, never far from
another noun, "hellfire." To die in holy war -- which Saddam
Hussein has called on fellow Arabs to wage against Iraq's
enemies -- is to gain quick entry to heaven. Yet the chances
of being murdered in the Arab world are 30 times less than in
America.
   Saddam Hussein epitomizes the dark side of the Arab world,
one which the West has too often taken for the whole. The
Iraqi president doesn't make any secret of his attachment to
guns, torture and poison gas. His speeches are riddled with
references to plucked eyes and chopped limbs. Asked what
Saddam Hussein would have become had he been born into a
middle-class American family, one Iraq expert responds;
"either a surgeon or a mafia don."
   James Zogby, head of the Arab American Institute, likens
Saddam Hussein's appeal to that of the black American
preacher, Louis Farrakhan. Both speak to "a very angry, very
alienated constituency," he says. Continuing the ghetto
analogy, he says that for many Arabs, Saddam Hussein "is the
baddest brother in town. He's tough, he's strong and nobody
owns him. Many people like that." Unfortunately, in Mr.
Zogby's view, "Saddam is a loose cannon, not a savior."
   The Arab anger President Hussein has tapped, and the dream
of a potent and united Arab world, finds its roots in the
Middle East of the 7th Century. Before Allah revealed Islam
to a Mecca camel merchant named Mohammed in 610, the term
"Arab" referred only to the scattered tribes of the Arabian
peninsula. But in the century that followed, the prophet's
disciples burst out of Arabia on camel and horseback, driving
east into India, and northwest as far as central France.
Moslem conquests continued for centuries; pirates from
Algiers even came ashore in Iceland. Though roughly one-sixth
of the world's population is Moslem, only one out of five
Moslems is Arab.
   Between roughly 750 AD and 1050 AD, the Arab domain was
bigger than the Roman Empire at its peak. While Saxons and
Franks fought over feudal Europe, scholars in Damascus, Cairo
and Baghdad translated Aristotle, and Arab doctors developed
an inoculation against smallpox. Ibn Battuta, the Arab Marco
Polo, traveled 73,000 miles in the 14th century without
venturing much outside the Dar al-Islam, or House of Islam.
   For Moslems of this period, nation and race were
unimportant; the only distinction that mattered was that
between believers and infidels -- the sole important
distinction for many Moslems today. Europeans, according to a
10th century Arab geographer, were "more like beasts than
men." Europe, of course, was contemptuous of Arabs as well;
in Dante's Inferno, Mohammed occupies the eighth circle of
hell, not far from Satan.
   The Arab world's golden age ended in feuds and foreign
invasion: first by Crusaders, then by Mongols and then by
Ottoman Turks, who by the mid-16th century had made most of
the Arab world its vassal. It is this era of Arab history,
and the European domination that followed, that created many
of the tensions being played out in the Gulf today. Haunting
monuments to past glory are everywhere: the pillars of the
Queen of Sheba's temple in Yemen, the ruins of Babylon in
Iraq, the soaring mosques of Cairo. Writes the Arabist, W.C.
Smith: "The Arab sense of bygone splendor is superb."
   So is the sense of betrayal. If Arabs seem uneasy at the
sight of U.S. troops landing in the desert, it is because
they have every reason to distrust the West. During World War
I, Arabs were victims of one of history's most blatant double
deals. The ruler of Mecca, great-grandfather of Jordan's King
Hussein, offered to help the British against the Turks in
exchange for Arabian independence. His sons set off with T.E.
Lawrence on the military adventures so romantically depicted
in the film, "Lawrence of Arabia."
   In secret, however, Britain and France crafted a scheme to
carve up the Arab world between them. In the end, France
(which already held much of North Africa) took what is now
Syria and Lebanon while Britain added the newly created
mandates of Palestine, Jordan and Iraq to its holdings in
Egypt, Sudan, Oman and Aden. Winston Churchill used to boast
that he created Jordan one Sunday afternoon with the stroke
of a pen.
   By World War II, Jews were pouring into Palestine, fleeing
Hitler. To Arabs, these Europeans looked like yet another
wave of colonial usurpers. Arabs resisted the immigration in
a conflict continuing to this day.
   To appreciate how deeply the presence of Israel is felt,
it is necessary only to turn on the television news in half a
dozen Arab capitals. The land mass that the rest of the world
knows as Israel often doesn't exist, either on maps or in
official parlance. In some states it is the "Zionist entity"
run by "the terrorist Yitzhak Shamir." Although Jordanian and
Israeli farmers gaze at each other across the narrow Jordan
River, there isn't any phone, telex or postal contact between
the two countries.
   After King Hassan of Morocco met with Israel's Shimon
Peres, Col. Gadhafi of Libya donned a white glove before
greeting the King, so he wouldn't touch what he considered
Zionist-tainted flesh. Even now, as Arab troops face off
against Iraq, Arabs acknowledge that a single Israeli bombing
raid on Iraq would force Arab nations to rally behind Saddam
Hussein.
   America's unwavering support for Israel pains Arabs,
especially those who spent their student years in the U.S.
"We get to know Americans, how fair they are, friendly and
warm, and then we see all that fairness vanish when it comes
to Israel," says U.S.-educated Saad Eddin Ibrahim, an
Egyptian academic. Many Arabs see the Gulf conflict as yet
another example of the U.S.'s double standard. They say the
U.S. is resisting Iraq with a resolve never shown during the
Israeli invasion of Lebanon and Israel's long occupation of
Palestinian land.
   Arab discomfort with the West is cultural as well. Arab
students often are repelled by the crime, drugs and relaxed
sexual mores of the West, and are only too happy to get home
to the conservative certainties of their societies.
   And certainties they are. According to the opening of the
Koran, "there is no doubt in this book." Islam has never
undergone a reformation. In Saudi Arabia, women aren't
allowed to drive and men are herded to prayer by
stick-wielding police from the "Committee for the Propagation
of Virtue and the Prevention of Vice." Even liberal Egypt has
banned a book by its Nobel Prize winner, Naguib Mafouz,
because it indirectly questions Islam.
   Mideast analysts have long focused on Islamic
fundamentalism and the Arab-Israeli conflict as the big risks
to peace in the region. But the current crisis wasn't
provoked by either: It is about money and borders. So far,
Islamic fundamentalists have divided along national lines; in
Egypt, they have condemned Iraq, while in Jordan they have
cheered it. However, all the fundamentalists deplore U.S.
involvement in the region.
   In addition to exploiting deep-seated anti-Western
feeling, Saddam Hussein is trying to inflame class tensions,
which have brewed ever since drillers first spurted oil onto
the Bahraini sands in 1932. That discovery would give rise to
the greatest transfer of wealth in human history -- from
industrialized countries to desert bedouins. By the 1970s,
Arabs who had eked out miserable lives on dates and camel
milk found themselves able to afford jetloads of fresh Maine
lobster and prime rib steak. The Persian Gulf's small ruling
families were the greatest beneficiaries, and the West
watched -- and worried -- as they amassed ever more capital.
   The oil wealth divided the Arab world. In some cases, tiny
city-states became the richest nations on earth while their
overpopulated neighbors -- many with little or no oil --
remained beggars. The rich countries, such as Kuwait,
imported Egyptians, Palestinians and others to do their labor
and invested much of their wealth in the West, breeding
further resentment and class tensions.
   It isn't surprising, then, that oil has aroused
territorial disputes as well. One reason Saddam Hussein's
land grab sent tremors through Middle East sands is that
border disputes tend to proliferate here. Damascus still
dreams of a "Greater Syria" that encompasses territory now
belonging to Lebanon, Israel, Jordan and Turkey. Yemen claims
southern Saudi Arabia, and both Oman and Saudi Arabia believe
pieces of the United Arab Emirates rightly belong to them.
The Emirates are so disunited that a map of the nation is a
crazy-quilt of sheikdoms, some of which include pockets of
land inside their neighbor's boundaries. The map is also
riddled with neutral zones and lines marked "border disputed"
or "boundary undefined."
   Iraq shows how arbitrary colonial boundaries can be. The
north is populated by bitter Kurds, promised statehood that
never materialized; the south by Shi'ite Moslems with strong
links to Iran. And the area in between is home to Saddam
Hussein's ruling Sunni minority. President Hussein is so wary
of his own countrymen that his ruling clique is composed
largely of relatives and friends from his small hometown of
Tikrit.
   Since the death of Egypt's President Nasser in 1970, the
Arab nations, including Iraq, have jostled for his mantle.
Each of the major players feels it is the rightful heir to
leadership. Saudi Arabia is custodian of Islam's holy places,
Mecca and Medina, and owns the world's richest oilfields.
Syria has led the struggle against Israel and has as its
capital Damascus, the world's oldest continuously inhabited
city. Egypt has a population double that of any other Arab
country and its capital, Cairo, is the traditional seat of
Arab learning.
   Now, Saddam Hussein is making his claim for power through
military might; for added legitimacy, he says Baghdad was the
historical capital of the Arab world and claims direct
descent from Mohammed. He also publicly invokes the image of
Nebuchadnezzar, best-remembered for sacking Jerusalem and
enslaving the Jews.
   In turn, Egypt's Mr. Mubarak, whose nine-year presidency
has been characterized by cautious plodding, has emerged as
the decisive leader of the anti-Iraq camp. If Iraq is faced
down, Mr. Mubarak's unhesitating stance is likely to earn him
a blank check from grateful Gulf regimes, and even firmer
support from the West.
   Two of the region's great survivors, meanwhile, are in
trouble. The PLO leader, Yasir Arafat, is "a man standing on
a banana skin," according to an Arab political analyst.
"Arafat is a brilliant man, but we have a saying in Arabic:
The slip-up of a brilliant man is worth a thousand deadly
errors."
   Mr. Arafat has sided with Iraq, and thereby placed himself
in double jeopardy. If Iraq is smashed, Egypt and the Gulf
will exact a huge price for Mr. Arafat's disloyalty. At the
same time, if Saddam Hussein somehow outlasts the huge forces
arrayed against him, his power and prestige could transform
Mr. Arafat into an Iraqi puppet; rather than deal with him on
the Palestinian issue, negotiators might well go over his
head to the Iraqi leader.
   Jordan's King Hussein, who has deftly weathered 38 years
of crisis-ridden rule, also is playing a dangerous game,
using Iraq as a deterrent against Israel and Israel as a
deterrent against Iraq. After initially siding with Saddam
Hussein, he now has edged toward the moderate Arab camp and
risks a rebellion by his own population, which is strongly
pro-Iraq.
   Syria's Hafez Assad, an archrival of Saddam Hussein, has
been drawn closer to moderates such as Egypt. Syria may
become, if not a U.S. ally, at least less of an enemy than it
has been for decades. And Saudi Arabia's King Fahd, by making
the tough decision to invite U.S. forces into his country,
has shown some rare political forcefulness. The sedentary
monarch has long been plagued by orthopedic problems, and
whenever he failed to show up at heated Arab meetings, Arab
wits blamed it on the King's "weak knees." Because he has now
taken a firm stance, the King also risks appearing as a U.S.
lackey, calling in infidel troops to defend Islam's holy
land.
   But Saddam Hussein's call for a religious "uprising" in
Saudi Arabia hasn't yet yielded much response, says Abdala
Meer Mosa, a Saudi Shi'ite dissident who usually opposes the
monarchy. "I don't think anyone is fooled by Saddam's `jihad'
-- everyone knows he's a butcher, a torturer, and the way he
captured Kuwait is something horrible." Mr. Mosa said even
dissidents recognize that Saudi King Fahd had little choice
but to call for foreign help.
   Still, some Arabs worry that U.S. forces, once in, will
prove difficult to dislodge. They fear that Saudi Arabia will
become one big U.S. base, garrisoned by Americans determined
to protect future oil supplies.
   These sorts of fears -- and the splits they are causing in
the Arab world -- were apparent at Friday's hastily convened
Arab summit, where just 12 of the 20 Arab League members
voted to send forces to Saudi Arabia. Iraq, Libya, and the
PLO rejected the proposal outright, while key states such as
Jordan and Algeria wavered in a meeting so acrimonious that
the Kuwaiti emir stormed out and another member of the royal
family fainted. At one point an Iraqi reportedly threw a
plate of food at the Kuwaiti delegation. Now, with Arab
troops arrayed against each other on the Saudi border, the
dream of brotherhood seems more distant than ever before.
   Egyptians have long told a wistful joke about Arab
divisions. A trumpeter stands outside the Arab League
headquarters in Cairo. Asked why he is there, the musician
says, "I'm supposed to blow my horn when Arab unity comes."
   "And how much are you paid?"
   "Fifteen pounds a month."
   "That's nothing]"
   "I know," the trumpeter says. "But it's a lifetime job."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0149
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0149.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Addington Environmental Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   ADDR
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   ASHLAND, Ky. -- Addington Environmental Inc. said it
signed an option to acquire an existing landfill in South
Carolina.
   The option allows Addington Environmental, a subsidiary of
the coal mining concern Addington Resources Inc., to purchase
the assets of Appleton Sanitary Landfill in Allendale County,
S.C., for an undisclosed amount.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0148
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0148.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   Bullion Proves to Be a Poor Security
   For Mideastern Investors, Dealers Say
   ----
   By Neil Behrmann
   Special to The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
PRECIOUS METALS, STONES, GOLD, SILVER (PCS)
</IN>
<LP>
   LONDON -- Just over a decade ago, gold prices soared
threefold to $850 an ounce, mainly because worried sheiks
feared armed confrontation in the Middle East.
   This time around, however, bullion proved to be an
unsatisfactory haven for Middle Eastern potentates, some
dealers say.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Iraq's invasion of Kuwait only spurred a gold price rise
of $23 to $396 an ounce, and the metal proved to be poor
security for Kuwaitis, the dealers say. The invading Iraqi
army looted Kuwaiti banks, houses and bazaars, stealing large
quantities of gold.
   "Worried Middle Eastern potentates now appreciate that
gold doesn't provide more security than other financial
assets," a German bullion manager says. On the contrary, it
was fortunate for wealthy Kuwaitis to have other assets
safely tucked away in foreign banks, he says.
   It isn't even advantageous to hold gold as a "discreet
asset", the dealers say. Gold isn't any more anonymous than
currency deposits, securities or any other financial assets,
they say.
   When the U.S., U.K. and other nations either froze or
restricted movement of Kuwaiti and Iraqi assets after the
invasion, gold was included.
   Gold owned by Kuwaitis and Iraqis are under the same
restrictions as other assets, a senior Bank of England
official says. Banks intending buying or selling bullion on
behalf of Kuwaiti or Iraqi owners must receive permission
from the Bank of England, the official says.
   Bullion banks are under a legal obligation to disclose
whether Kuwaitis or Iraqis are the owners of the metal, the
official said. Since gold stocks are held at the Bank of
England and in the vaults of London bullion houses, its
ownership can be traced, the official says.
   The Bank of England rules apply to assets under its own
jurisdiction, the official says. Yet if a Swiss bank carries
out the transaction with a London bullion house, it is up to
the Swiss intermediary to disclose the Kuwaiti or Iraqi
ownership of the gold to its own regulatory authority, the
official says.
   Yet some dealers say wealthy Middle Eastern investors are
no longer mesmerized by gold.
   It costs $1500 for each $1 million worth of gold stored in
a vault of a Swiss bank, and the metal doesn't earn any
interest.
   "Moreover, the younger Middle Eastern generation isn't as
gold-minded as their elders," says Alfred Schneider, a first
vice president of Swiss Bank Corp. They are educated abroad
and understand sophisticated currency and bond and equity
investments, he says.
   Between March and June, Kuwaiti and Saudi investors dumped
an estimated 100 to 200 tons of gold on the market, bullion
dealers say, because they were disenchanted with it as an
investment. That gold was originally bought in the late '70s,
so losses on capital and foregone interest were extensive.
   In their rush to obtain dollars and other foreign currency
during the latest crisis, wealthy Middle Eastern sheiks,
including Kuwaitis and Saudi Arabians, sold more gold, Swiss
dealers say. They received higher prices because professional
dealers and investors in Europe, the U.S. and Japan were
enthusiastic buyers.
   Despite the growing sophistication of the wealthier Middle
East families, people in the region will continue to be
hoarders of gold, according to Timothy Green, a gold
consultant and author of books on the subject. In the past
decade, for example, Saudi Arabians bought 173 tons of gold
from local dealers.
   In the latest crisis, Middle Eastern investors bought
small gold bars and jewelry at bazaars known as souks. The
souks could soon run out of gold, dealers say, because Swiss
and other Western bullion refiners have stopped shipments of
the metal to the unstable region.
   There were some advantages for Kuwaitis to hold gold.
   "An ounce or two would have bribed an Iraqi soldier," the
German banker says. For refugees, gold in the pocket is worth
far more than virtually useless Kuwaiti currency, he says.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0147
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0147.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Trump to Hire First Boston to Organize
   $1.3 Billion Casino Bond Restructuring
   ----
   By Neil Barsky
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B2
</SO>
<CO>
   X.TMP Z.CSU BT CMB CCI MHC MIDL FFB NW
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
CASINOS AND GAMBLING (CNO)
BANKS (BNK)
LODGING, HOTELS, MOTELS, LODGES, CAMPGROUNDS (LOD)
</IN>
<LP>
   This will be a busy week for Donald J. Trump, who it now
appears will spend the rest of 1990 negotiating with bankers,
contractors and bondholders to keep his shaky empire afloat.
   Today, he plans to hire First Boston Corp. to organize a
restructuring of $1.3 billion in casino bonds, the developer
has told several individuals.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Tomorrow, he is scheduled to sign the first closing
documents on a $65 million loan that gives his bankers second
mortgages on his most valuable properties, and gives him
three to five years to pay interest on nearly half of his $2
billion in bank debt.
   He is also soon expected to name a chief financial officer
to oversee his operations. That job has already been offered
to Stephen F. Bollenbach, Promus Cos. chief financial
officer.
   "But I will still be the top guy, don't forget that," Mr.
Trump said in a brief telephone interview.
   Meanwhile, Mr. Trump still hasn't come to an agreement
with contractors that helped build the Taj Mahal and say that
they're owed about $80 million. The contractors have
threatened to force Mr. Trump into bankruptcy proceedings if
an agreement isn't reached shortly.
   But Mr. Trump's biggest challenge is expected to be
persuading his bondholders to forgo interest payments in
exchange for equity in his casinos. Unlike the banks, the
bondholders' loans are fully secured by first mortgages on
the properties, which means if Mr. Trump fails to make
interest payments, they could end up owning the casinos.
   First Boston's task will be to prepare an acceptable
proposal to bondholders, many of whom have already informally
organized committees to challenge Mr. Trump. A conference
call for bondholders organized by First Executive Life, an
insurance company that owns Trump casino bonds, is scheduled
for today, says a participant.
   First Boston apparently wasn't Mr. Trump's first choice.
This past week, Merrill Lynch &amp; Co. abruptly stopped working
on the restructuring, which put pressure on Mr. Trump to come
up with a new investment adviser quickly.
   Mr. Trump must have a restructuring plan approved by Nov.
15, which is when he is scheduled to make a $47 million
interest payment to holders of junk bonds secured by the Taj
Mahal casino. The property isn't believed to be making enough
money to meet its debt service and had a $14.7 million pretax
operating loss in the second quarter.
   Mr. Trump already has a comfortable working relationship
with several First Boston officials. Casino analyst Daniel
Lee, a former Drexel Burnham Lambert analyst who has been a
vocal booster of Mr. Trump's Taj Mahal casino, has in the
past discussed working for Mr. Trump, according to several
individuals familiar with the discussions. William Jacobs, a
First Boston bankruptcy specialist, got to know Mr. Trump
when Mr. Jacobs represented holders of Resorts International
bonds in negotiations with Mr. Trump last year. Mr. Jacobs
was working for Prudential-Bache Securities.
   Both Mr. Lee and Mr. Jacobs met with Trump officials about
a bond restructuring last week, people familiar with the
situation said. Mr. Lee did not return phone calls. Mr.
Jacobs declined to comment.
   People familiar with Mr. Trump's bank deal say it makes
allowances for his Atlantic City, N.J., casinos' poor
showing. One person who has read the thousands of pages of
documents cementing the bank arrangement said that a default
on the bank loans wouldn't necessarily be triggered if Mr.
Trump defaults on payments due his bondholders.
   However, this person added, should Mr. Trump be forced to
give up any of his casinos it would still imperil the $65
million bank deal because that arrangement calls for banks to
hold a second mortgage on the Trump Plaza casino.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0146
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0146.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Credit Ratings
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C17
</SO>
<CO>
   PDQ
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   PRIME MOTOR INNS Inc. (Fairfield, N.J.) -- Standard &amp;
Poor's Corp. said it lowered its ratings on about $230
million of debt of this hotel and real estate company, and
removed the company from its CreditWatch list of issues under
review. Subordinated debt was lowered to single-B-minus from
double-B-plus. S&amp;P noted that Prime has been affected by the
rapid weakening in the hotel industry, which has reduced
Prime's financial flexibility and will depress profitability
and cash flow.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0145
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0145.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Dividend News:
   Lumex Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C9
</SO>
<CO>
   LUM
</CO>
<IN>
DIVIDENDS (DIV)
EARNINGS (ERN)
</IN>
<LP>
   LUMEX Inc. directors omitted the two-cent quarterly
dividend. As of June 30 the company had an average of 4.2
million shares outstanding. The Bay Shore, N.Y., manufacturer
of products for the fitness, health-care and physical-therapy
markets cited "depressed first-half results and the uncertain
economic climate." For the first six months, Lumex reported a
loss of $1.1 million, or 25 cents a share, against net income
of $811,000, or 19 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.
The company said, however, that it expects to be profitable
in the second half. In American Stock Exchange composite
trading Friday, Lumex fell 62.5 cents to $5.75.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0144
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0144.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Campeau Ousts
   Firm's Founder
   From Top Jobs
   ---
   Creditors' Representatives
   Are Temporarily Given
   Role of Chief Executive
   ----
   By Larry M. Greenberg
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   CMAFC WNEWS T.CMP
</CO>
<IN>
BROADLINE RETAILERS, DEPARTMENT STORES (RTB)
BANKRUPTCIES (BCY)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
REAL ESTATE INVESTMENTS (REA)
</IN>
<LP>
   TORONTO -- Robert Campeau was removed as chairman and
chief executive of Campeau Corp., the company he founded 40
years ago. The chief executive's role was temporarily given
to representatives of the debt-burdened company's major
creditors.
   Campeau, a real-estate and retailing concern based in
Toronto, didn't give a reason for the change in control, and
company directors wouldn't comment. A company official said,
however, that there would be no change in the concern's plans
to dispose of most of its Canadian real-estate assets in
order to restructure its ailing finances.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The move also doesn't affect the status of the company's
U.S. retailing subsidiaries, Federated Department Stores Inc.
and Allied Stores Corp., which sought protection from
creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code last
January.
   "At this stage there's no plan to do anything differently.
Everything that was proceeding before will still now
proceed," said Lionel Dodd, a Campeau director and chief
operating officer of Olympia &amp; York Developments Ltd., a
major Campeau creditor and its biggest shareholder.
   In a brief statement, Campeau said Friday that its board
appointed James D. Raymond and Gary M. Goodman as joint chief
executive officers on an interim basis. Mr. Raymond was named
to the board last week to represent National Bank of Canada,
another big Campeau creditor and shareholder. Mr. Goodman,
also a Campeau director, is an executive at O&amp;Y, which is
closely held by Toronto's Reichmann family.
   Campeau also said it appointed longtime director Robert
Despres as interim chairman, and said it has begun searching
for a permanent chairman and chief executive.
   Mr. Campeau, who remains a director of Campeau Corp., has
been forced gradually to cede control of his company since
his ambitious $10 billion takeovers of Federated and Allied
went sour. Last September, Mr. Campeau surrendered majority
control in exchange for an emergency loan to the U.S.
retailers by O&amp;Y. And in January, Mr. Campeau's holding was
further reduced -- to 21% from 43% on a fully diluted basis
-- after Montreal-based National Bank seized a number of his
securities. The bank took the action after Mr. Campeau
defaulted on personal loans.
   Campeau Corp.'s creditors also have increased their
presence on the board since last year. Of a total of 11
Campeau directors, O&amp;Y and National Bank currently hold a
combined six seats.
   But progress to turn the company around has been slow at
best. Mr. Campeau acknowledged at the July 30 shareholders
meeting that six months of negotiations had failed to obtain
standstill agreements with its major creditors, O&amp;Y and
Edward J. DeBartolo Corp., a Youngstown, Ohio, developer.
Campeau Corp. defaulted on the loans, totaling $705 million,
in January. In March, the company refused to pay interest due
on the loans. A demand for repayment could drive the concern
into bankruptcy.
   Heavy financing costs, as well as write-downs related to
Federated and Allied, contributed to a net loss of $1.74
billion in the year ended Jan. 31.
   The decision to dismiss Mr. Campeau came after "lengthy"
discussions by the board over the past two weeks, a source
said.
   "I suspect {Mr. Campeau} will provide a lot of advice.
{But} his principal role will be that of a director," Mr.
Dodd said.
   Meanwhile, the company will continue to seek buyers for
its real-estate assets, which carry a book value of about $1
billion. Included are such prominent properties as the
68-story Scotia Plaza in downtown Toronto and the Place de
Ville office tower in Ottawa. Still, company officials aren't
counting on any quick fixes.
   "The real-estate market has been very slow generally," Mr.
Dodd said.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0143
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0143.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Vietnam's Literature Cafe Serves Up
   A Refreshing View of Changing Times
   ----
   By Barry Wain
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   FREST
</CO>
<LP>
   HAIPHONG, Vietnam -- Inspired by the presence of a foreign
visitor, Thanh Tung calls for silence and spontaneously
composes a poem.
   As the room goes quiet, he delivers his creation fluently,
pausing only to let an interpreter render each line into
English. A sample couplet:
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   All the bitter things in my life
   Are something precious to me
                                                                                                       

   Mr. Tung's colleagues, listening attentively, nod in
approval. When he finishes, they applaud warmly. Someone
pours another round of drinks and cracks a joke, and the
place erupts in laughter and conversation.
   Welcome to the Literature Cafe, not the sort of place
usually associated with Vietnam, but a sign of the times
nevertheless.
   With the Communist Party relaxing its once-stifling grip
on everyday life, patterns of social activity are changing.
The cafe caters to something of a national passion for
literature -- it's often said that every Vietnamese is a poet
-- and an ancient salon tradition in which followers of the
arts met to discuss their work, exchange views and gossip.
The most prestigious salons were poetry-reciting groups
called "tao dan."
   The salons disappeared from what was then North Vietnam in
the early 1960s after the government jailed leaders of a
progressive literary movement when they started criticizing
corruption and collectivization and demanded more artistic
freedom. Intellectuals dared not meet in public any longer
because they feared informers and worried that their
freewheeling talk could be construed as anti-party.
   A visitor is surprised to find the Literature Cafe
thriving in industrial Haiphong, a major port and coal
transshipment center 100 kilometers east of Hanoi. Not
surprising at all, say locals, who insist that Haiphong is
"the cradle of Vietnamese culture" -- undeterred by the fact
that similar claims are made for other areas of the country.
   The cafe was opened on a street near the city's main
market in January by Le Viet Hung, a 41-year-old literature
teacher, who sees it as a gathering place for "writers, poets
and poor people."
   It is run by the chain-smoking, ever-smiling Mr. Tung, 55,
Haiphong's leading poet, who describes himself as "manager
and soul of the cafe." An engaging man with a light mustache,
chin stubble and long straggly hair that can't hide a bald
pate, he's on hand every day to share a drink with customers.
   Mr. Tung is helped by Thu Hien, a well-known classical
singer, and five other women, mostly daughters of
intellectuals. Mr. Hung jokes that he pays Mr. Tung and the
women "by sentiment," though they do, in reality, draw basic
salaries. The real reason they have joined the venture,
though, is that they are all friends.
   The cafe itself is modest, little more than a square
concrete room, with tables made from cross-sections of tree
trunks, thick and gnarled. The seats are the usual tiny
Vietnamese stools on which occupants squat a few centimeters
from the floor.
   The walls are fairly bare, the main decoration being pure
kitsch: A clock set in a framed print of a beautiful young
woman who sits, demure and topless, with arms forward playing
a flute and protecting her modesty. The second hand moving
around the dial has a colored plastic butterfly attached to
it.
   On sale, apart from light meals, are beer, liquor, soft
drinks, tea, coffee, cigarettes and a few other odds and
ends. But what is in greatest demand is free: good
old-fashioned fun, a scarce commodity across decades of cruel
war and grim dictatorship in Vietnam.
   Drop in at the Literature Cafe unannounced on a Sunday
morning and catch a rare glimpse of a somewhat different
slice of Vietnamese life.
   Le Dai Thanh, 84, the elder statesman among the regulars,
looks as if he has just stepped out of the Left Bank in
Paris. He's dressed in dark slacks, a colored shirt and tie
that don't match, a soiled jacket and worn, two-tone blue
sneakers. Long dark hair trails from beneath a dusty brown
felt hat, and he wears heavy, dark-rimmed spectacles.
   "I'm a king of French language," he declares in the
jocular, boastful style common in the group. "I can compose
poems in French." Actually, Mr. Thanh says, he has taught
himself five foreign languages and is now learning German. To
prove his proficiency in English to a visitor, he inscribes a
dog-eared volume of his Vietnamese-language poetry that was
published in 1987.
   Mr. Thanh is a walking history book. Back in French
colonial days, he attended Haiphong's famous Ngo Quyen
school, where former premier Pham Van Dong was a classmate.
Mr. Thanh remembers the day security police arrived to arrest
a younger student, Nguyen Van Linh, who now leads the nation
as general secretary of the Vietnamese Communist Party.
   Today, Mr. Thanh has other things on his mind. "This is a
good omen," he says as he accepts an imported cigarette. "It
will inspire my poem." He retires to a corner to write and
ignores everyone and everything for the next couple of hours.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0142
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0142.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Mark IV Buys Rolls-Royce Unit
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A12
</SO>
<CO>
   IV U.RR
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   AMHERST, N.Y. -- Mark IV Industries Inc. said it acquired
Ferranti-Packard Electronics from NEI Canada Limited, a
subsidiary of Rolls-Royce, for 20.9 million Canadian dollars
(US$18.2 million).
   Ferranti-Packard is a Canadian designer, manufacturer and
marketer of electromagnetic display devices. It expects 1990
revenue of C$24 million. Mark IV is a maker of industrial
products.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0141
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0141.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International Brief -- Nestle S.A.:
   Swiss Food Firm Says Sales
   Were Flat in the First Half
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   Z.NES
</CO>
<IN>
FOOD PRODUCTS (FOD)
</IN>
<LP>
   Nestle S.A. posted sales of 22.7 billion francs ($16.9
billion) for the first half of 1990, compared with 22.8
billion francs a year earlier.
   The Vevey, Switzerland, food company cited the weakness of
several currencies against the Swiss franc as the main reason
for the flat sales. The results matched analysts'
expectations.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Analysts expect Nestle's group net income for the full
year to rise as much as 10%, depending on currency rates,
from the year-earlier 2.41 billion francs.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0140
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0140.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Trans World Airlines Inc.:
   Airline Swung to a Profit
   Of $103.4 Million in Quarter
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   TWA
</CO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
</IN>
<LP>
   Trans World Airlines Inc. posted net income of $103.4
million for the second quarter, compared with a net loss of
$4.4 million a year earlier.
   Results included gains of $160.2 million from the sale of
Chicago airport facilities, aircraft and part of TWA's stake
in a passenger reservation system. Closely held TWA also had
an extraordinary gain of $19.8 million from the repurchase of
$213.1 million of debt.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Revenue rose 2.5% to $1.23 billion from $1.20 billion a
year earlier.
   Operating profit before interest expense and certain other
costs fell almost by half to $43.9 million from $80.5 million
a year earlier.
   For the half, TWA had a net loss of $39.6 million on
revenue of $2.24 billion, compared with a year-earlier net
loss of $87.4 million on revenue of $2.19 billion.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0139
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0139.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   UPS, Teamsters
   To Continue Talks
   Toward Accord
   ----
   By Albert R. Karr
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B2
</SO>
<CO>
   LABOR X.UPS
</CO>
<IN>
AIR FREIGHT (AIF)
TRUCKING (TRK)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- United Parcel Service of America Inc. and
the Teamsters union have agreed to keep negotiating on a new
labor contract even if members reject the company's latest
offer, the package-delivery service said.
   Results of the vote by the 140,000 members who work for
UPS are expected today.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   A UPS spokesman said both sides acceded to a request by
the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service to continue
bargaining over a new three-year contract.
   No union spokesman who would discuss the issue could be
reached. Teamsters for a Democratic Union, a dissident group
based in Detroit, said one local had received two messages
from the union's headquarters, the first denying any
agreement to keep negotiating, but the second acknowledging
that the union would continue the talks.
   A spokesman for the mediation service said the agency does
intend to ask the union and the UPS to keep bargaining, and
he said the agency is "optimistic" that they will agree to do
so.
   The current contract expired Aug. 1. The Teamsters agreed
to keep working and to extend the deadline for counting the
ballots until last Friday. Any majority vote against
ratifying the offer would empower the Teamsters leaders to
call a strike. Both the union's leadership and the dissident
group have recommended that the rank-and-file reject the UPS
offer.
   TDU officials say this isn't a good time a strike. The
impact on UPS business would be diminished, because August is
a slow month for small-parcel deliveries. The union would do
better to wait until the busy October-December delivery
season approaches, they say.
   But union leaders and members may also be concerned that
UPS, the nation's largest small-package delivery firm, might
lose market share from a strike. The Postal Service is
gearing up to absorb some of the UPS business if there's a
strike, and some other firms have developed new distribution
schemes to make up for loss of UPS service.
   The TDU, in fact, has urged negotiators to return to the
bargaining table. It suggested that members aren't "eager to
strike" and said that "UPS Teamsters are proud of the
top-notch service UPS provides."
   The UPS has called its offer "final," the same term it
used for an earlier offer that union negotiators spurned. The
latest offer includes a wage increase of 50 cents an hour, or
about 3%; a cost-of-living raise capped at 20 cents an hour,
in the second and third years of the contract; signing
bonuses; a lower-wage tier for new employees, and an increase
of 35 cents an hour in the employer contribution to the
health and welfare fund and the pension fund.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0138
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0138.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   A Primer on Chemical Weapons;
   How Iraq Got `Poor Man's Bomb'
   ----
   By John J. Fialka
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
CHEMICALS, PLASTICS (CHM)
</IN>
<LP>
   As the U.S. sends troops to Saudi Arabia, American forces
for the first time since World War I will face an enemy that
has used poison gases. Here are some of the typical questions
that have arisen about such a danger.
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   Q. What chemical weapons does Iraq have?
   A. According to the U.S. Central Intelligence Agency and
others who follow the proliferation of chemical weapons, the
Iraqis have thousands of tons of mustard gas and hundreds of
tons of nerve gas at their disposal. The Iraqi buildup of
chemical agents began in 1981, shortly after the Israelis
bombed Osirak, a large French-built nuclear research reactor
outside of Baghdad. By knocking out what they feared was a
plant dedicated to making nuclear weapons, the Israelis
helped provoke Saddam Hussein's interest in what some people
call "The Poor Man's Bomb" -- poison gas.
                                                                                                       

   Q. What effect do chemical weapons have on the
battlefield?
   A. The biggest effect may be psychological. Mustard gas
caused most of the 1.3 million gas casualties in World War I,
of which 7% were fatal. It blisters the skin and burns the
lungs. Nerve gas, developed but never used by the Germans in
World War II, attacks the body's central nervous system, and
can cause death -- either through inhalation or through
contact with the skin -- within a few minutes. The mere
threat of the use of such weapons forces an opposing force to
don rubberized protective clothing and masks that can degrade
the fighting power of military units between 30% and 80%,
according to a 1985 Pentagon study.
                                                                                                       

   Q. Are there any defenses?
   A. Yes. The U.S. Marines being deployed to the desert, for
example, have been issued new British hand-held electronic
detectors that can instantly detect the presence of chemical
agents. They have also been issued protective overgarments
that are lighter than previous designs and somewhat
breathable, giving them some relief from the searing desert
temperatures. New gas masks have been designed to allow
soldiers to talk and drink, eliminating some of the
shortcomings in earlier defensive gear, which tended to make
soldiers feel helpless and alone. U.S. troops are also issued
spring-loaded syringes containing atropine and another
chemical that blocks the effect of nerve gas. Unfortunately,
according to the 1985 Pentagon study, the injection may
"leave the victim (temporarily) dehydrated, incoherent and
mentally disoriented."
                                                                                                       

   Q. How are chemical weapons used in the battlefield?
   A. In their war against Iran, Iraqis loaded gas into
bombs, rocket warheads, artillery and mortar shells. The
warhead's explosion turns liquid chemicals into a fine
aerosol that descends on troops and their equipment. Often
odorless and tasteless, chemical weapons are also believed to
be a major threat to warships: They can cause havoc and many
casualties if they are sucked into a ship's ventilation
system. Matthew Meselson, a Harvard University biochemist,
says the intense heat of the Saudi desert may minimize the
effects of nerve gas through rapid evaporation. Some forms of
nerve gas, however, contain a thickening agent to amke them
persist.
                                                                                                       

   Q. What would the U.S. do to retaliate against a chemical
weapons attack?
   A. Although U.S. officials haven't ruled out the use of
chemical or nuclear weapons in such an event, they have said
privately that the most likely counterattack would be to use
precision-guided conventional weapons, such as bombs or
rockets, on the most sensitive Iraqi targets. "We can do a
hell of a lot more damage to the guy who's causing all the
trouble {Saddam Hussein} with our conventional arsenal," says
one official, who asked not to be identified.
                                                                                                       

   Q. How did the Iraqis get their large arsenal of chemical
weapons?
   A. With a lot of help from businessmen in the West.
Investigators here and in Europe have identified a string of
U.S., Japaneses, Dutch and West German companies that have
contributed chemicals, equipment and expertise to the Iraq
effort. Foreign technicians, primarily West German
mercenaries, are believed to have helped build Iraq's two
chemical weapons plants, located in Samarra and Fallujah,
along with a research center at Salman Pak, 25 miles
southeast of Baghdad. Shipments of equipment and chemicals
from the West were imported through the Turkish port of
Mersin, according to U.S. officials.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0137
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0137.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Securities Trading Arm of Fuji Bank
   Bucks Industry Trend, Hires More Staff
   ----
   By Michael R. Sesit
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   J.FUJ
</CO>
<IN>
SECURITIES INDUSTRY (SCR)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Running counter to the industry trend, Fuji
Securities Inc., the U.S. government securities trading arm
of Japan's Fuji Bank Ltd., is adding staff.
   The firm said it is hiring 33 people from the defunct
Westpac Pollack Government Securities Inc., the primary
dealer subsidiary of Australia's Westpac Banking Corp.
Westpac closed the unit in June, citing lack of
profitability.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Fuji's move is a surprising one in a market devastated by
losses and littered with dropouts. Primary dealers are an
elite group of 41 firms that deal directly with the Federal
Reserve Bank of New York when it buys and sells U.S.
government securities as part of its activities to influence
U.S. monetary policy. Once, a dealership was one of the most
coveted franchises in international finance.
   But lately many firms have cut staff and, so far this
year, five financial institutions have given up or lost their
primary-dealer status. The latest are Bank of New York and
Midland Bank PLC, both of which abandoned the business within
the past month. Dealers' earnings are being squeezed by low
trading volume and -- except for the last few days following
Iraq's invasion of Kuwait -- reduced volatility, which
traders need to enhance profits.
   But mostly, too many firms chasing too few customers has
reduced profit margins and left many firms with bloated
overhead costs.
   Nonetheless, Fuji is gambling that with the 33 new hires
"we should be able to get a large part of {Westpac Pollack's}
business with 20% of their people and 10% of their cost,"
said Mitchell Shivers, president and chief executive officer
of Fuji Securities, which is based in Chicago. "We didn't
have a strategy to rapidly increase our New York operation,
but we didn't want to turn down an opportunity to hire very
good talent." Westpac Pollack had about 160 employees.
   The former Westpac people will remain in New York and be
merged with Fuji's small office here. Fuji executives said
there were no plans to cut any of the firm's current staff of
107.
   Last December, Fuji acquired 100% of the primary
dealership that had previously been controlled by Britain's
Kleinwort Benson Group PLC.
   People familiar with the government securities market said
that Fuji currently has a little over a 1.5% share of the
primary dealer market and that before closing, Westpac
Pollack had roughly 2% or a bit more. They also said while
Fuji currently was breaking even, the added Westpac staff
could increase both Fuji's profits and market share. They
said that Westpac Pollack was regarded as a successful
trading operation, but that its revenue was chewed up by very
high overhead costs.
   Mr. Shivers said that the former Westpac people give Fuji
a new or strengthened ability to trade Treasury bills, U.S.
federal agency securities and odd-lot orders. The latter
involve amounts less than the $1 million and above round-lot
sizes normally traded.
   Moreover, Mr. Shivers said: "We consider ourselves to be a
low-cost producer," something a growing number of executives
consider a key to surviving in the U.S. Treasury market.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0136
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0136.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Chase to Offer Severance to Employees,
   Take $30 Million 3rd-Quarter Charge
   ----
   By Robert Daniels
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   CMB
</CO>
<IN>
BANKS (BNK)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Chase Manhattan Corp. plans to offer severance
to "a few thousand" U.S. employees as part of its plan to cut
$300 million of costs.
   The banking company said employees with at least 10 years'
time would be eligible, and would start with two weeks' pay
for each year of service. Chase wouldn't specify the number
of employees eligible, but expects to report about a $30
million third-quarter charge for related costs of the
voluntary program. At the same time, a spokesman said, Chase
estimates it will save $10 million in the fourth quarter and
"commensurate" amounts later.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The charge and savings depend on the number of workers who
choose the severance, the spokesman said, adding that Chase
reserves the right to accept or reject severance applicants.
   Analysts had expected the bank to take less than $100
million of charges for the cost-cutting effort. The
spokesman, calling the severance plan "a small part" of the
overall cost cuts, confirmed that the bank plans further
steps "that will result in additional charges but additional
savings" as well.
   Chase Manhattan's chairman-elect, Thomas G. Labrecque, and
president-elect, Arthur F. Ryan, are determined to make the
major cost cuts and boost profitability as Chase, like other
major banks, has been hammered by bad commercial real estate
loans.
   At June 30, past-due real estate loans plus foreclosed
properties rose 52% to $1.75 billion, from $1.15 billion at
March 31. In the first half, Chase's net income sank 64% from
a year earlier to $96 million, or 44 cents a share, as its
provision for possible losses on bad loans grew 50% to $450
million.
   For 1989's third quarter, Chase reported a net loss of
$1.11 billion, or $12.45 a share, after $1.26 billion of
special provisions, including a special addition to the
bank's reserve for possible losses on loans to countries that
were refinancing their debts.
   Under the severance plan, those eligible employees with 10
to 19 years' experience at Chase would get two weeks' pay for
each year worked. Those with 20 or more years would get three
weeks' pay per year, to a maximum of 104 weeks.
   Chase, which employs 40,000 world-wide, isn't offering the
severance plan to, among others, non-U.S. workers, part-time
employees or certain senior officers. But for the eligible
employees "who've been here longer term," the plan "increases
their benefits and flexibility in making career decisions,"
the spokesman said.
   The eligible employees aren't concentrated in any
particular departments or divisions, Chase's spokesman said.
   Part of Chase's plan to boost profitability is possible
sales of assets. "I have nothing to report on that," the
spokesman said, though analysts expect the bank to sell
certain buildings overseas.
   Separately, Fitch Investors Service Inc. pared its ratings
on $8 billion of Chase Manhattan's securities, including a
cut in the senior debt rating to triple-B-plus from
single-A-plus. Standard &amp; Poor's Corp. and Moody's Investors
Service Inc. made similar reductions in June.
   In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Chase
shares fell 50 cents to $18.625.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0135
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0135.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Letters to the Editor:
   Too Bad, Clifford; but We're Not Sorry
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A11
</SO>
<IN>
SECURITIES INDUSTRY (SCR)
</IN>
<LP>
   Poor Clifford Gookin ("On the Street: Still Disbelieving,
a Highflying Yuppie Tastes Unemployment," page one, July 17)
should sue Harvard Business School for not having taught him
fundamentals such as "risk vs. reward" and "supply meets
demand." Perhaps Mother Teresa could recommend a lawyer for
an ill-educated white man embittered by life's cruel
injustices such as having his ego and $500,000-a-year income
shot out of the stratosphere and then having to listen to his
own whining instead of piped-in stereophonic down here on
Earth.
   Mr. Gookin sounds like a decent person, and I might have
had sympathy for him had he had the humility to acknowledge
that the "lottery" through which he, correctly, claims to
have lost his job is the very same lottery through which he
won it -- the lottery that picked "tall, mostly white, mostly
men. Most of them were athletes. They had short hair. . . ."
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Dixie Peterson
   New York
   ---
   Poor Clifford] Call it callous, but your portrait of
yuppie despair brought a smile to my face, as it probably did
to any readers who were among the tens of thousands of people
who lost their jobs through the deals Mr. Gookin and his
colleagues engineered. It is time these fearless corporate
warriors realized they are not exempt from the risk of
becoming casualties in the board-room wars they instigated,
and by which they profited so much.
   Linda Gibson
   Tampa, Fla.
   ---
   Have no sympathy for an investment banker who apparently
actually believed that with seven years of business
experience he was worth $500,000 a year. The average annual
family income in the U.S. is about $25,000. Does Mr. Gookin
truly think he was worth 20 average Americans? If so, all I
have to say is, to quote from the wisdom of Ann Landers,
"Wake up and smell the coffee, Buttercup."
   A. Kimberly Lewandowski
   Norfolk, Va.
   ---
   Mr. Gookin seems to forget he was the victim of what he
helped to perpetuate. One of the asserted reasons for many
corporate takeovers was to eliminate inefficient management
preventing a company from maximizing its profit potential.
Mr. Gookin's loss of employment is consistent with that goal.
It's difficult to feel much sorrow for him, as he had the
opportunity to earn an enormous income for several years and
will be able to find new employment at a smaller but still
comfortable income. Many employees who lost their jobs in
takeover deals in which Mr. Gookin undoubtedly participated
never made big incomes and will have a difficult time finding
new employment at a living wage.
   Mr. Gookin doesn't understand why First Boston could not
keep him when it continues to pay seven-figure salaries to
senior managers. How incredibly naive. He was merely a highly
paid technician carrying out details of deals arranged by
senior partners. He is replaceable by myriad people with
similar education. In contrast, the highly paid senior
managers have two characteristics Mr. Gookin lacks: a wealth
of business experience and, perhaps most important, the
ability to bring in clients.
   Andrew Beckerman Rodau
   Associate Professor of Law
   Ohio Northern University
   Ada, Ohio
   ---
   Mr. Gookin wonders what went wrong with his world. He
wants to know why First Boston didn't stand behind him; why
many of the firm's senior management didn't cut their
seven-figure salaries in order to keep him around. Try greed
and no loyalty -- the same principles that guided Mr. Gookin.
   These MBAs with their junk bonds and leveraged buy-outs
made an art form of "downsizing" of companies while selling
off their assets. How many thousands of hard-working men and
women found their jobs had been lost to Mr. Gookin and his
"bean counters," just so the "deal could be done?"
   John Kozaka
   North Easton, Mass.
   ---
   Your article was one of the funniest pieces I've read in a
long, long time. Mr. Gookin says he was the victim of a
callous numbers game, and that he is bitterly disappointed
that his number randomly came up. Did he ever stop to think
that being on Wall Street in the mid-1980s was also a random
bit of luck?
   Denley Chew
   Washington
   ---
   I wonder if, while Mr. Gookin and his associates pursued
their LBO quarries, he spared a thought for the "mid-Eighties
Everymen" who were less than pawns in the avaricious and
remorseless quest for sometimes senseless deals that
impoverished those who had no control over their employment
destinies?
   Now that the feeding frenzy is over, it appears very few
"names" will remain untouched by the various investigations
into the half-baked money-grubbing. The euphemism
"white-collar crime" is fast becoming the understatement of
the decade. Who knows how many more will suffer as a result
of the junk-bond debacle?
   Philip Rushton
   President
   Aviatrade Inc.
   Morristown, N.J.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0134
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0134.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Economy:
   Producer Prices
   Declined 0.1%
   For Last Month
   ---
   Latest Report Suggests Fed
   Now Will Find It Easier
   To Drive Down Rates
   ----
   By Rodney Ferguson
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<IN>
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
ECONOMIC AND MONETARY INDICATORS (EMI)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- July's 0.1% drop in producer prices suggests
that inflationary pressures were easing before the recent
tumult in the Middle East pushed up oil prices.
   The Labor Department report will make it easier for the
Federal Reserve to push down interest rates to help spur the
slowing U.S. economy. Turbulence in the bond markets and
jitters about inflation may have delayed a Fed move that now
is widely anticipated in financial markets and among Bush
administration officials.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "Absent the still undecided energy situation, producer
inflation is not threatening the economy," said Ron
Schreibman, vice president of the National Association of
Wholesalers-Distributors. "Thus, the economic evidence
favoring lower interest rates is still compelling."
   Higher oil prices, of course, will push up producer prices
in coming months, and some economists predict this will stop
the Fed from lowering rates enough to avoid a recession.
   "Perhaps the supreme irony in these figures is that
without the Middle East crisis, the Federal Reserve's
gradualist disinflationary strategy would have been
successful," commented Gordon Richards of the National
Association of Manufacturers.
   Excluding food and energy, producer prices also declined
0.1% in July, the government statistics show. Some economists
argue that food and energy costs are so volatile they should
be ignored in trying to gauge the underlying inflation rate.
   The drop in producer prices in July, the first decline
since April, follows a 0.2% increase in June. It was led by a
0.5% drop in the cost of energy, the sixth consecutive
monthly decline. The price of energy that producers pay had
fallen steadily since January, when it soared 13.7%.
   The index for consumer food prices showed no change in
July, after dropping 0.4% in June. Like energy, food prices
for producers have shown an overall decline since their
January increase of 2.3%. The January increase in food and
energy costs has been blamed on bitterly cold weather that
increased energy usage and destroyed many winter crops.
   The producer price index measures prices received by
domestic producers. It doesn't reflect import prices or the
price of services, which has been climbing much faster than
prices of goods in recent months.
   In the past year, producer prices have risen 3.4%.
   Prices of intermediate goods, which have had some
processing, were unchanged in July. Prices of crude goods
were up 0.6%, but are still below year-earlier levels.
   ---
                      PRODUCER PRICES
                                                                                                       

   Here are the Labor Department's producer price indexes
(1982=100) for July, before seasonal adjustment, and the
percentage changes from July 1990.
                                                                                                       

   Finished goods ......................... 118.0    3.4%
     Minus food &amp; energy .................. 126.5    3.6%
   Intermediate goods ..................... 113.0    0.4%
   Crude goods ............................ 101.2  - 2.6%
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0133
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0133.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Staples Chairman Accepts Projections
   For Second-Quarter Operating Profit
   ----
   By Joseph Pereira
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3B
</SO>
<CO>
   SPLS
</CO>
<IN>
DOW JONES INTERVIEW (CEO)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEWTON, Mass. -- Thomas G. Stemberg, chairman and chief
executive officer of Staples Inc., said he "doesn't quarrel"
with analysts estimates that the company will post fiscal
second-quarter operating profit of one to two cents a share.
   A tax-loss carry-forward gain in the quarter ended July 28
is expected to increase the per-share net income by one cent,
Mr. Stemberg said in an interview.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   In the year-ago quarter, the company had net income of
$72,000, or one cent a share, including a $24,000 tax-loss
carryforward benefit.
   Mr. Stemberg said he also is comfortable with projections
by analysts that the company's second-quarter sales will be
between $64 million and $64.5 million. That would be more
than a 70% rise in sales from the year-ago sales of $37.1
million.
   The company said it plans to report its second-quarter
financial results on Aug. 15 or 16.
   Staples, a four-year-old company that sells office
products exclusively, went public last April. The concern
buys merchandise in bulk, hence at relatively cheap prices,
and passes on the discounts to customers.
   Mr. Stemberg also said he wouldn't dispute analysts'
estimates for the full year. "To the extent that one can be
accountable for a company in the kind of growth that we find
ourselves in, income for the full year {before benefit from a
tax loss carry-forward} would probably be within an eye shot
of the 55 cents to 56 cents per share analysts are
estimating," Mr. Stemberg said. Annual sales estimates of
about $312 million also wouldn't be far off the mark, he
added.
   For the year ended Jan. 27, 1990, Staples reported
operating profit of $4.2 million, or 45 cents a share. A
tax-loss carry-forward gain of $1.5 million, or 16 cents a
share, made net income $5.7 million, 61 cents a share. Sales
were $181.7 million.
   Annual growth in stores opened for more than a year is
expected to decline in percentage points to the high teens
overall, down from the 33.6% recorded last year, the company
said. Sales at stores in the second year of operations are
expected to grow by 30% or more, while sales growth at older
stores could slow to about 10%.
   Mr. Stemberg attributed part of the slowdown to the
retailer's strategy of saturating the market. As the company
continues to dot the map with new store openings in one
vicinity, sales growth at older stores in nearby towns drop,
albeit "at a surprising slower rate than anticipated," he
added.
   The flat economy in the Northeast, where most of the
company's stores are concentrated, has helped the company's
paper products segment as a result of its low-price strategy,
Mr. Stemberg said. But he noted that spending on items such
as furniture, fax machines and other large ticket items, has
slowed, though "not significantly enough to fundamentally
change the firm's sales growth projections for the year."
Approximately 75% of Staples sales come from small
businesses.
   As a result of increased competition, Staples' margins for
the second quarter, particularly in Southern California,
where it operates three stores, are below expectations, Mr.
Stemberg said. However, the company "has offset margin
reductions by reducing operating expenses by an equal order
of magnitude," he added. Sales from its Southern California
stores this year should represent less than 3% of the
company's overall sales. That should increase to about 10% of
total sales next year as the company plans to open 18 to 20
new stores in the area.
   Staples added that two "new strategic moves" should fuel
growth in the coming months. The company has just opened a
32,000-square-foot delivery distribution center in Putnam,
Conn., across the street from its 136,000-square-foot
distribution facility, he said. The additional space will
quicken service along the Northeast corridor and help the
company make good on its next-day guaranteed delivery of
orders placed by telephone.
   Also, in October, Staples, which mostly has outlets in
suburbs, plans to open a 6,000-square foot Staples Express
Store in Boston's financial district. The store will serve as
a prototype for more than 30 stores slated for openings in
other major cities, including New York, Philadelphia, and
Washington, D.C., in the next several years.
   Staples, which now operates 51 stores, plans to open
another 20 stores by the end of the year and an additional 30
or more next year.
   Some analysts have said that the company's aggressive plan
leaves little room for mistakes and predict profits will be
slim. But Mr. Stemberg said the company is "very proud of the
kind of results it has achieved for investors {since it went
public last year} and comfortable and confident of our plans
for the future."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0132
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0132.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International -- Washington Insight:
   Mideast Crisis Gives Egypt Opportunity
   For Bigger Political Role, Economic Aid
   ----
   By Gerald F. Seib
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- The showdown with Iraqi leader Saddam
Hussein, dangerous though it is for the entire Middle East,
represents a badly needed opportunity for one country: Egypt.
   Egypt, once despised in Saudi Arabia and often taken for
granted in the U.S., is illustrating during the crisis how
valuable it is to both of those countries. And the U.S. and
Saudi Arabia offer Egypt the best long-term chance to pull
itself out of its economic quagmire.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But this opportunity also carries deep risks. By standing
beside the U.S. and Saudi Arabia, Egyptian President Hosni
Mubarak is taking a chance of being branded as a Western
agent protecting Arab oil assets for use by foreigners.
Iraq's Saddam Hussein, in a message beamed around the Arab
world Friday, sounded such a theme, belittling the "corrupt"
Arabs who invite in U.S. troops and staking his own claim as
the true leader of all Arabs.
   So far, though, Mr. Mubarak has stood his ground. Egypt
has led Arab countries in condemning Iraq's invasion of
Kuwait and warning against an Iraqi move into Saudi Arabia --
all despite the fact that Kuwait and Saudi Arabia mistreated
Egypt over the years because of its peace treaty with Israel.
Egypt's agreement to let a U.S. aircraft carrier and other
warships pass through the Suez Canal on their way to the
Persian Gulf illustrates its strategic importance. And
perhaps most dramatically, Mr. Mubarak's attempt to organize
a multinational Arab military force to protect Saudi Arabia
has proven his country's importance as a military ally of
both the U.S. and the Saudis.
   Egyptian leaders "have been very active and they will be
central in the diplomatic solution that allows Saddam Hussein
to climb down from the stool," says Robert Neumann, a former
American ambassador to Saudi Arabia who now is director of
Middle East studies at the Center for Strategic and
International Studies. "It makes our relations with Egypt
more valuable."
   That could translate into a more generous attitude toward
Egypt as Congress considers foreign aid and as the wealthy
Saudi royal family shares its riches. In particular, Mr.
Mubarak's willingness to risk the wrath of Arab radicals and
Islamic fundamentalists by agreeing to send Egyptian soldiers
to serve with Western forces is likely to affect
congressional thinking.
   Egypt is increasingly in need of additional U.S. help. Its
total package of military and economic aid from the U.S.,
after growing in the years after the Camp David peace treaty,
has leveled off. Egypt now gets about $1.3 billion a year in
military aid, $815 million in economic aid and $150 million
to $200 million in food aid.
   Meanwhile, Egypt's bill for repaying old U.S. loans is
exploding. Egypt now owes the U.S. about $12 billion, and
congressional aides say it is $1.2 billion to $1.5 billion
behind in debt repayments. What Egypt most needs -- and what
the Bush administration was beginning to consider even before
the latest gulf crisis -- was a plan to delay or forgive some
of these debt payments.
   Saudi Arabia's leaders, should they survive this crisis,
are in an even better position to help Egypt. After years of
ignoring Egypt's needs, Saudi Arabia recently began giving
credits for grain purchases, diplomats say. Further aid would
be even more beneficial, because aid from another Arab nation
is more palatable in the Arab world than aid from the West.
   Of course, the danger for Mr. Mubarak is that he may gain
favor with the U.S. and its Saudi allies but lose the
propaganda war for the hearts and minds of his own people to
Saddam Hussein and his rhetoric of Arab nationalism. If Mr.
Mubarak lets that happen, Egyptians won't feel gratitude but
rather may turn against him as many did against Anwar Sadat.
   In the propaganda struggle with Saddam Hussein, Mr.
Mubarak has one big advantage: a deep reservoir of resentment
toward Iraq among many Egyptians. More than four million
Egyptians, it's estimated, spent time in Iraq during the
eight-year Iran-Iraq war as guest workers, filling menial
jobs while Iraqi men went to the war front. Many say they
were mistreated and weren't allowed to take home money they
earned, and some died under mysterious circumstances after
the war ended.
   Still, Saddam Hussein's weekend call for an uprising
against Arab leaders who support the U.S. represents an
appeal "to the Arab masses," says Robert Hunter, an analyst
at the Center for Strategic and International Studies.
"Mubarak therefore is in a position where he has to worry
about his own survival."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0131
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0131.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Not Everybody Hates Saddam
   ----
   By Bernard Lewis
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<LP>
   In the Middle East nothing is quite what it seems to be,
and there are always differing, sometimes conflicting,
explanations of whatever happens. The recent war between Iraq
and Iran was variously explained as a struggle for hegemony
between two regional powers, as an ethnic conflict between
Arabs and Persians, as an ideological clash between Ba'thist
secularism and Islamic fundamentalism and even as a sectarian
squabble between Sunni and Shi'a Muslims.
   Similar variety may be seen in reactions to the current
Middle Eastern crisis, launched by Saddam Hussein's invasion
and annexation of Kuwait. In the broader world outside the
Middle East, the perception of what has happened and of what
needs to be done shows a unanimity unknown since the defeat
of Adolf Hitler.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Kuwait is after all a classical example of a small,
unoffending, peaceful country, invaded and swallowed by a
ruthless and aggressive neighbor. It is indeed difficult to
find, even in the checkered history of this century, so clear
a case of unprovoked aggression. The Kuwaitis never attacked
Iraq in word or deed, oppressed no Iraqi minority and gave no
shelter or encouragement to terrorist or guerrilla opponents
of Iraq -- on the contrary, they provided vital help to the
Iraqis during the long war against Iran, and ran one of the
least repressive regimes in the region.
   But not everyone shares the Western, and especially the
European, perception of Saddam Hussein as another Hitler
without Hitler's charm, nor would such a comparison be seen
by all as wholly negative. In the Middle East, some other
perceptions have been expressed, notably in the
English-speaking samples of public opinion provided to
Western media correspondents by local support services.
According to one view, energetically promoted by the
government of Iraq and its supporters, the rulers of Kuwait
-- and by implication others like them -- were Western
lackeys, agents of foreign imperialism in the Arab lands, and
Saddam Hussein is an Arab hero, who, by annexing Kuwait, took
the first step toward the liberation and unification of the
Arab world.
   In this perception, he is the heir of Nasser, of Saladin,
and -- in his own rhetoric -- of Nebuchadnezzar. He will
resume and complete the unfinished work of Nasser, and deal
with the enemies of the Arabs as Saladin dealt with the
Crusaders and Nebuchadnezzar with the Jews. Neither was an
Arab, but both were natives of Iraq.
   In another perception, often linked with the first, his
role model -- not named of course -- is not so much Nasser or
Saladin, but Robin Hood. This involved an abrupt switch.
During the war with Iran, Saddam Hussein was the defender of
the sheikly order in the Gulf against Iranian revolutionary
subversion. In his new role, he is himself the subverter of
rich and tyrannical old regimes, in the name of social
justice and pan-Arab egalitarianism.
   In a speech Friday, Saddam Hussein attempted yet another,
even more startling switch -- from secularist bulwark against
Islamic fundamentalism at home and abroad to defender of the
faith and claimant to the custody of the holy places, until
now a duty and privilege of the House of Saud. The call to
"jihad" will always have some appeal, though Saddam Hussein's
guise as holy warrior may lack plausibility. There is surely
a note of desperation in this appeal to religious passions.
   In the first two of these roles, perhaps even in the
third, he may win some support among the many discontented --
though more outside than inside Iraq. There is still a deep
yearning for a great Arab Moslem leader who will end foreign
and infidel ascendancy and restore Arab glory; there is also
a profound social resentment against the oil-rich rulers who
are condemned equally whether they squander or invest their
wealth. In all these roles -- as champion of the Arabs, as
sword of Islam and as avenger of the poor -- support for
Saddam Hussein will be reinforced by the respect that is owed
to power and the will to use it -- to ruthlessness and of
course, to success.
   But even among those who respond emotionally to such
appeals, there are doubts. Is he really working for the
greater Arab or Moslem cause or just for his own personal
aggrandizement? Will he really bring about a redistribution
of the wealth of the old regimes, or merely transfer it to
his own control, and in the meantime deprive great numbers of
young men from Jordan and Egypt and elsewhere of the
employment opportunities that the Gulf states and Saudi
Arabia offered? The past record of Iraq is not encouraging.
   As well as those who accept Saddam Hussein's claims, there
must be significant numbers of Arabs and other Middle
Easterners who share the perception of the rest of the world
-- that the invasion of Kuwait was an act of blatant
aggression, which must not be allowed to succeed. In the
Middle East as elsewhere, those old enough to remember or
wise enough to learn from history will recall an earlier
sequence of events -- the Japanese invasion of Manchuria, the
Italian invasion of Ethiopia, the German seizure of Austria
and then Czechoslovakia. These events led directly to the
collapse of the international order and the outbreak of World
War II. If Saddam Hussein succeeds in his gamble, the United
Nations, already devalued, will follow the defunct League of
Nations into ignominy. The world will belong to the violent
and the ruthless, and we shall all be on the way to a Third
World War.
   ---
   Mr. Lewis, professor emeritus of Near Eastern studies at
Princeton, is the author of "Race and Slavery in the Middle
East," just out from Oxford.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0130
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0130.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology --
   Video Phones:
   Picture Looks
   Brighter at Last
   ----
   By Paul B. Carroll
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<CO>
   CLIX PCTL S
</CO>
<IN>
COMMUNICATIONS TECHNOLOGY (CMT)
TELEPHONE SYSTEMS (TLS)
</IN>
<LP>
   Video telephones are finally catching on -- a mere quarter
of a century behind schedule.
   Prototypes were a hit at the 1964 World's Fair, prompting
people to jump way ahead of reality and start worrying about,
say, how to turn off the camera if they came running out of
the shower to answer the phone. But the technology wasn't
ready, and the economics never worked. Despite 20 years of
testing, the devices were never more than a novelty.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Now, however, several hundred video conferencing units are
in use around the world, and market researchers say the
market for video telecommunication equipment could reach more
than $100 million this year. They add that it could grow at
least 50% annually for the next several years.
   At the moment, the video conferencing market is dominated
by two small companies, Compression Labs Inc., of San Jose,
Calif., and PictureTel Corp., of Peabody, Mass. Other, bigger
firms, such as the Bell companies, are likely to enter the
market as it grows, either with their own products or through
alliances.
   Promoters of the technology are no longer using their
this-will-mean-the-end-of-life-as-we-know-it rhetoric. But
they do expect the technology to spread broadly through
businesses over the next decade, as it lands on many desktops
in some combination of personal computer and telephone. And
this time they may even be right.
   "The market is just exploding unbelievably," says Al Lill,
who follows the video teleconferencing market for Gartner
Group Inc., a market-research firm.
   Current systems are still clunky. If sold as a total
package, they can be as big as oversized refrigerators, with
a large television screen, camera and "codec," which
compresses the video for faster transmission over phone lines
and decompresses incoming signals. The systems also come with
microphones and a control panel.
   Prices typically range from $65,000 to $80,000 for each
unit, steep enough to give pause to many businesses. But
prices have come way down, from around $500,000 in the
mid-1980s, and the systems have improved greatly. The images
produced by the codecs are far clearer than they were a few
years ago.
   The phone companies have done their part to make the
technology easier and more affordable to use. In 1984, the
high-speed lines required for video conferences had to be
reserved well in advance, and they might cost $1,000 an hour.
Now, no warning is needed, and the lines may cost $15 an
hour, roughly what a normal long-distance line would cost.
   Prices for the hardware are expected to continue plunging
-- as always seems to happen with new types of electronics.
Mr. Lill of Gartner Group predicts that the cost of a codec
will fall from $30,000 to $1,000 within three years,
suggesting that total systems could come in under $10,000.
Even if he's overly optimistic by a few years, that's still
the kind of price that would get lots of people to start
conversing face-to-image with their colleagues.
   Even at the current prices, many users say the systems'
costs are justified by savings on travel. When First Chicago
Corp. bought a Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. business in New
York, it purchased conferencing systems from PictureTel.
First Chicago used the systems to help manage the takeover
and found itself saving so much on travel between Chicago and
New York that the systems paid for themselves within three
months.
   When Air Products &amp; Chemicals Inc. had a plant built in
Houston, it installed systems so that people at headquarters
in Allentown, Pa., could easily talk about changes in
blueprints and schedules with people at the plant site.
(Graphics can be printed out on paper and held in front of
the camera or sent directly from a personal computer into the
video conferencing equipment.)
   Tom Hickey, manager of corporate communication services at
Air Products, says the system allowed for much faster
decisions, without travel. In the past, he says, significant
changes would have involved "repeated phone calls and
letters, and then probably a visit anyway."
   Video telephones have proved useful even when
long-distance communication isn't necessary. San Diego County
installed a Compression Labs system when construction
temporarily left the courthouse 45 miles from jail. Rather
than transporting the judge or the prisoners back and forth,
the court used a video link.
   Sears, Roebuck &amp; Co. hasn't tried to quantify any savings
from its use of video conferencing but still has invested
heavily, because it feels that video improves the quality of
the communication. Sears has Compression Labs equipment in 43
rooms across the country, has 921 further rooms that can
review broadcasts from those rooms and has trained more than
8,000 people to use the equipment. Sears spokesmen say the
retailer is even looking to expand use of its network,
especially to talk to outsiders, such as suppliers.
   That may be difficult because of an old bugaboo in
computers and electronics: compatibility. PictureTel systems
can talk to other PictureTel systems but not to Compression
Labs systems or those made by anyone else. And that won't
change until the industry agrees on standards.
   An initial attempt at that should bear fruit this fall,
but that will just start to solve the problem. Standards tend
to be lowest common denominators, so each company's system
still will work best with a sister system, rather than some
other company's system.
   In addition, the initial standard, called PX64, mainly
covers very high-speed transmissions, which offer a better
picture. But low-speed communication is the fastest-growing
part of the market. When transmissions occur at low speeds,
quick movement blurs the picture.
   There are plenty of other bugs to work out, too. Although
the hardware is reliable these days, a recent demonstration
of a PictureTel system included an embarrassing 11 system
crashes in an hour.
   More importantly, some intended uses may turn out not to
be practical. Some retailers, hoping to send fewer people on
clothes-buying trips, have found that a video link doesn't
replace being there to feel the cloth and see how it hangs on
a mannequin.
   Video communication forecasts start to get fanciful again
when proponents talk about putting a system on every desktop,
but there has been some progress there, too. Harris Corp.
recently introduced personal-computer-based systems selling
for about $25,000 apiece. Some of the big semiconductor
companies are expected to produce chip sets over the next
year or two that could allow codecs to be produced on single
circuit boards, which could then be slipped into personal
computers.
   It could well take years before the desktop situation
sorts itself out. The personal-computer types,
video-conferencing types and telephone-company types will
all, no doubt, think of these desktop systems as extensions
of their own technologies, and there could be a fight over
who controls the standards for how an image is displayed. As
sometimes happens in technological changes, some other
technological constituency might join in the fun, too.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0129
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0129.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Recent SEC Filings
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C18
</SO>
<CO>
   Z.ZIN CRC WDIM OIL
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
INITIAL STOCK OFFERINGS (INI)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- The following issues were recently filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission:
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   American General Finance Corp., a unit of Zurich-American
Insurance Group, which in turn is a subsidiary of Zurich
Insurance Co. of Switzerland, shelf offering of $1 billion of
debt securities.
                                                                                                       

   American Waste Services, Inc., offering of six million
class A common shares, via Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co., PaineWebber
Inc. and First Analysis Securities Corp.
                                                                                                       

   Carolco Pictures Inc., offering of $100 million of
aggregate convertible subordinated debentures, via Bear,
Stearns &amp; Co. Inc. and Salomon Brothers Inc.
                                                                                                       

   Input/Output Inc., a subsidiary of Triton Energy Corp.,
offering of 4.9 million common shares, 3.2 million to be sold
by Triton, 1.7 million to be sold by Input/Output, via
PaineWebber.
                                                                                                       

   Scholastic Corp., proposed initial offering of 4.2 million
common shares, of which 3,270,000 will be sold by the company
and 930,000 by holders, via Goldman Sachs, Alex. Brown &amp; Sons
Inc., and Goldman Sachs International Ltd.
                                                                                                       

   Vetco Gray Inc., initial offering of nine million common
shares, via Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. and Salomon
Brothers.
                                                                                                       

   With Design In Mind International Inc., shelf offering of
670,000 units, each consisting of one share of common stock
and one common stock purchase warrant, via Paulson Investment
Co. Inc.
   ---
   Corrections &amp; Amplifications
                                                                                                       

   AMERICAN GENERAL FINANCE Corp. is a unit of American
General Corp., Houston; its affiliation was incorrect in
Monday's edition.
   (WSJ Aug. 15, 1990)
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0128
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0128.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Letters to the Editor:
   Who's That Stranger in the Nursery?
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A11
</SO>
<LP>
   Regarding your July 6 page-one article "Parental Concern:
As Nanny Agencies Proliferate, So Do Gripes About Service":
   First, personally check all references. Second, personally
interview the candidates. Third, give some time to developing
the working relationship.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   I bet the parents do at least as much when hiring someone
for the steno pool at the office. What are they thinking of,
to depend so utterly on the word of any agency as to the
person who will be in their home caring for their precious
children?
   Barbara Goering
   Chicago
   ---
   It is reprehensible that some agencies do not screen as
thoroughly as they claim. Agencies must follow through or be
prepared to refund fees. But parents must assume some
responsibility as well. I am distressed when a client to whom
I have referred a nanny declines the opportunity to
double-check my reference work on the applicant. What might
she learn about that candidate's specific suitability to her
own situation that I, not being part of her family, could not
have known to ask?
   The question that haunts this industry is, how well can
any screening process predict the likelihood of a particular
nanny's success on the job? Written references double-checked
by telephone, driver's license and criminal checks, a
personal letter from the applicant, medical history, numerous
lengthy interviews and reports, situational questions
relating directly to the candidate's working style -- a
comprehensive application is at least 10 to 15 pages long.
Some agencies do psychological tests, too, but their success
rates are no higher than those of careful agencies that do
not test.
   Nannying is hard work. Like any other responsible job it
deserves medical insurance, paid holidays and vacations, as
well as overtime pay for extra hours. It needs thoughtful and
frequent, open communications with parents, better pay and,
yes, training. Raising someone else's kids these days is no
piece of cake. Nannying, if it is to be improved, needs
recognition as a challenging, rewarding, long-term career
option for qualified, loving, intelligent women of various
ages and for an occasional young man as well.
   But please let's stop looking for Mary Poppins. She was a
creation of the Victorian imagination, which liked to pretend
that it did not need to know what went on in the nursery.
Today's involved, conscientious parent needs today's nanny, a
real person.
   Mary Clurman
   Apple Pie
   (Nanny Placement Agency)
   Montclair, N.J.
   ---
   As owner of one of the oldest agencies in the country, I
am all too familiar with the problems that arise when trying
to match families with in-home child-care providers. There
will always be unsuccessful placements due to homesickness,
personality clashes, poor communication and differing
expectations, but it doesn't mitigate the need for the best
screening and recruiting services possible for the client.
   In 1985, I and a handful of other nannies,
placement-agency owners and educators founded the
International Nanny Association to educate the public about
hiring in-home child care. Since then, we have established
standards for the industry and codes of conduct for nannies
and agencies. We have also printed definitions of "au pair,"
mother's helpers, nannies and governesses.
   My advice to the client: Take part in the screening
process. My agency always recommends to the client that he or
she follow up our screening process with calls to the nanny's
references, and most families don't do it.
   Marla Sanders
   Capable Care Agency
   Washington
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0127
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0127.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   New Stock Listings
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C17
</SO>
<CO>
   CRCH NSS BPC EASL KEEN BETZ CTL
</CO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
SECURITIES INDUSTRY (SCR)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- The New York Stock Exchange announced two new
listings, the American Stock Exchange one, and the National
Market System of the over-the-counter market two. Of the new
listings, two were initial public offerings.
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   Church &amp; Dwight Co., a Princeton, N.J., maker of
chemicals, begins trading Wednesday under the symbol CHD on
the Big Board. It previously traded over the counter.
                                                                                                       

   NS Group Inc., a Newport, Ky., holding company for four
principal operating subsidiaries, including Newport Steel
Corp. and Kentucky Electric Steel Corp., also begins trading
Wednesday, under NSS. It previously traded on the American
Stock Exchange.
                                                                                                       

   Joining the Amex, is Bradmar Petroleum Corp. of Oklahoma
City, Okla., an oil and gas company, which began trading as
an initial public offering on a "when issued" basis under
BPC.WI.
                                                                                                       

   On the OTC market, Easel Corp., a Woburn, Mass., maker of
software products for business graphics applications, began
trading as an initial public offering under EASL.
                                                                                                       

   Keene Corp., a New York maker of composite materials and
structures for aerospace, defense and commercial use, began
trading under KEEN. It recently was spun off from Bairnco
Corp.
                                                                                                       

   Separately, the Pacific Stock Exchange began trading
options on Betz Laboratories Inc., a Trevose, Pa., maker of
water treatment chemicals, and Century Telephone Enterprises
Inc., a Monroe, La., telephone holding company.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0126
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0126.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Mideast Crisis Dashes Hopes for Rebound
   In Corporate Profits in the Second Half
   ----
   By Ralph E. Winter
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
PETROLEUM (PET)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<LP>
   The likelihood of a second-half rebound in corporate
profits all but died with Iraq's invasion of Kuwait.
   Many U.S. manufacturers had expected 1990 profits to be
the mirror image of 1989 results, starting out slowly as
companies completed the inventory reduction begun in late
1989, but then improving noticeably in the second half. The
oil crisis makes it more likely that profits will continue to
slip until sometime in 1991.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Even optimistic economists who don't expect higher oil
prices to trigger a recession say after-tax corporate profits
will decline in 1990 for the second consecutive year. Richard
D. Rippe, senior vice president and chief economist with Dean
Witter Reynolds Inc., is looking for a 2% to 3% dip from
1989's $167.1 billion.
   Among the more bearish forecasters, A. Gary Shilling, New
York economic consultant, says the crisis is "the last nail
in the coffin of this expansion." He's forecasting a 12% to
14% profit drop for 1990. David Bostian, managing director
and chief economist for Jesup, Josephthal &amp; Co., believes "we
were in a recession before the invasion occurred." Piling on
the Middle East crisis will produce some "downright scary"
earnings reports because of "the downside leverage of high
corporate debt."
   Even before Saddam Hussein plunged across the border, the
profit outlook was less favorable than manufacturing
executives had expected during the spring. Demand was a
little weaker than anticipated, triggering discounting on
products ranging from tires to machine tools and preventing
producers of other items from raising prices to pass through
higher costs. And costs rose a little more than had been
budgeted.
   In addition, many multinational corporations are incurring
losses in Brazil. The combination drove profits in the second
quarter down 11% from a year earlier, according to a Wall
Street Journal compilation of reports from 639 major
companies.
   The Mideast crisis compounds those problems. Even if oil
prices level off in the low to mid $20s for the rest of this
year, the bill for oil and basic chemical feedstocks will
rise 25% or more at many factories. It will be hard to pass
that along, particularly if uncertainty created by the
invasion causes both consumers and companies to rein in their
spending a bit.
   Dow Chemical Co. provides a good illustration of the
profit problems. The Midland, Mich., chemicals and plastics
producer reported a 50% drop in second-quarter net, shocking
industry analysts who looked for a more moderate drop from
last year's unusually fat profits. Dow officials said
second-half earnings would be even weaker than the first
half. Anticipated price increases hadn't appeared, and prices
of some products, such as polyethylene, actually declined,
Dow says. Also, the construction, automotive and furniture
markets are weaker than expected.
   Rising oil prices worsen the outlook, Dow says, but it's
too early to estimate how seriously. Dow's plants use huge
amounts of energy, and oil is a basic feedstock for many of
its plastics and organic chemicals. The extent of the profit
drop will depend on Dow's success in passing through those
cost increases.
   Furthermore, there are few pluses for business in the
current crisis, other than for oil producers and oil-field
service concerns. And the oil companies already are under
political pressure to hold down prices; there's talk of
additional taxes to siphon off any windfall profits.
   The first impact of the crisis will be weaker sales
arising from increased uncertainty. Companies insist that
they're proceeding with capital spending programs, product
development and other long-term projects. Most will do that.
Some plant managers may place orders quickly, before the
authority to do so is revoked by skittish boards. But more
companies will move a little more slowly as they watch
Mideast developments.
   More important, they're likely to hold back on routine
replacements of trucks, machinery and office equipment, says
Stephen R. Hardis, vice chairman and chief financial and
administrative officer of Eaton Corp., Cleveland-based maker
of truck parts and electrical and electronic products.
Already companies such as American Steel &amp; Wire Corp.,
Cuyahoga Heights, Ohio, say they're watching inventories and
expenses a little more closely.
   Consumers, who already were dragging their feet on
purchases of cars, appliances and other major items, also are
likely to pause, at least briefly. Besides, a little more of
their money is going abroad as they pay higher prices for
gasoline and heating oil.
   And if the crisis drags on until Christmas, the year's
biggest shopping season could suffer. "And there are a lot of
shaky retailers out there," adds Gary E. Morin, vice
president for finance and chief financial officer of Huffy
Corp., the nation's largest bicycle maker. "If they don't
have a good Christmas, manufacturers will be writing off a
lot of receivables" as the retailers fold.
   As Mr. Bostian suggests, the profit impact of the weaker
sales will be amplified by high corporate interest expense
and other fixed costs.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0125
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0125.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Deloitte &amp; Touche Declines to Continue
   As Auditor of Troubled First Executive
   ----
   By Frederick Rose
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   FEXC
</CO>
<IN>
INSURANCE (INS)
ACCOUNTING (ACC)
</IN>
<LP>
   LOS ANGELES -- First Executive Corp., the wounded
insurance holding company, said its longtime auditor,
Deloitte &amp; Touche, has declined to continue in that capacity.
   In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission,
the company said it hasn't had any disagreements with
Deloitte &amp; Touche in the past 2 1/2 years, and the reason for
the firm's decision to remove itself remains unclear.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   First Executive, the parent of Executive Life Insurance
Co., a California concern, and Executive Life Insurance Co.
of New York, has been the subject of widespread news coverage
since earlier this year, when it reported an $859 million
write-down of its junk-bond portfolio. The unexpected
write-down, which applied as of Dec. 31, 1989, brought the
company's net loss for last year to $775.6 million, or $9.67
a share.
   First Executive noted in its filing that, in June, it
hired William L. Sanders as chief financial officer,
treasurer and a corporate vice president. Mr. Sanders had
been the Deloitte &amp; Touche partner in charge of First
Executive's audit since 1986.
   Subsequent to hiring Mr. Sanders, First Executive said, it
recruited a number of other Deloitte &amp; Touche employees who
also had worked on its audit. First Executive said it
employed the former members of the group that audited it "in
order to expand its accounting staff."
   The company said that, because of the resulting changes at
Deloitte &amp; Touche, it had begun considering a possible change
of accountants but hadn't reached any decision when Deloitte
&amp; Touche apparently beat it to the punch and resigned.
However, the filing doesn't explicitly connect Deloitte &amp;
Touche's decision to resign with First Executive's unusual
decision to employ what appears to have been a substantial
portion of its outside auditor's team.
   First Executive's disclosure was made in an 8-K
extraordinary events filing with the SEC. The filing, dated
July 30, was signed by a corporate officer Aug. 2 and
received by the commission the next day.
   For its part, Deloitte &amp; Touche, in an attached
one-sentence letter, said it concurred with First Executive's
"comments" in the 8-K filing but didn't provide further
disclosure. Robert Garland, managing partner of Deloitte &amp;
Touche's Los Angeles office, declined to elaborate.
   Fred Carr, chairman and chief executive officer of First
Executive, said the company hasn't selected a successor to
Deloitte &amp; Touche. Before a merger that created Deloitte &amp;
Touche, a predecessor firm, Touche Ross &amp; Co., had audited
First Executive. "They are an excellent firm, and we have
enjoyed an excellent relationship with them," Mr. Carr said,
adding that he had discussed Deloitte &amp; Touche's decision to
withdraw as auditor at First Executive's July 30 annual
meeting.
   Mr. Carr said he wasn't sure how many members of Deloitte
&amp; Touche's former audit team had been recruited by First
Executive. "I'm guessing that it's seven or eight," he said.
   Deloitte &amp; Touche is a defendant with First Executive in
shareholder suits focusing, among other things, on alleged
inadequate disclosure of the company's troubled financial
condition.
   Over the years, the accounting firm has issued a series of
unqualified audit opinions on First Executive. However, in
its March 29, 1990 report on the 1989 financial statements,
Deloitte &amp; Touche included extensive cautionary explanations.
Among other things, it said that the estimated market value
of First Executive's $8 billion-plus junk-bond holdings was
based on the company's and certain brokers' subjective
determinations because the market for some of the securities
was either too volatile or too illiquid to get a clear
reading.
   However, the auditor's letter didn't flag or explain the
$859 million write-down or note that, even after the
write-down, the company's market value of the bond portfolio
remained about $1 billion below the $13.26 billion value at
which it is recorded on First Executive's books. Deloitte &amp;
Touche did note, however, that if troubled market conditions
continue, the company could suffer greater portfolio losses
than then estimated.
   First Executive is the subject of a number of regulatory
inquiries, among them a formal SEC investigation begun in
March that is looking into the company's financial
statements, including the bond-portfolio write-down.
   As its financial woes deepened this year, including more
than $1.33 billion paid in the first quarter to holders
cashing in policies, First Executive began pointing to
studies by consulting actuaries Milliman &amp; Robertson, which
it said proved that its California-based Executive Life
Insurance unit was financially sound and able to withstand a
variety of hypothetical adversities.
   But, while reporting the good news, First Executive thus
far has refused to make the reports themselves public.
   Friday, New York's state appeals court delayed ruling on
an appeal by First Executive to forestall disclosure of the
reports to Joseph Belth, publisher of "Insurance Forum," and
a frequent critic of First Executive. A lower court had
ordered the New York State Department of Insurance, which has
copies of the reports, to make them public under state
freedom of information statutes.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0124
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0124.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   GM Planning
   To Raise Prices
   On 1991 Models
   ----
   By Joseph B. White and Krystal Miller
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   GM LABOR
</CO>
<IN>
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
</IN>
<LP>
   DETROIT -- General Motors Corp. signaled that it will
raise prices broadly on most of its 1991 cars and trucks, and
continue to use discount deals as the remedy should consumers
balk.
   A GM spokesman described the preliminary price increases
for models officially introduced this fall as "moderate." But
he didn't provide details on how much base prices of specific
1991 models will rise over prices of models introduced a year
ago. The spokesman said GM plans to reduce the prices on
certain packages of optional equipment, reviving a
discounting strategy GM largely abandoned last fall.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   GM's preliminary 1991 pricing strategy appears to follow
the pattern of the past two years. With few exceptions, GM is
raising the base prices of carryover models, partly to
reflect new standard equipment, and partly to offset the cost
of handing some of the price increase back to consumers in
the form of discounts.
   Ford Motor Co. has taken an approach similar to this in
its preliminary 1991 pricing. Chrysler Corp.'s strategy is
somewhat more complex. The No. 3 auto maker is cutting base
prices of certain 1991 car and truck models in an effort to
avoid further discounting or fight off stiffer competition.
To compensate, Chrysler is boosting prices aggressively on
some of its more popular vehicles, such as the newly
redesigned 1991 minivans. The major Japanese auto makers
haven't yet released their 1991 prices.
   GM mailed detailed 1991 price lists to dealers Friday. It
also issued a statement that said prices on 1991 models would
rise an average 2.3% from current prices of "comparably
equipped" 1990 models.
   But that figure doesn't reflect the actual increases in
base prices compared with a year ago, because it factors out
increases in 1991 base prices related to new standard
equipment that was optional in the 1990 model year. Moreover,
GM raised some 1990 model prices earlier this summer. And the
company isn't offering discounts on most 1991 models now
being delivered to dealers. That means these vehicles will
cost consumers hundreds and even thousands of dollars more
than remaining 1990 models.
   Separately, GM idled two more assembly plants in the wake
of a strike at a parts plant in Flint, Mich. The strike,
which began Wednesday, has now forced GM to shut factories in
Shreveport, La., Pontiac, Mich., and Moraine, Ohio, which
build compact sport utility vehicles. Some 6,900 workers at
the assembly plants have been laid off. More shutdowns are
expected this week unless the strike is resolved. The No. 1
auto maker also said a parts shortage unrelated to the Flint
walkout will force it to idle 2,900 workers at its car
assembly plant in Fairfax, Kan., for at least one week.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0123
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0123.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Board of Contributors:
   The Fed Must Not Accommodate Iraq
   ----
   By Martin Feldstein
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
</IN>
<GV>
FEDERAL RESERVE BOARD (FED)
</GV>
<LP>
   The rise in oil prices caused by the Iraqi invasion of
Kuwait will raise the general level of prices in the United
States and lower our real economic growth during the year
ahead. But if the Federal Reserve does its job well, the oil
price rise need not cause a recession or start an
inflationary spiral like that of the 1970s.
   Although there are already calls for the Fed to ease
policy enough to prevent any economic slowdown, that would be
a mistake. It would also be a mistake for the Fed to tighten
monetary policy enough to prevent any oil-induced rise in
next year's overall price index. The best strategy for the
Fed would be to stick to its current implicit target of a
rise in nominal GNP (i.e., total national output at current
prices) of about 6% even though that will mean some slowdown
in real activity and a somewhat faster rise in prices than
would have been anticipated before the Iraqi invasion.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   An unchanged nominal GNP target is more than just a
compromise between a more expansionary monetary policy aimed
at preventing any slowdown in real activity and a tighter
monetary policy designed to prevent any rise in inflation. An
explicit Fed promise to stick to a policy consistent with its
original nominal GNP projections would reassure financial
markets and the public that the current oil price rise would
not trigger an inflationary spiral and ultimate recession.
   Market expectations that the Fed will not shift its
nominal GNP goal are important. If companies believed instead
that the Federal Reserve will respond to the oil price hike
with an accommodating easy money strategy, as it did in the
1970s, they will try to get a jump on the upcoming inflation
and the overall price level will rise by more than the direct
effect of the oil price increase. But if companies believe
that the Fed will not accommodate such a price rise, the
overall price increase could be less than the direct effect.
   Before the oil price jump, a nominal GNP rise of 6% during
the next four quarters would probably have translated into an
inflation rate of about 4% and a rise in real GNP of about
2%. Any faster rise in total spending would be inconsistent
with bringing U.S. inflation down from its current
unsatisfactory level.
   And while the recent inflation rate of between 4% and 5%
may seem moderate in comparison to the much higher inflation
of the late 1970s and early 1980s, the current inflation rate
is substantially above that in Japan and in major European
countries and nearly twice as high as the U.S. sustained
between the end of the Korean War and the acceleration of the
Vietnam War. The Fed has been correct to insist on reducing
the rate of inflation.
   To lower the pace of inflation, the Fed has been gradually
slowing the rate of increase of nominal GNP by slowing the
expansion of monetary aggregates. In recent months, however,
the execution of this strategy of gradualism has been
frustrated by the reluctance of banks to lend in the current
regulatory and economic climate. Despite the Federal
Reserve's actions to lower the federal funds rate, the M2 and
M3 monetary aggregates have not increased since April. The
virtual standstill of the aggregates over the past six months
is inconsistent with a nominal GNP rise of 6% and could
contribute to a further slowdown this year.
   Unless there is reason to expect a sharp rise in velocity
in the future -- and I can see no such reason -- a more
expansionary monetary policy during the coming months would
have been appropriate in order to achieve 6% nominal GNP
growth. Sticking with that same 6% nominal GNP target after
the oil price rise may now require a slightly different path
for money than it would have if the level of oil prices had
remained unchanged. But the pace of monetary expansion should
still be increased enough in the coming months to bring the
aggregates back to the center of their target ranges, an
expansion that would lower short-term interest rates.
   What impact would such a 6% nominal GNP increase have on
real economic activity during the coming year? If 6% nominal
GNP growth would have implied a rather weak 2% rise in real
GNP prior to the jump in oil prices, will the shift to higher
inflation and lower real growth now mean a recession? I don't
think so.
   The extent of the increase in next year's inflation and
the corresponding slowdown of real growth within the overall
6% nominal GNP rise depends of course on the extent of the
jump in the oil price. Although no one can be certain about
the future level of oil prices, as of today the spot price is
$27 a barrel or about $7 a barrel above the $20 average
around which oil prices have fluctuated for the past two
years. Looking ahead, the prices of oil futures for the 12
months of 1991 now average about $24 a barrel. At the risk of
overestimating the decline in real GNP growth, let's assume
that the current $7 a barrel price rise will persist.
   There are two channels through which the higher oil price
will depress economic activity. First, an increase in the
price of imported oil is like a tax levied by the OPEC
producers on American consumers and businesses. Since the
U.S. imports about two billion barrels of oil a year, a $7 a
barrel price hike would reduce total real income by $14
billion.
   Most of this would translate into reduced consumer
spending. Although this would in principle be offset by
increased demand for our exports as OPEC countries spend
their added income, in practice much of that extra income
would be saved by the OPEC countries. The increase in overall
OPEC saving will lower world interest rates, but the
resulting rise in U.S. investment won't happen soon enough to
offset the fall in consumption in 1991. The net short-run
impact would be likely to be equivalent to a decline in
demand of $10 billion to $15 billion or between two-tenths
and three-tenths of 1% of GNP.
   The other short-run direct effect of an oil price rise is
to raise the overall price level in the U.S. This rise in the
price level would increase the public's demand for money. If
the Federal Reserve does not fully accommodate this increased
demand, short-term interest rates would rise and real
activity would be depressed. This is what will happen if the
Fed keeps the rise in nominal GNP unchanged. Over a two or
three year period, such a policy will reverse the initial
rise in the price level as the temporarily weaker economy
slows the rise in the prices of non-oil products.
   Interest rates would then subside and real economic
activity return to normal. But in the short run, the higher
overall price level would mean that the growth of nominal GNP
would involve more inflation and less real economic growth.
How much less? The impact of the higher oil price on the
overall GNP price level depends on the total volume of oil
produced in the U.S. (about 3 billion barrels a year) and not
on oil imports. A $7 a barrel price rise would directly
increase the dollar value of U.S. oil production by $21
billion a year or about four tenths of 1% of GNP. This
translates directly into a 0.4% rise in the overall price
level.
   Since the combination of higher oil prices and depressed
real activity would change other prices as well (the prices
of coal and gas are already up while the prices of the wide
range of goods for which demand will fall as overall activity
slows will decline), it's not possible to say with precision
how much the overall price level would change if the Fed
holds constant the increase in nominal GNP. But even if the
increases in coal and gas prices offset all of the other
price slowdowns, the effect would be an overall price rise of
only 0.4%. If total nominal GNP growth is unchanged, the
effect of that higher price level would be to cut the growth
of real GNP next year by four-tenths of 1%.
   These estimates of each of the two effects taken by itself
-- the OPEC tax that reduces real consumer spending and the
higher domestic price level that reduces the real GNP
component of a given nominal GNP -- are not additive. Because
the two effects interact with each other, their combined
impact is an average of the two effects calculated
separately.
   A precise estimate of the prospective change in real GNP
is, however, not possible. But my own judgment is that if the
Federal Reserve achieves a nominal GNP growth of 6% over the
next four quarters, the oil price rise is likely to reduce
real GNP growth in the coming year by only about one-half of
1%. Economic growth would drop to about 1.5% but a recession
would be avoided and price inflation, while rising
temporarily to 4.5%, would be kept under control.
   Although such a slow growth of real GNP would be
frustrating to everyone at a time when unemployment is rising
and profits are falling, it would be the best response to the
extra burden imposed on our economy by Iraq. Such a policy
would avoid the risk of repeating the inflationary explosion
of the 1970s.
   ---
   Mr. Feldstein, former chairman of the president's Council
of Economic Advisers, is a professor of economics at Harvard.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0122
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0122.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Iraq Can Make Case
   For Claim to Kuwait,
   But It's a Shaky One
   ---
   Two Nations Considered One
   Under Ottoman Empire,
   But British Split Them
   ----
   By Gerald F. Seib
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Iraq's claim to Kuwait, though summarily
rejected by the international community, has some shaky basis
in history.
   Iraq had asserted its right to control Kuwait even before
the Kuwaiti state won its independence from Britain in 1961.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Above all, that claim is based on the fact that, before
the British dominated the region, the Ottoman Empire had
declared that Kuwait was part of a province controlled from
the Iraqi city of Basra. Iraq argues that the lines of
control established in that Ottoman era should still apply,
not borders later worked out by the British.
   Iraq's claim is similar to those made over the years by
other Middle East states dissatisfied with international
borders largely drawn up by colonial powers decades ago. But
it isn't very solid by current international standards. The
al-Sabah family ousted by Iraq's invasion has ruled the area
around Kuwait City for 234 years. Even before aligning
themselves with the British, the family had refused to
acknowledge that it was subject to Ottoman control.
   Kuwait's leaders in 1899 signed an agreement giving the
British responsibility for their defense and foreign affairs,
and in 1913 the British concluded an agreement recognizing
the autonomy of the leader of Kuwait. Kuwait's borders were
established at a conference held by the British in 1923, and
the country was granted its independence from Britain in
1961.
   Iraqi leader Saddam Hussein "has a very uphill battle" to
make the case, says Christine Helms, a Middle East scholar
who has written a history of Iraq.
   Still, in Iraqi eyes its claim is buttressed by longtime
cultural and economic links between Kuwait and Iraq. Kuwaiti
sheiks, for instance, once owned large date plantations in
Iraq. And Iraq once provided nearly all of Kuwait's fresh
water, until the Kuwaitis built big plants to desalinate
Persian Gulf water, Ms. Helms says.
   And there's a more current dispute that underlies the
Iraqi move. An oil field known as the Rumaila field straddles
the Iraq-Kuwait border, and Iraq claims that Kuwait had been
drilling diagonally from its side of the border to tap
reserves from the field lying under Iraqi territory. U.S.
officials say there is reason to think the Iraqi claim may be
true.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0121
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0121.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   United Bankshares Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   UBSI
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   CHARLESTON, W.Va. -- United Bankshares Inc. said it
completed the merger of BankFirst Corp. of McLean, Va.
BankFirst Corp.'s subsidiary bank, Bank First, becomes a
subsidiary of United Bankshares. Bank First has $28 million
in assets.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0120
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0120.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Norway's Inflation Held at 3.6%
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<LP>
   OSLO -- Norway's inflation rate was 3.6% in July,
unchanged from June and down sharply from the July 1989 level
of 4.8%, according to official figures.
   The Norwegian Central Bureau of Statistics announced
Friday that July's Consumer Price Index was 231.2, a
fractional change from the 231 index reported in June. The
July 1989 figure was 223.2.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0119
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0119.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   Banks Throughout the Gulf Feel
   Effects of Asset Freeze on Iraq
   ----
   By Craig Forman
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
BANKS (BNK)
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<LP>
   LONDON -- The Western freeze on Iraqi and Kuwaiti finances
is having wider-than-foreseen fallout on financial
institutions throughout the Persian Gulf.
   Free-market exchange rates are slumping and interest rates
are soaring in countries throughout the tense gulf region,
including Bahrain, Oman, the United Arab Emirates and Saudi
Arabia. There are reports of runs on banks in Bahrain as
depositors seek to cash out local-currency holdings to buy
U.S. dollars.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Trading in major gulf currencies, including the Saudi
riyal, Bahraini dinar and United Arab Emirates dirham is
becoming increasingly difficult as banks and investors slash
positions to limit their losses if hostilities escalate.
London bankers say Kuwaiti dinars, if anyone will make a
market, have plunged to roughly half the official rate before
the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait; free-market rates from United
Arab Emirates and Bahraini currencies also have dropped by
15% or more.
   The financial pressure could intensify this week if
hostilities escalate in the Persian Gulf. Ultimately, Western
jitters over the Middle East financial institutions could
signal a fundamental realignment of the costs of financing
business in the region -- raising prices for credit as well
as prompting a re-rating of the risks of doing business
there. "Everyone is reassessing credit risks in the region in
a major way," says Robert Thomas, executive director at
Midland Bank PLC's Midland Montagu international finance unit
in London. Events since the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait "show
how suddenly everything can change."
   George Asseily, director of Schroder Asseily &amp; Co., a
London-based investment bank with Mideast interests, adds:
"There has been a major flight to quality" among Gulf
investors. Bankers report a movement of tens of millions of
dollars in private-banking holdings to Switzerland and other
European centers from gulf banks in recent days.
   Outside Iraq and Kuwait, the worst-affected Arab state
appears to be Bahrain, a small trading center poking into the
Persian Gulf. People there reported large crowds pressing to
get into banks prior to last Friday's weekly day off in the
Moslem country, and bankers expect the crowds to return this
week. Some businesses have stopped taking credit cards due to
uncertainties about being paid.
   In London, traders report that a Bahraini bank dumped a
$70 million portfolio of Eurobonds through Merrill Lynch &amp;
Co.'s European offices late last week in order to satisfy
dollar demand among local customers and to avoid a run on the
bank. Many customers reportedly turned around and repurchased
dollar instruments. A Merrill Lynch spokesman declined to
comment. European bankers say such midsized Bahraini banks as
Bahrain Middle East Bank are being buffeted by the upheaval;
at that bank's head office in Bahrain, an official said that
while many Bahraini commercial banks have experienced "panic"
demand for deposits, the bank is operating normally and local
monetary authorities are standing by with adequate support.
   Many international bankers in London say they are
continuing to deal with banking and individual customers
throughout the Persian Gulf. However, they are limiting their
exposure by shortening the time period for repayments and
also by seeking to hedge their exposures through
forward-currency or interest-rate swap agreements. However,
some major foreign-exchange trading rooms say they have
curtailed dealing with clients in the area until tensions
ease.
   For instance, Barclays Bank PLC said it has sharply curbed
trading activities in many currencies in the region,
including those from Jordan and Egypt, following Iraq's
invasion. Adds a foreign exchange dealer in the London
trading room of a major international bank: "People are
steering clear of institutions with anything Arab in the
name."
   Market movements have been striking. For example, some
international bankers report that interest rates in the Saudi
domestic market have surged in the past week. Such rates,
which have traded at 50 basis points, or hundredths of a
percentage point, above benchmark U.S. rates, have surged to
a full-percentage point margin or more above the U.S. rates.
   Some bankers point out that such asset-rich countries as
Saudi Arabia and United Arab Emirates have been inadvertently
caught in the crossfire. While the Saudi financial position
is particularly healthy, bankers are curbing total Mideast
exposures because the asset-clampdown means there is almost
nothing they can do to limit their frozen dealings with
Kuwait. "The international banking community was caught
flat-footed in Kuwait, and as a result they have overreacted
now," said one Mideast banker in London.
   Even some of the region's largest institutions are feeling
the effects. "Banks generally have taken a view toward
limiting their exposure {to the Mideast}. The financial
commmunity isn't happy with Mideast risk," said an official
at Arab Banking Corp., a major Mideast financial institution
based in Bahrain. "But we are comfortable with our liquidity
positions. We see this as temporary hiccup." Last Thursday,
Standard &amp; Poor's placed certain Arab Banking Corp.
short-term and long-term securities on its ratings-watch list
with negative implications. The credit-rating agency said the
substantial minority positions in the bank held by Kuwait's
Ministry of Finance and Libya's Central Bank, both of which
are currently targets of U.S. economic sanctions, makes the
institution subject to future blocking orders.
   Bankers say Mideast financial institutions' liquidation of
certain Western assets -- particularly Euromarket instruments
-- to meet local demand for hard currency is pushing prices
lower. Letters of credit -- a linchpin of international
commerce -- have become more difficult to obtain.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0118
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0118.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   First Federal Bancorp
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B3
</SO>
<CO>
   FFS
</CO>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   PONTIAC, Mich. -- First Federal Bancorp said a temporary
restraining order in effect against the federal Office of
Thrift Supervision was indefinitely extended by the
Cincinnatti Court of Appeals.
   The restraining order was to have ended Friday. It will
give First Federal officials time to appeal a federal
district judge's denial for a preliminary injunction that
will prevent federal regulators from appointing a conservator
or receiver for a First Federal subsidiary.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0117
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0117.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   MCA Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   WNEWS MCA
</CO>
<LP>
   MCA Inc. (Universal City, Calif.) -- Richard Palmese, 42
years old, was appointed president of this entertainment
company's MCA Records division. Mr. Palmese, who joined the
company in 1983 and was most recently executive vice
president and general manager of the record division,
succeeds Al Teller, 45, who last September became chairman of
MCA's music entertainment group.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0116
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0116.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   What's News --
   World-Wide
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<LP>
   IRAQ SAID it would withdraw from Kuwait if Israel pulls
out of the West Bank.
   The "initiative" offered by Iraq's Hussein, which was
designed to rally Arabs, also demanded a Syrian pullback from
Lebanon. The U.S. and Israel rejected the conditions. Baker,
noting that Kuwait's ousted government asked the U.S. to
enforce a U.N. trade embargo, said "interdiction" of Iraqi
shipments would get under way immediately. Three thousand
Egyptian soldiers arrived in Saudi Arabia, the vanguard of a
10,000-member Arab force including Syria and Morocco.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Britain said one of its citizens was shot Saturday by an
Iraqi soldier in Kuwait, while Baghdad gave conflicting
reports on the status of foreigners in Iraq and Kuwait. In
Saudi Arabia, an American airman died in an accident.
   ---
   Washington's Barry urged federal prosecutors over the
weekend not to retry him on drug and perjury charges. On
Friday, a jury convicted the mayor on one misdemeanor
cocaine-possession charge, acquitted him of another
misdemeanor and deadlocked on 12 counts. Barry has said he
won't seek re-election for mayor.
   ---
   A former Thornburgh aide was indicted Friday on
cocaine-related charges. The indictment was returned by a
grand jury in Harrisburg, Pa., against Henry Barr, who quit
his Justice Department post in May 1989. Barr had coordinated
criminal investigations for Thornburgh, including those
involving drugs.
   ---
   The FDA approved new clinical trials for a drug that some
say can prolong the lives of AIDS patients and people
infected with the AIDS virus, officials said Saturday. An FDA
spokesman said a double-blind study will begin next month
using the anti-viral compound Ampligen, with about 135
patients in as many as eight cities participating.
   ---
   At least 20,000 gallons of oil spilled into the Houston
Ship Channel as a barge buckled, just two days after the
Coast Guard completed a two-week cleanup of a 700,000-gallon
spill resulting from a tanker-barge collision. The ship
channel remained open, but Texas officials warned ships to
slow down because of the new spill.
   ---
   Lightning fires burned more than 200,000 acres of
California forest in the past week, and fire officials said
the situation could get get "much, much worse" because of a
lengthy drought. In Yosemite National Park, off limits to
tourists since Friday, two fires burned more than 15,000
acres.
   ---
   A federal judge in Los Angeles ruled Friday that a Mexican
doctor accused in the torture-slaying of U.S. undercover drug
agent Camarena must be returned home because federal agents
illegally ordered the doctor's kidnapping. Dr. Humberto
Alvarez Machain's abduction soured diplomatic relations
between the U.S. and Mexico.
   ---
   Colombian police killed a key member of the Medellin
cocaine cartel Saturday in a gun battle in one of Medellin's
exclusive neighborhoods. Police officials said the dead man,
Gustavo de Jesus Gaviria, was responsible for coordinating
terrorist bombings and assassinations in Colombia and
shipments of cocaine to the U.S. and Europe.
   ---
   Pakistan's new government began rounding up supporters of
ousted Prime Minister Bhutto as a cabinet minister
acknowledged that the caretaker rulers faced a crisis of
confidence. Bhutto was fired last week by President Ishaq
Khan, who accused her of corruption and abuse of power.
   ---
   Zaire's President Mobutu rules his country by violently
suppressing the opposition, despite his promises of political
reform, the New York-based Lawyers Committee for Human Rights
charged. The committee said Mobutu's security forces have
maintained control through a policy of political killings,
torture, arbitrary arrests and harassment.
   ---
   Suspected Tamil rebels killed at least 144 Moslems in six
villages in eastern Sri Lanka over the weekend, according to
military sources and Moslem leaders. In retaliation, Moslems
reportedly attacked a Tamil refugee camp and slaughtered 37
Tamils.
   ---
   Liberia's President Doe plans to stay in office for at
least a year after a West African peacekeeping force
intervenes in the nation's civil war, an official said. The
five-nation group is due to arrive within days.
   ---
   Wayne Grady won the PGA Championship golf title at Shoal
Creek Country Club, Birmingham, Ala., by three strokes.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0115
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0115.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   LAB NOTES
   ----
   By Jerry E. Bishop
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<IN>
MEDICAL SUPPLIES (MDS)
MEDICAL AND BIOTECHNOLOGY (MTC)
RECREATION, ENTERTAINMENT, TOYS, MOVIES, PHOTOGRAPHY, SPORTS (REC)
</IN>
<LP>
   Polymer Gel Can Shrink
   And Swell Like a Muscle
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   ARTIFICIAL muscles are among the potential uses of
light-sensitive gels developed by a Massachusetts Institute
of Technology scientist.
   Toyoichi Tanaka, professor of physics, is working with
Jell-O-like polymers that can be made to shrink and swell
under various conditions. Earlier this year, Mr. Tanaka and
his colleagues described a polymer gel that swelled up when
it was struck by ultraviolet light and then collapsed when it
was plunged into the dark. The reaction, however, was too
slow to be useful.
   Now, the physicist and Atsushi Suzuki, a visiting
colleague from Yokohama National University in Japan, report
a new polymer gel that rapidly responds to visible light. The
secret was incorporating chlorophyll, the molecule that
plants use to convert sunlight to chemical energy.
   The new gel collapses to less than half its original
volume in a few thousandths of a second wherever a beam of
visible light strikes it. When the light is turned off, the
shrunken portion of the gel almost instantly expands to its
original volume, according the two scientists' report in a
recent issue of the journal Nature. In tiny cylinders of the
gel, each about the diameter of a muscle fiber, the degree of
shrinkage could be controlled by varying the intensity of the
light beam, the scientists report.
   Gels that change size in response to an electric current
have been proposed for making artificial sphincter muscles
for the bladders of paralyzed and incontinent people. But Mr.
Tanaka suggests that gels that respond to light beams,
delivered perhaps by optical fibers, might be safer for
implanting in the body.
   Other possible uses include light-controlled switches and
a solar engine in which cylinders of the gel shrink and
expand as they rotate in and out of the sunlight. Mr. Tanaka
is patenting the new gels and hints that he already has a
possible licensee lined up.

   Father Gets Back Marrow
   That He Donated to Son
                                                                                                       

   CANCER specialists in London report a medical variation of
the Golden Rule.
   Back in 1980, doctors at the Royal Marsden Hospital in
Surrey, England, cured a 12-year-old boy of leukemia by
destroying his cancer-ridden bone marrow with radiation. Then
they gave the boy a transplant of bone marrow donated by his
father. Because the father's marrow didn't exactly match the
son's, the boy suffered repeated medical problems in the
months afterward. Finally, the father's donated marrow
"took," the boy recovered, returned to school and graduated,
the British doctors report in the Lancet.
   In late 1987, the 45-year-old father came down with
another type of leukemia that, by a rare coincidence, also
was treatable by radiation and bone marrow transplant. Tests
of the son showed that contrary to scientists' predictions,
the boy's native marrow hadn't revived. Instead, the father's
transplanted marrow continued to thrive. In April 1988, the
doctors took some of the father's marrow from the son and
retransplanted it to the father. A year later, the father was
free of all signs of leukemia.
                                                                                                       

   `Smart Glass' Could Trim
   Bulk of Camera Lenses
                                                                                                       

   SCIENTISTS at a small limited partnership in Arizona claim
they've developed "smart glass" for new kinds of eyeglasses,
camera lenses and other optical devices.
   Isotec in Tucson says it has discovered a way to make a
single glass lens that will bend light by several different
angles, a "gradient refractive index" (GRIN) lens. Most glass
lenses refract light by only a single angle determined by the
curvature of the lens.
   Currently, to bend light by different angles requires
lining up several lenses. A standard wide-angle camera lens,
for example, might require six successive lenses to take
light from angles ranging from the far left to the far right
and to focus it on film.
   In one of Isotec's configurations, the center sections of
the lens bend light at different angles from the outer
sections. This makes possible a wide-angle camera lens
consisting of only one or two GRIN lenses, says Leslie
Danziger, Isotec's chief executive officer. For the same
reason, GRIN binoculars could be more compact than ordinary
ones.
   In communications, a GRIN lens could be used to merge or
"multiplex" several message-carrying light beams into a
single beam for long-distance transmission via a single
optical fiber. The beam could then be "demultiplexed" by a
GRIN lens at the receiving end, a trick that until now has
been used only in electronic communications.
   Isotec says the university and company scientists it has
funded can fuse glasses with different refractive indexes --
light-bending properties -- into a single lens of almost any
desired size. Isotec wants to license the technology to other
companies, Ms. Danziger says.
                                                                                                       

   Odds and Ends
                                                                                                       

   BIOMECHANICS experts at the University of Cincinnati
confirm that waiters who hold a tray of food high in the air
are using the least stressful position for carrying the tray.
. . . Home insulation impregnated with a new cockroach
repellent invented by U.S. Agriculture Department researchers
will be tested in some roach-infested homes in Florida. . . .
Instead of preventing swelling of the gums and jaw after
dental surgery, as expected, aspirin increases swelling,
according to tests at the University of Medicine &amp; Dentistry
of New Jersey. . . . Treadmill tests of the black racer snake
at the University of California, Irvine, show legless
creatures use as much energy to travel as legged animals of
the same weight.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0114
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0114.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Washington National Corp.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   WNT
</CO>
<IN>
BUYBACKS, REDEMPTIONS, SWAP OFFERS (BBK)
</IN>
<LP>
   EVANSTON, Ill. -- Washington National Corp. said it
approved the additional buy-back of 750,000 shares of common
stock.
   The company said it approved the purchases because its
board believes its stock is undervalued at recent price
levels. In New York Stock Exchange trading Friday, the stock
closed at 18.875, up 50 cents.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   About 300,000 shares remain under a prior buy-back program
started in 1988.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0113
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0113.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Spain's Consumer Price Index
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<LP>
   MADRID -- Spain's consumer price index rose 1.3% in July
from June, the country's National Statistics Institute said
Friday.
   The institute said that the increase brings Spain's
year-on-year inflation rate to 6.2%, down from 6.5% in June.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Prices in July excluding volatile food prices edged up
0.4% from June.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0112
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0112.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   LEISURE &amp; ARTS -- Bookshelf:
   A Former Prosecutor Bears Witness
   ----
   By Andrew Blum
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A8
</SO>
<LP>
   Trying to dissect the criminal-justice system -- and what
ails it -- is a favorite pastime of politicians, the public
and Hollywood. Now, a former assistant district attorney has
written a book on wielding the hammer and feather of justice.
   The setting could be anywhere, but here it is the
Manhattan DA office of Robert Morgenthau, where David
Heilbroner spent three years learning how to indict the
proverbial ham sandwich. "Rough Justice: Days and Nights of a
Young D.A." (Pantheon, 280 pages, $19.95) is Mr. Heilbroner's
rambling, but always colorful description of his adventures
with a legal system he finds in deep need of reform.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Like all rookies, Mr. Heilbroner's training started with a
course on jury selection. How to choose? Mr. Heilbroner got
his instructions from one of the office's bureau chiefs, Tom
McGillicuddy, who stressed: "No artists or musicians --
they're too spacey and can't remember complex fact patterns."
("I thought what about a Rachmaninoff piano concerto?")
   "Writers are okay, but they tend to be too liberal and
look for the defendant's motivation. . . . No doormen. They
always acquit. Janitors can be okay, but security guards will
give you trouble," continued Mr. McGillicuddy. Included in
his generalizations, which the author notes "poured forth
like a series of intentional faux pas," were that Irish were
bad jurors, blacks okay, Hispanics so-so. Mr. Heilbroner also
says rookies were told "never to ask jurors after a trial how
they had reached their verdict. Their answers would be too
disturbingly unrelated to the facts."
   Then how, one wonders, did Mr. McGillicuddy devise his
theories? Still, perhaps because of the cynicism and cliches,
the book seems palpably real. So are the nonchalant
descriptions of violence and the weird legalese -- the
subculture of terminology dominating communications in a
prosecutor's office.
   Cases start out, Mr. Heilbroner writes, in ECAB, or Early
Case Assessment Bureau, the first level of examining
complaints in the courthouse known on TV as "Night Court."
While that sitcom has almost nonstop humor, the real life of
an ADA is anything but a lot of laughs. ECAB is a place where
no one is trusted -- even phones and desks are bolted down.
Conversations between a cop and an ADA, Mr. Heilbroner
writes, go like this: "How many knife wounds did the victim
receive?" Answer: "At least three to the right arm and maybe
a couple to her side. There was so much blood it was hard to
tell."
   "Do you think she might go out of the picture?" "Nah. They
just stitched her up in the ER and I gave her a ride home."
   The book suggests that being a prosecutor is often like
trying to be King Solomon, the ayatollah and the boy with his
finger in the dike all rolled into one. Though often
prosecuting the obscure, Mr. Heilbroner had 15 minutes of
fame while investigating the hospital death of Andy Warhol
and the theft of two fur coats belonging to Barbara Bush when
she was Second Lady. They were stolen from a refurbisher's
storage by an employee who then sold them for $200 each to
buy, oh irony, a night's worth of crack.
   Beyond that it was plain folks and accompanying case files
that make Greek look easy. Take this example of DA shorthand:
"On for arr. f &amp; s vdf and ind. Offer: c w/3-6. f &amp; s pfs."
(Translation: The case is set for arraignment. File with the
court and serve on defense counsel a copy of your voluntary
disclosure form and a copy of the indictment. We will reduce
the charge to a Class C felony -- 3 to 6 years minimum -- if
the defendant will plead guilty. Because the defendant has a
prior felony conviction, file a predicate felony statement
with the court.)
   The cast of characters in this legal madness, including a
criminal named Vanity Valdez and a victim named Andrew
Straight, is endless: rapists, murderers, shoplifters, con
men, fake street vendors, drug runners, prostitutes and so
forth -- three shifts a day. Some of the obscure crimes Mr.
Heilbroner became well-versed in were jostling and clipping a
dog's ears without anesthetic.
   Not surprisingly, Mr. Heilbroner's proposals for reform
include abolishing the grand-jury system and dismissing
marginal misdemeanors. On top of that, he says legalizing
prostitution and marijuana, though politically unpopular,
would "help eliminate thousands more petty cases each year,
cases that neither judges nor prosecutors take seriously."
   Life as an ADA took its toll, writes Mr. Heilbroner, as he
describes a darkly funny scene that could only involve a
lawyer. Toward the end of his prosecutorial stint, he began
cross-examining a beggar on the street who asked for money.
(Who are you, why do you want the money, etc.) At this point,
the author knew it was time for a change, and traded in his
sword of justice for a pen to write what is a good first
book. As for the beggar, he's probably still wondering whom
he tangled with. They don't call it "Rough Justice" for
nothing.
   ---
   Mr. Blum is a reporter for the National Law Journal.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0111
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0111.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Manager's Journal:
   LA County Jail -- The No-Frills Business School
   ----
   By Benjamin J. Stein
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<LP>
   Prison, as Richard Nixon has observed, has proved to be
fertile ground for writers and social observers in this
century. Idealists and visionaries like Mahatma Gandhi and
Martin Luther King Jr., and lunatics like Adolf Hitler,
spawned powerful books and articles about their movements
from behind bars. Now, from that center of the new and the
relevant, Los Angeles, come some poignant thoughts about
management and organization in modern corporations, also
germinated in jail.
   The source of this data is a man I will call Donald. He
was a student of mine some years ago at a glittering
university overlooking the ocean in Malibu. Donald was an
intelligent and articulate guy, but he was also an
incorrigible (I thought) wise guy, troublemaker and arguer.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   I had heard, off and on, that the same traits had dogged
him when he had gone to work for a very major corporation
here in Los Angeles. Promotion had been slow, and he had been
in constant jeopardy of being dismissed -- always because of
his bad attitude.
   When he pulled up behind me at a gas station in Malibu a
few days ago in a gleaming sports car, looking like a vastly
more confident, far smoother, far easier to talk to -- far,
far better dressed -- guy than I had known, I was surprised.
He looked, as one might say, like a successful version of his
old self.
   He said that he had, in fact, been doing incomparably
better at his work, had been promoted, was told what an asset
he was, and was on the fast track to plutocracy. Over veggie
burgers at an outdoor restaurant, he told me what had
happened.
   It all began, he said, when he had been sentenced to 60
days in LA County Jail for drunken driving while on
probation. It was, he said, a kind of education he had never
expected, but had badly needed.
   From the first moment that he had been handcuffed to a
hardened convict and attached by leg irons to five others --
all of whom were terrifying -- Donald had realized that he
had better learn the rules of prison life fast, or he was
going to wind up either dead or with some truly horrible
stories to tell for the rest of his life. "There are rules of
how to get by," he said, "and if you follow them, you do."
   Rule One, he said, ". . . is that no matter what kind of
crap is being dished out by the cops and the guards, you
absolutely have to put up with it. You can't say one word
back or you get hit so hard you can't believe it, and you
can't do a thing about it. That's rule one: Be humble and
don't talk back to those who have power over you.
   "Rule Two is that you can't take any crap at all, not any,
from anyone on your level. You can't let yourself be pushed
around at all, not even a little bit, by the other prisoners.
If they ask you for a cigarette, you tell them to go ----
themselves. If they ask you for money, you tell them you'd
rather kill them than give them a cent. You can be friendly,
but don't ever back down from anything, and even if the guy
is 10 times your size, you let him know you'll put up a fight
and he'll at least have some scars on him. Respect is
everything in jail, and if you don't have the guts to fight,
take it until you do (while I was in jail, I told people I
was there for whacking my old lady, just so they wouldn't
think I was another drunk-driving wimp).
   "Third, beware of anyone who seems to be doing you a favor
that's too good to be true. The first night I was there, a
little guy offered me his bed -- and there weren't anywhere
near enough beds to go around -- for five bucks. I paid him,
and 10 minutes later, this huge Chinese guy comes by and says
it's his bed and he's going to kill me. We swore at each
other for a while, so I at least looked tough, and then I
went and got my money back from the little guy. Guys who
(make offers) too good to be true are nothing but trouble, at
least in jail.
   "Fourth, stay out of other people's fights. You don't need
to speak up for someone who's being hassled unless you're
part of his group. The guy who started teaching me about this
told me at first I should just go off into a corner and not
talk to anyone. He was totally right -- totally. And it saved
me a lot of trouble.
   "Fifth, hook up with a larger group who can protect you.
Don't ever be alone in jail. In LA County (jail) there were
mostly blacks and Hispanics, and since I'm not black and I
speak Spanish, I got with the Mexicans. That way I wasn't
just one lone guy who they could kill in the shower for
laughs.
   "Sixth, have a goal, and pay attention to it. My goal was
to get out of there alive, in one piece, in good health, and
without any horror stories to tell my friends. I did it, but
it meant giving up being a wise ass; no more arguing for the
fun of it, no more disrupting everybody else just to be the
center of attention. Just staying alive. That was my goal.
   "The point is that when I got out, one month early for
good behavior, and went back to work -- they thought I was in
Germany on vacation -- I just reflexively started to do the
same things I had done in County.
   "They worked even better there. Being humble to my bosses,
not taking any guff at all from the people on my same level,
not getting into other people's fights, making myself part of
a group that could protect me, staying away from people who
offered me unreal favors, paying attention to my goal (which
was to get promoted), not showing off -- all that works
incredibly well in a large white-collar organization.
   "Prison is the most unforgiving, rigorous large
competitive organization. It's the essence of human
relationships in groups without any of the politeness or the
etiquette. It's what business school should teach you about
what competing is really like -- boot camp, in a way, for
other more compromising situations. It sure worked for me,"
Donald said.
   "Anyway, now that you know," he added, "don't feel you
have to try it."
   (Thanks, I won't.)
   ---
   Mr. Stein is a lawyer, writer, actor and economist living
in Malibu.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0110
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0110.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Mideast Crisis Spurs
   Largest U.S. Airlift
   Since Vietnam War
   ---
   Effort Uses 5,000 Reservists,
   Long-Range Cargo Fleet;
   U.S. Seeks Charter Planes
   ----
   By Andy Pasztor
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<GV>
DEFENSE DEPARTMENT (DEF)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- While the Army and Navy so far are relying
almost exclusively on active-duty personnel to respond to the
crisis in the Middle East, about 5,000 Air Force reservists
have an indispensable role in shipping troops and weapons to
the region.
   The effort is the largest U.S. airlift since the Vietnam
War era, and the Military Airlift Command is using nearly its
entire fleet of more than 300 long-range cargo planes.
Reservists are providing crews for about 60% of all supply
flights, according to Pentagon officials.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   As the use of the full fleet suggests, there is a shortage
of cargo planes and ship capacity that is hampering efforts
to shore up U.S. firepower quickly in the fast-changing
crisis in Saudi Arabia. It will take two or three more weeks
to put in place what Pentagon officials describe as the
"minimum deterrent force" of more than 40,000 fully equipped
ground troops, and keeping them properly supplied will strain
U.S. resources.
   The Defense Department also is looking to charter planes
from U.S. airlines, and as many as eight fast, specially
built transport ships with civilian crews also are being
readied by the Navy to carry armored divisions to the Middle
East.
   Most commercial carriers are likely to have few planes to
spare at the height of the summer tourist season, however,
and the Pentagon has stopped short of formally invoking a law
under which airlines would have to provide planes to form a
so-called Civil Reserve Air Fleet.
   The Airlift Command's reserve officers, many of whom are
commercial pilots and routinely fly military cargo planes
once a month, are now volunteering for longer and more
frequent missions during periods when they aren't working.
Reservists also are helping to provide maintenance for giant
C-5A and C-141 cargo planes, which take 17 hours or longer to
fly from the U.S. to the Middle East.
   Many of the reservists now strapped into cockpits of cargo
planes also helped transport troops during the U.S. invasion
of Panama last year.
   So far, none of the pilots have had to give up their
civilian jobs, as they haven't been called to active duty.
   "It's really difficult to say how long we can sustain this
level of effort," said Lt. Col. Robert Duignan, deputy
commander for operations for a wing of C-141s manned by
reservists and based at Andrews Air Force Base in
Washington's Maryland suburbs. "We've got an outstanding
response" from reserve officers, he said in an interview over
the weekend, and "everyone in the unit will have the
opportunity to get involved."
   A much smaller contingent of National Guard troops from as
many as 20 states has been placed on active duty, military
officials said over the weekend, including units that provide
aerial refueling, medical support and other non-combat
assistance. At this point, fewer than 1,500 reservists are
believed to be in this category, but Pentagon spokesmen have
declined to confirm most details of troop movements.
   Overall, Army and Navy brass believe they can sustain the
first phase of Operation "Desert Shield" -- calling for
movement of the equivalent of two battle-ready divisions,
some 300 aircraft and about 40 U.S. ships -- without calling
up significant additional reserves. Army officials, for
instance, said that so far they haven't been forced to adjust
nationwide recruitment goals, alter preliminary plans to
withdraw some 50,000 troops from Europe next year or
otherwise change deployment plans involving the rest of the
world.
   But if the U.S. commitment jumps to 100,000 or 150,000
combat troops in the next few months, as some Pentagon
officials predict may be necessary to counter Iraqi
aggression, Pentagon officials said they almost certainly
will have to rely more heavily on reserves and alter their
long-range plans.
   The shortage in capacity highlights disagreements between
Congress and the Pentagon over the future role and shape of
America's 1.1 million-strong reserve forces -- and how deeply
they should be cut in the wake of improved U.S.-Soviet
relations.
   Just a few weeks ago, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney was
urging Congress to approve a cut of nearly 15% in reserve
personnel by the mid-1990s, as part of the effort to bring
military spending in line with deficit-reduction targets.
Both the Senate and the House Armed Services Committee
refused to lock in such hefty cuts.
   Now that the Middle East turmoil has erupted, legislative
efforts to beef up reserve forces -- in terms of equipment as
well as personnel -- are likely to gain support when
lawmakers return from their August recess.
   Appearing on NBC's "Meet The Press" yesterday, Mr. Cheney
emphasized the long-term problem of inserting and then
supplying a large force in the Middle East. "I wouldn't want
to put an upper limit" on the U.S. commitment, he said. But
"no one should assume {it will} be easy, or is going to be
wrapped up very quickly . . . without a significant U.S.
effort."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0109
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0109.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Your Money Matters:
   Natural Gas Limited Partnerships
   May Be Way to Play Oil Shock
   ----
   By Jill Bettner
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C1
</SO>
<CO>
   TAXES
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
</IN>
<LP>
   The best energy-investment bet right now may not be oil,
but natural gas.
   And limited partnerships may be one of the best ways to
play it -- at least for sophisticated investors who
understand and can tolerate the risks involved.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Whatever happens in the Middle East, "the case for natural
gas in this country is exponentially stronger than it is for
oil over the next 10 years," says John Olson, an energy
analyst at First Boston Corp. in Houston.
   Cheap and plentiful in the U.S., natural gas at $1.30 per
thousand cubic feet is an alternative fuel bargain that was
enjoying growing industrial demand even before Iraqi troops
stormed into Kuwait. The crisis is expected to boost demand
further, as utilities and other big energy users scramble to
cut their dependence on imported oil.
   The argument for limited partnerships is that they are
direct investments that allow income to flow to the investors
without being taxed at the company level, as is the case with
ordinary corporations. Some natural gas partnerships also
pass through attractive tax benefits. And because
partnerships are outside the stock market, they are less
susceptible to day-to-day swings in investor sentiment than
are the shares of gas producers or mutual funds that buy
them.
   But there are also risks.
   Partnerships as a way of investing in nearly anything have
had their image tarnished because of their high fees and
generally poor past performance. At least 20% of the nearly
$90 billion of partnerships marketed publicly during the
syndication boom of the 1980s are now troubled. While most of
those problems are in real estate partnerships, thousands of
oil and gas investors were stung badly in energy partnerships
syndicated after the last oil crisis in the late 1970s.
   Partnerships are also long-term investments. People
thinking about investing in them should be willing to commit
their money for seven to 10 years, when the partnership is
dissolved and the proceeds are distributed to the limited
partners.
   Most "energy partnerships" are primarily natural-gas
investments, since gas reserves are both more abundant and
easier to develop than new oil supplies. There are two basic
kinds of energy partnerships.
   So-called "income partnerships" buy only proven reserves,
not speculative properties. These generally target
distributions to investors of as much as 18% or 20% a year.
Because the reserves backing those distributions are
continually being depleted, however, part of that money is a
return of investors' own capital. For the same reason,
distributions are highest in the early years of these
partnerships.
   "You'd be getting into income funds because you're
speculating that oil and gas prices will go up," says William
G. Brennan, a tax partner in the Washington office of
accountants Ernst &amp; Young. In addition, investors get to take
a deduction on their income taxes for their portion of the
partnership's "cost-depletion allowance," he notes. "I've
seen partnerships where 60% to 70% of the cash flow in the
first year was tax-free because of depletion," Mr. Brennan
says.
   The other basic type of energy partnership is the
"drilling partnership." These are mostly "development"
partnerships, which are involved in drilling wells in or near
proven fields. In addition to the depletion allowance,
investors who are willing to assume the special risk of
becoming "general partners" typically get to write off about
80% of their investment against any other income the first
year.
   "The chief advantage is the tax deduction," says Fuhrman
Nettles, a vice president at Robert A. Stanger &amp; Co., a
Shrewsbury, N.J., partnership publishing and consulting firm.
"In addition, however, if they happen to run into an elephant
{big discovery} by mistake you make a lot of money."
   The downside is that investors who want to take that big
write-off have to assume unlimited liability for their
partnership's operating expenses and uninsured losses. But
Mr. Nettles says most new drilling partnerships aren't as
leveraged as they used to be, and they have beefed up their
liability insurance.
   Some drilling partnerships also give investors the option
of skipping the big deduction and investing as limited
partners. Sponsors may also permit investors to go in as a
general partner for just the first year -- so they can claim
the 80% write-off -- then convert their "working interest" to
a limited-partner interest.
   Some drilling-fund sponsors, though not all, have also
lowered their front-end fees drastically. Brokerage
commissions still range from 8% to 10% of a typical $5,000
minimum investment.
   But Canfield, Ohio-based Everflow Eastern Inc., which
currently has a $20 million offering, will keep only 0.4% of
that to cover its own costs of marketing the partnership. On
the other hand, Parker &amp; Parsley Petroleum Co., a Midland,
Texas, sponsor that is selling a $100 million drilling
partnership, will claim 15% in front-end fees.
   Sales of drilling partnerships were rising even before the
Iraqi invasion. Through July, $14.6 million had gone into the
funds, compared with just $2.2 million during the same period
last year.
   Now, "they're slowly climbing at the rate of about $3
million a month," says Mr. Nettles. Sales of income funds,
which have steadily declined in recent years, were $157.2
million through July, down 57% from $351.2 million a year
ago.
   While gas prices are still under some pressure because of
a surplus in certain regions of the country, that "bubble"
could rapidly disappear with the winter home-heating season
just around the corner. State utility regulators, realizing
they can't count on imported oil supplies, "are going to want
to make sure that local gas companies are up to the brim with
inventories," says First Boston's Mr. Olson. Most aren't now,
either because they have some gas left over from last year's
unusually warm winter or because they have been waiting for
prices to fall even lower.
   But Mr. Nettles adds a final note of caution. In the
current heated environment, dealing with reputable energy
partnership sponsors is more important than ever. Even before
Iraqi ruler Saddam Hussein seized Kuwait, he says, the
increasing world-wide demand for oil had brought out
promoters pushing questionable deals.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0108
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0108.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Pic `N' Save Puts Batchelder, Associates
   On Its Board, Agrees to Other Measures
   ----
   By Frederick Rose
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   PICN WNEWS
</CO>
<IN>
BUYBACKS, REDEMPTIONS, SWAP OFFERS (BBK)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
SPECIALTY RETAILERS (OTS)
</IN>
<LP>
   DOMINGUEZ, Calif. -- Pic 'N' Save Corp. forestalled a
threatened proxy battle with Girard Partners L.P. and
investor David Batchelder by agreeing to put Mr. Batchelder
and two associates on the board, widen a planned stock
buy-back and lift two anti-takeover measures.
   The pact, announced by the two sides Friday, appears to
give Girard and Mr. Batchelder much of what they have sought
since April, when they disclosed a 6.7% stake in Pic 'N'
Save, which operates a chain of stores specializing in new
"closeout" merchandise.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But the pact also leaves unclear where control of Pic 'N'
Save is headed and whether Girard, which earlier said it
would make a bid for the company, might later pursue an
offer.
   "There's no limitation on Girard or on any other
shareholder," said Mr. Batchelder, an investor in La Jolla,
Calif., who was once Texas oil man T. Boone Pickens,
principal strategist. Mr. Batchelder declined, however, to
say whether the Girard group will increase, decrease or leave
unchanged its holding.
   As part of the pact, Pic 'N' Save agreed to redeem its
so-called "poison pill" takeover defense and to urge
shareholders to amend the company's bylaws to exempt the
company from a Delaware restriction on financial transactions
by a hostile acquirer.
   Despite its relatively small current holding, the Girard
group has acquired a large representation on Pic 'N' Save's
board, with three members of a reconstituted eight-member
board being named by Girard and a fourth member, acceptable
to both sides, apparently being named by other major holders.
   Among other things, it appears that Girard will have
effective control over the selection of a new president and
chief executive officer. As reported, the current incumbent,
Lewis B. Merrifield III, has resigned effective Jan. 1. Mr.
Merrifield, who remains on the board, has agreed not to vote
on matters related to his own succession.
   Mr. Batchelder declined to say whether a successor had
been selected. However, he added that "the issue will be
dealt with promptly."
   Pic 'N' Save stock barely budged after the announcement,
rising 25 cents a share Friday to close at $10.25 in active
over-the-counter trading. The stock had climbed from a
52-week low of $8.75 a share last Monday.
   In announcing the agreement, Pic 'N' Save reiterated an
earlier statement that it is "aggressively pursuing" efforts
to expand to $150 million a current $60 million common stock
repurchase authorization. At Friday's closing price, the $150
million would buy approximately 42% of the about 34.9 million
shares outstanding at July 31. The current $60 million
authorization would buy about 17%. But the bigger buy-back is
contingent on suitable financing and neither side would
discuss the progress, if any, in that area.
   A company spokesman said that under its $60 million
authority, Pic 'N' Save will start repurchases today on the
open market through a solicitation group led by Goldman,
Sachs &amp; Co.
   Pic 'N' Save, whose retail operations have been strained
of late by rapid expansion, has been seen as a test case for
the high-profile Mr. Batchelder, considered a bright and
seasoned strategist in his work for Mr. Pickens and for Los
Angeles investor Marvin Davis in his failed attempts to buy
NWA Inc., the parent of Northwest Airlines, and UAL Corp.,
the parent of United Airlines.
   The early results with Pic 'N' Save -- Mr. Batchelder's
first independent effort -- weren't auspicious. Three months
after announcing that it expected to make a $447 million
offer for Pic 'N' Save, Girard said it doubted that it could
raise sufficient cash to make an attractive bid to holders.
Analysts wondered aloud about the attractiveness of Pic 'N'
Save. And talks with management stalled repeatedly. But
Girard pressed on with plans for a proxy contest.
   Now, it remains to be seen whether Mr. Batchelder can
steer Pic 'N' Save to more profitable ground. The company had
net income of $5.9 million, or 17 cents a share, on $119
million in sales in the April 29 fiscal first quarter.
   Clearly under pressure from Girard, management has set
sharp cost-cutting measures designed to increase cash flow.
Last week, it announced that, after the closing of 14 of its
190 stores, the facilities were returned to a previous owner
and the inventory was sold for an undisclosed amount to a
joint venture 50%-owned by New York-based Lionel Corp.
   Under the agreement, Pic 'N' Save's board was expanded to
eight members from seven and, with the resignation of three
incumbents, three new nominees from the Girard group were
accepted as directors. The fourth new member was agreed upon
by both sides.
   The directors from Girard group are: Mr. Batchelder; James
J. Zehentbauer, a partner of Mr. Batchelder's; and Bill M.
Thomas, a former chief financial officer of Pic 'N' Save who
has sided with Mr. Batchelder and Girard. Mr. Thomas owns a
4% stake in Pic 'N' Save in addition to Girard's 6.7%.
   The director accepted by both sides is Peter Willmott,
former chairman, president and chief executive officer of
Carson Pirie Scott &amp; Co., a food services concern.
   The incumbent directors who remained are: Arthur Frankel,
chairman and former chief executive officer of the company;
Mr. Merrifield, the departing president and chief executive
officer; Ronald Spogli, general partner of Freeman Spogli &amp;
Co.; and Bruce E. Karatz, president and chief executive
officer of Kaufman &amp; Broad Home Corp.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0107
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0107.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Computers:
   IBM, Other U.S. Computer Makers Face
   Challenge From the Japanese in Europe
   ----
   By Richard L. Hudson
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<CO>
   IBM JAPAN EUROP J.TOS J.FUT J.MBE HIT I.OLV PHG F.GRB
G.SIE U.APC U.ATD
</CO>
<IN>
COMPUTERS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY (CPR)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   LONDON -- The European computer market may be nearing the
end of an era.
   Almost since computers began, U.S. manufacturers like
International Business Machines Corp. have dominated the
market in Europe. U.S. companies get three out of every four
dollars spent on mainframe computers there, and U.S. products
account for at least half of all computer sales. Last year,
as its U.S. operations bled red, IBM leaned on Europe for 71%
of its net income.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But now Japanese companies are coming on strong. Among the
first was Toshiba Corp., grabbing the market lead in laptop
computer sales. Last week, Fujitsu Ltd. one-upped that by
agreeing to buy control of Britain's biggest computer maker,
International Computers Ltd., or ICL. With less flash but
equal resolve, Hitachi Ltd. and Mitsubishi Electric Corp. are
also expanding.
   So far, the Japanese hold less than 10% of the $110
billion European computer market. But nobody -- least of all
the endangered Americans -- thinks they'll stop there. "We
expect the Japanese to increase their role," says David E.
McKinney, chief of IBM's European computer business.
   For the Japanese, Europe is the latest battleground in a
30-year campaign to overtake the U.S. computer giants. Adding
Europe, a third of the global computer market, to their
territory would increase their world-wide economies of scale.
For the U.S., a tough competitor would thereby become
downright frightening; the ICL purchase agreement makes
Fujitsu the world's second-biggest computer maker, vaulting
it ahead of U.S.-based Digital Equipment Corp.
   No. 1 IBM is the target. In Europe, "we aren't competing
with European manufacturers; we're competing with IBM," says
Soji Endo, manager of overseas operations for Hitachi's
computer business. "We try to scratch a little bit from
{IBM's} market."
   But Adam Quinton, of London stockbrokers UBS-Phillips &amp;
Drew, notes that the Japanese threat is a long-term one: "I
don't think it's a question of IBM needing to do anything
dramatic" today, he says. And IBM's Mr. McKinney says: "Our
strategy doesn't change. We're going to work very hard to
stay competitive."
   Ultimately, European consumers will decide the winner.
Force of habit will be a big factor: Most big European
corporations already have huge investments in American
software.
   Technology will be another factor. Despite past U.S.
strength, Japan is moving up fast. The computer-screen
technology in today's laptops, for instance, comes mostly
from Tokyo. In the end, says Bruno d'Avanzo, Digital's
European marketing boss, the computer war in Europe "boils
down to American technology vs. Japanese technology."
   Such talk annoys native European computer makers, but
they're becoming irrelevant. Often weak in technology and
finance, the major European manufacturers never managed more
than a 25% share of their home market in the 1980s -- and now
they're losing even that.
   All but the strongest European hardware maker, West
Germany's Siemens AG, have recently reported losses or
sluggish sales. In the confusion, the Japanese are picking up
some of the pieces. ICL was Fujitsu's prize. Mitsubishi
gobbled up ailing Apricot Computers Ltd., once the biggest
personal-computer maker in Britain.
   Next, analysts say, may be Italy's struggling Ing. C.
Olivetti &amp; Co. or the unprofitable computer business of N.V.
Philips of the Netherlands; both have been seeking foreign
partners. The only sure survivors will be Siemens with its
financial muscle, and French state-owned Groupe Bull with its
political backing.
   Under the circumstances, all eyes are on European
Community headquarters in Brussels. Though the EC has no
ideological reason to favor one country's industry over the
other's, it's leery of Japan because of past trade friction
and Japan's late entry into an overcrowded market. Another
possible boost for the Americans may be an alliance with the
EC to link computer-research programs; talks exploring that
option began last month in Washington and Brussels. The EC
might also try to force Tokyo to ease entry to its market for
European companies.
   With 1992 and a unified European market approaching, the
EC is also unlikely to sit idly by as its native computer
industry withers. "My view is the world needs equilibrium" of
computer production among Europe, Japan and the U.S., warns
Filippo Maria Pandolfi, the EC's science and research
commissioner. "I am strongly in favor of maintaining the
capacity of the European industry."
   But it's already too late for Britain. Computer science
began here, with 19th-century mathematician Charles Babbage;
and though the Pentagon made the first primitive electronic
computer, Cambridge University was the birthplace in 1949 of
the first machine to store programs.
   That's moldy history now. Nearly every computer-hardware
engineer in Britain today works for a U.S. or Japanese
company. Excluding troubled PC maker Amstrad PLC, "there
really isn't anybody left in the information technology
industry in the U.K.," laments Peter Horne, Apricot's
managing director.
   Apricot, put on the block last winter by its founders, was
a shuttlecock between Japanese and U.S. bidders. Japanese
flexibility and tact, not price, were deciding factors in
choosing the winner, says Roger Foster, managing director of
Apricot's former parent, now called ACT Group PLC.
Mitsubishi, though no major player in the Japanese computer
market, pleased him with its pledges to become a good,
long-term partner for both Apricot and ACT. By contrast, the
Americans struck Mr. Foster as prickly. "The Americans were
preoccupied with all the legal problems" and risks, he says.
   The sale stirred little political controversy. In the
early 1980s, Apricot's catchy name (a play on better-known
Apple) and snazzy technology made it the U.K. market leader.
But it was too small to compete easily with multinationals,
and it blew its lead with a few marketing blunders. By last
year, it had sunk to fifth place in the U.K. PC market. Under
the circumstances, the Japanese were welcomed as saviors.
   The honeymoon is now in its fourth month. A one-month
salary bonus for all 400 Apricot employees helped ensure good
will. A typically British summer party, held under a canopy
in a Yorkshire field, smoothed relations with dealers. Next,
Mitsubishi plans to expand Apricot's product-development
staff and to install new equipment in its Scottish PC
factory.
   The Japanese know that success in computers -- as in the
automobile and consumer electronics industries -- is partly a
matter of global economies of scale. Hitherto, Japan's
computer giants were preoccupied with their home market and
the U.S.; Europe was an afterthought. Now Europe, with its
1992-related economic growth and the opening of former East
bloc markets, has appeal.
   Fujitsu's managing director and vice-general manager,
Michio Naruto, hopes that 70% of the company's revenue will
come from outside Japan by the end of the decade, up from 35%
today.
   In one European market niche, victory has already gone to
Tokyo. In 1986, armed with new technology for easy-to-read,
portable computer screens, Toshiba rushed into the European
market with its laptop computers. To sell the machines,
Toshiba's marketers in Europe -- themselves Europeans --
methodically targeted the continent's top PC dealers, already
used by IBM and Compaq Computer Corp. At the time, neither
U.S. company had a comparable product, so Toshiba was an
instant hit. Last year, on the strength of its specialized
laptops alone, it was the sixth biggest PC vendor in Europe.
   Once entrenched, the Japanese can be hard to dislodge.
According to market researchers Dataquest Inc., Toshiba last
year had a 39% share of the laptop market in Europe, compared
with Compaq's 16%. "We're taking share back," says Joseph
McNally, Compaq's British boss. But despite Compaq's status
as the second-biggest vendor of PCs in Europe, surveys show
Toshiba's name has more clout among British consumers.
   Still, Toshiba may be a special case. For the Japanese
generally, building a continent-wide sales network from
scratch will be difficult. The number of attractive takeover
targets in Europe is small. And the risk of a political
backlash is great.
   "The Japanese over time have a chance of being strong {in
Europe}, but a lot of things have to happen before they get
there," says Digital's Mr. d'Avanzo. Among other things, he
says, the Japanese must learn to write software and provide
computer services to suit the tastes of European customers.
   For the European companies, providing such software and
services may be their last refuge. Already, as their hardware
businesses weaken, Bull and Olivetti are rushing into the
faster-growing software and service markets. At this rate,
some analysts predict, most in the European industry could
end up as glorified repackagers of hardware mass-produced by
Japanese and U.S. giants. The native European hardware
industry could shrivel, just as the U.S. consumer-electronics
industry withered in the face of strong Far East competition.
   The thought chills some Europeans. "I cannot imagine such
a danger," says Francis Lorentz, Bull's chairman and chief
executive. No matter what happens, he says, the sheer
dynamism of a post-1992, post-Cold War Europe will provide
enough business for all to prosper -- Japanese, American and
European. "We have fantastic market opportunities for the
future," he says. "Europe today has become the major
battlefield in our industry."
   ---
   Jacob M. Schlesinger in Tokyo contributed to this article.
   ---
        The Top Computer Companies in Europe in 1989
                                                                                                       

    (Share of European information technology revenues)
                                                                                                       

   IBM ............................. 20.1%
   Siemens .........................  5.0%
   Digital Equipment ...............  4.5%
   Olivetti ........................  3.9%
   Bull ............................  3.3%
   Hewlett-Packard .................  3.3%
   Unisys ..........................  2.6%
   Philips .........................  2.4%
   Nixdorf .........................  2.2%
   ICL .............................  1.8%
                                                                                                       

   NOTE: Siemens to acquire Nixdorf, and Fujitsu to buy 80%
of ICL.
   Source: Dataquest Inc.
                                                                                                       

           Japan's Share of the European PC Market
                                                                                                       

      (Percentages of 1989 personal computer revenues)
                                                                                                       

   Toshiba .........................  3.0%
   Epson ...........................  1.1
   Sanyo ...........................  0.7

   Sharp ...........................  0.4
                                                                                                       

   *Mitsubishi share reflects its May 1990 purchase of
Apricot Computers
                                                                                                       

   Sources: Dataquest Inc. and companies
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0106
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0106.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Dutch Consumer Prices Rise
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3D
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<LP>
   THE HAGUE, the Netherlands -- Dutch consumer prices rose
0.3% in the month to mid-July and were up 2.3% from a year
earlier, the Netherlands Economics Ministry reported.
   The upturn in July reflected mainly higher rent increases
that are imposed annually in that month, the provisional data
disclosed.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The consumer price index rose to 103.5 in the month to
mid-July from 103.2 in the previous month and 101.2 in
mid-July 1989.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0105
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0105.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Shawmut Enters
   Accord Sought
   By Regulators
   ---
   U.S. Demands Tightening
   Of the Lending Practices
   Of New England Bank
   ----
   By Ron Suskind
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3A
</SO>
<CO>
   SNC
</CO>
<IN>
BANKS (BNK)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (FDL)
</GV>
<LP>
   BOSTON -- Shawmut National Corp. said that it entered into
agreements with federal bank regulators to strengthen certain
lending practices, credit review, liquidity planning and
management information systems.
   The agreements follow a regulatory review of the bank
concluded during the second quarter, which ended June 30.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Of several agreements with regulators, the most
significant is a "formal agreement" with the Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency. That document, which the bank
will sign in a few days, is a regulatory measure exceeded by
a formal enforcement action -- like that brought against Bank
of Boston Corp. last October -- and, after that, by a cease
and desist order. Of the large regional banks in New England,
only the Bank of New England Corp. has received a cease and
desist order -- a regulatory action just a step below an
actual bank seizure.
   Joel B. Alvord, Shawmut's chairman and chief executive
officer, said "We believe that the provisions of these
agreements will serve to assure our long-term strength."
   Along with other New England banks, Shawmut, with $26.6
billion in assets, is wrestling with a large portfolio of
real estate loans in a softening regional real estate market.
The bank's nonperforming loans and foreclosed property rose
to $1.31 billion at the end of the second quarter, up from
$1.16 billion in the first quarter. Total loan loss reserves
stood at $748.3 million, or 4.48% of total loans outstanding,
compared with $287 million in reserves, 1.53% of total loans,
on June 30, 1989.
   Carrying $1.31 billion in nonperforming assets -- money
lent out that is bringing no return -- causes a heavy drain
on Shawut's capital because the bank must continue to pay
interest on that money to depositors. The losses tend to be
about 9% of the total nonperforming portfolio, or, in
Shawmut's case, approximately $120 million annually.
   In reviewing the bank's nonperforming assets, Thomas F.
Theurkauf, the bank's senior vice president, noted Shawmut
took one step forward in clearing away nonperformers in the
second quarter, but was pushed two steps back -- with $237.5
million in fresh, non-accruing loans appearing on the bank's
books.
   "The content of the {OCC} agreement we are not giving
out," said a bank spokesman. "All I'll say is that the
economic scenario this is all being driven by is we have a
regional economy that is at least six to nine months from
stabilizing. All the banks up here are fighting the same
situation we are."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0104
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0104.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   REVIEW &amp; OUTLOOK (Editorial) -- Asides:
   Khomeini's Ghost
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<LP>
   Saddam Hussein seems to be warming to his new role as the
world's most demonic character. What else is one to make of
the phantasmagoria of images and religious incantations that
he released in a statement Friday? "O Arabs, O Moslems, O
believers in God wherever you are. This is your day to rise
and spread quickly in order to defend Mecca, which is captive
of the spears of the Americans and the Zionist," said Saddam,
who seems to have undergone a conversion on the road to
Riyadh. Saddam, heretofore thought to be running a homicidal
secular Islamic state, has suddenly got religion. "Arabs,
Moslems, believers in God wherever you are. This is your day
to jump up and defend Mecca, hostage of the Americans." The
Iraqi theologian is offering a fairly hot crusade: "Burn the
soil under their feet. Burn the soil under the feet of the
aggressors and invaders." We suspect believers in God
everywhere understand the dangers of being caught on the
wrong side of a wind-blown, albeit holy, chemical attack.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0103
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0103.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Scholastic to Offer 4.2 Million Shares
   In September for Up to $88.2 Million
   ----
   By Kathleen Deveny
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3A
</SO>
<IN>
INITIAL STOCK OFFERINGS (INI)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Scholastic Corp., a publisher of children's
textbooks and magazines that went private in 1987, said it
plans an initial public offering of 4.2 million common shares
valued at as much as $88.2 million.
   Scholastic said in a Securities and Exchange Commission
filing that 3.3 million shares will be offered by the company
and 930,000 shares will be put up for sale by the family of
founder Maurice R. Robinson, which controls the voting power
through a separate class of shares.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The offering, expected in late September, will be made
concurrently in the U.S. and internationally -- 3.4 million
shares in the U.S. and 800,000 shares internationally, the
company said. The offering will be managed by Goldman, Sachs
&amp; Co. and Alex. Brown &amp; Sons Inc. The offering plan provides
an overallotment to the underwriters of 630,000 shares.
   At the projected offering price of $18 to $21 a share, the
company said, the offering would raise from $75.6 million to
$88.2 million. Including the public offering, the company has
about 9.4 million shares outstanding.
   Scholastic said it intends to use proceeds from the
offering to pay bank debt. The company's debt was $46.5
million at May 31, but because Scholastic typically has a
negative cash flow during the summer months, that figure is
likely to climb before the offering is completed.
   The voting power is vested in the company's Class A stock.
Richard Robinson, chairman and chief executive officer, and
two trusts controlled by descendants of company founder
Maurice R. Robinson, own approximately 95% of those shares.
   The company said holders of common stock will be entitled
to elect one-fifth of the company's board, which now has 12
members.
   Scholastic hasn't paid dividends since 1986, and has no
current plans to pay dividends on its common or Class A stock
in the future, the company says.
   Scholastic, formerly known as SI Holdings Inc., was a
publicly traded company until 1987, when a group led by
management acquired the company for about $84 million in cash
and securities. After the offering, current shareholders will
control 67.3% of the company, which they acquired at an
average cost of $1.35 a share. The company's new investors
will own 32.7% of the company's shares, acquired at an
average estimated price of $19.50.
   For the year ended May 31, Scholastic reported net income
of $2.3 million, compared with a loss of $4.8 million the
previous year. Revenue was $374.6 million, up from $299.6
million.
   Scholastic will apply to have its common stock included in
the National Market System of the over-the-counter market,
under the symbol SCHL.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0102
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0102.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Eastern Airlines Fare Increase
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<CO>
   CTA
</CO>
<IN>
AIRLINES (AIR)
BANKRUPTCIES (BCY)
</IN>
<LP>
   MIAMI -- Eastern Airlines said it will increase its
domestic fares by 5.3%, effective Aug. 15, because of higher
fuel costs.
   The carrier cited Iraq's invasion of Kuwait for the fare
rise. Several other airlines have boosted fares, or tacked on
surcharges, since the Middle East crisis sent crude oil
skyward.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Eastern said the increase will not apply to passengers
holding special weekend fare reservations for travel between
now and Aug. 28.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0101
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0101.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   REVIEW &amp; OUTLOOK (Editorial):
   Radio for A New Europe
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
MEDIA, PUBLISHING, BROADCASTING, ELECTRONIC PUBLISHING (MED)
</IN>
<GV>
CONGRESS (CNG)
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (FDL)
</GV>
<LP>
   For decades Albania was viewed as a hermit country, its
people completely cut off from news of the West and content
with Communist poverty. The recent exodus of 5,000 refugees
to the West has shattered that myth. It turns out Albanians
are well informed about freedom, in large part from listening
to U.S.-sponsored broadcasts such as the Voice of America.
   Amazingly, many of the refugees speak English, which they
had painstakingly taught themselves by listening to the VOA.
The knowledge that the Iron Curtain had fallen gave them the
courage to try fleeing from the last Stalinist regime in
Europe.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   For 40 years, the VOA along with Radio Free Europe and
Radio Liberty (which broadcasts to the Soviet Union) have
beamed objective news into nations lacking a free press. They
played a significant role in the collapse of communism in
Eastern Europe. Lech Walesa has said that without Radio Free
Europe's Polish broadcasts, Solidarity would have ceased to
exist.
   Now that communism is becoming a spent historical force,
many in Congress are calling for a swift end to U.S. funding
of Radio Free Europe and a curtailment of VOA's budget. They
fail to recognize that having helped win the Cold War, U.S.
radio stations are greatly needed to secure the peace in
Eastern Europe. In addition, people in oppressed regions of
Asia and Africa still desperately need the news and culture
they provide.
   Radio Free Europe can still perform a vital role in the
nations of Eastern Europe, which may have freedom of speech
but still lack broadbased broadcasting outlets independent of
the state. RFE's programming, for instance, now includes
tutorials on building democratic institutions, the role of a
free press and creating free markets.
   The new democratic leaders of Eastern Europe welcome RFE's
continued competition. In May, Czechoslovakia's President
Vaclav Havel said: "I believe the freedom today enjoyed by
our mass media does not at all mean that RFE has lost its
meaning." He added, "There are numberless spheres where it
can continue to serve our nations well at this time -- better
than our own mass media."
   It is likely that in five or 10 years Radio Free Europe
will have outlived its usefulness in countries such as
Czechoslovakia. At that point, Steve Forbes, head of the
Board for International Broadcasting, suggests that certain
RFE services be privatized and sold to local interests. Until
then, continued funding of Radio Free Europe's mission is one
of the best ways the U.S. can help ensure a prosperous and
stable Europe.
   This fall a bipartisan commission will evaluate the work
of both Radio Free Europe/Radio Liberty and the VOA, and make
recommendations to Congress on their future. Despite budget
pressures, the $360 million annual investment in U.S.-funded
radio networks should be maintained. The dividends from their
work will continue to pour in for years.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0100
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0100.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Dutch Trade Balance Fell in May
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<LP>
   THE HAGUE -- The Dutch balance of trade slid into a
deficit of 900 million guilders (US$500 million) in May but
registered a surplus of 2.2 billion guilders for the first
five months of this year, the Netherlands Economics Ministry
said.
   The May deficit resulted from a strong 9% rise in the
value of imports at a time when exports were falling 2%.
Imports in May were valued at 20.6 billion guilders compared
with 19.6 billion guilders of exports.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0099
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0099.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   REVIEW &amp; OUTLOOK (Editorial):
   Cracking the Drug Problem
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A10
</SO>
<LP>
   The watchdogs of progress and enlightenment have been
quite busy of late, snarling at the war on drugs, and
sneering at its adherents. Take, for example, the recent
Herblock howler -- a cartoon showing drug chief William J.
Bennett in full martial regalia, about to lead troops in an
armed assault on the patients of a drug-rehabilitation
center.
   Among the other anti-drug war warriors, count the
advocates of "personal freedom," who would rather blame the
drug problem on everything from alienation to consumerism
rather than acknowledge how much permissiveness has to do
with the growth of this tragedy. Then there are the
progressives, who maintain that enforcement measures and a
war on drugs can't work. The only solution to drugs, they
argue, is to attack poverty and racism, itself a racist
notion suggesting that the minority poor have no will of
their own. An all-fronts war of condemnation, law enforcement
and neighborhood activism seems to have upset the agendas of
the enlightened. What was particularly upsetting about this
war to advanced thinkers was its emphasis of an old value
known as moral leadership.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Yet drug czar Bennett soldiered on and behold, there are
now signs that the war may be having its effect. The major
reporting systems all indicate a drop in drug use for the
first time since the mid-1980s, when the drug epidemic began
spiraling out of control. Cocaine emergencies dropped off
sharply in 1989, according to data collected by the Drug
Abuse Warning Network (DAWN), the agency that monitors
hospital emergency rooms in major cities. Heroin emergencies
also fell, though to a lesser degree. While no single
indicator tells the whole story, the DAWN report is
significant because its data comes from centers of hard-core
drug use.
   Perhaps more significantly, drugs have lost their old
luster among the young. According to the 1989 High School
Senior Survey, the already high rate of disapproval of drugs
continues to climb among high-school seniors. The
overwhelming majority of the students surveyed disapproved
not just of cocaine, moreover, but also of occasional
marijuana use. That response would surely have been
inconceivable a little over a decade ago.
   The National Household Survey on Drug Abuse provided a
similar omen in its report of a 37% drop in drug use since
1985. What is particularly telling is that this survey
reports largely on middle-class drug consumption. The drug
epidemic can be said to have arrived, truly, when parents and
teachers, businessmen and bus drivers and other average
citizens embraced the notion of "recreational drugs." In
short order they became the dealers' best customers. If
middle-class Americans no longer buy the notion that drugs
are acceptable, we have turned a major corner in the war.
   On the supply side, too, there are hopeful signs. Cocaine
prices have skyrocketed, while the purity level of the
available cocaine has dropped dramatically. Both are sure
signs of a disruption in supply. In Bolivia, coca farming has
become unprofitable, the direct result of harsh measures
lately taken both in Bolivia and elsewhere.
   Colombian President Virgilio Barco deserves considerable
credit for his efforts. After the murder of a Colombian
presidential candidate, President Barco embarked on a program
of total war against traffickers, including massive arrests
and extraditions.
   None of this is to say, of course, that the drug lords
have been destroyed. It is to say a hard line on law
enforcement can and clearly does work.
   Charleston, South Carolina, saw that rule proved when
Police Chief Reuben Greenberg simply used round-the-clock
surveillance to force dealers from turf to turf, thus cutting
them off from their customers. When his men move in on an
operation, the chief told columnist William Raspberry, they
seize the furniture, the air conditioner, the phones, the
very chair the dealer sits on, so that he can't do business
the next day. Chief Greenberg's hard-line tactics have had a
dramatic effect on Charleston's crime rate, now lower by 45%.
   In the crime-plagued cities, the fervor against drugs and
dealers mounts. None of this, again, is to say that victory
is at hand. It is to note real progress in the war on drugs.
A most important sign of that progress is the perception, in
inner cities as elsewhere, that drug users are losers.
   When rock stars and other beautiful people began to flaunt
and glamorize drugs, they were also sending the catastrophic
signal that drugs were associated with power and status. The
deglamorization of drugs now in evidence among all classes of
our society is the best indication to date that the war
against drugs is winnable. In arguing these many years that
such a war could not be won, the naysayers failed to reckon
with the power of moral leadership, its insistence on
accountability, its distinction between right and wrong. If
we are seeing some rays of hope in the battle against drugs,
it is mainly thanks to the fact that that weapon has at last
been put to work.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0098
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0098.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Securities Offerings Calendar
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C19
</SO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
CDS, INTEREST RATES, COMMERCIAL PAPER (FIN)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
INITIAL STOCK OFFERINGS (INI)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal
offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week,
according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:
                                                                                                       

                         U.S TREASURY
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>

                                                                                                       

   $18.4 billion in three-month and six-month bills.
                                                                                                       

                            CORPORATE
                                                                                                       

                             Today
                                                                                                       

   Gerrity Oil &amp; Gas Corp. -- initial two million common
shares, via Alex. Brown &amp; Sons Inc.
                                                                                                       

                             Tuesday
                                                                                                       

   Mexico Equity &amp; Income Fund Inc. -- initial five million
common shares, via Oppenheimer &amp; Co.
                                                                                                       

                        One Day This Week
                                                                                                       

   Banco Central S.A. -- five million American depository
receipts in the U.S. and one million common shares globally,
via Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.
   Black Box Inc. -- initial 4.5 million common shares, via
Alex. Brown.
   Crescent Jewelers Inc. -- initial 2.2 million common
shares, via Alex. Brown.
   Dillard Department Stores Inc. -- four million Class A
common shares, via Morgan Stanley &amp; Co. Inc.
   Failure Group Inc. -- initial 2.3 million common shares
offered globally with 1,650,000 in U.S., via Prudential-Bache
Capital Funding.
   Lunar Corp. -- initial 1,475,000 common shares, via Smith
Barney, Harris Upham &amp; Co.
   Marcam Corp. -- initial 1,260,000 common shares, via
Hambrecht &amp; Quist Inc.
   Marquette Electronics Inc. -- initial 2,140,000 Class A
common shares, via Baird (Robert W.) &amp; Co.
   Musicland Stores Corp. -- initial six million common
shares, via Donaldson, Lufkin &amp; Jenrette Securities Corp.
   NRM Steelastic Inc. -- initial 3,350,000 common shares,
via Donaldson Lufkin.
   Radius Inc. -- initial three million common shares, via
Morgan Stanley.
   Vicor Corp. -- one million common shares, via Tucker
Anthony Inc.
   Y&amp;A Group Inc. -- 1.6 million common shares, via
PaineWebber Inc.
                                                                                                       

                         MUNICIPAL
                                                                                                       

                          Tuesday
                                                                                                       

   Ohio -- $115 million of higher education, capital
facilities, general obligation bonds, 1990 Series IIA, via
competitive bid.
                                                                                                       

                           Wednesday
                                                                                                       

   Tennessee Housing Development Agency -- $78.6 million of
single-family, mortgage revenue bonds, via competitive bid.
                                                                                                       

                            Thursday
                                                                                                       

   Metropolitan Seattle, Wash. -- $100 million of
municipality sewer revenue bonds, Series S, via competitive
bid.
                                                                                                       

                        One Day This Week
                                                                                                       

   Alabama Housing Finance Authority -- $115 million of
single-family mortgage revenue bonds, Ginnie Mae
Collateralized, via a Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co. group.
   Jacksonville Electric Authority -- $255 million of St.
Johns River Power Park System special obligation bonds, via a
Lehman Brothers group.
   Lubbock Hospital Facilities Development Corp., Texas --
$95 million of hospital revenue bonds, Methodist Hospital
issue, via a First Boston Corp. group.
   Massachusetts Housing Finance Authority -- $150 million of
single-family mortgage revenue bonds, Alternative Minimum Tax
and non-AMT, via a PaineWebber group.
   Michigan State Housing Development Authority -- $60
million of single-family mortgage revenue bonds, Series C,
non-AMT, and Series D, AMT, via a Lehman Brothers group.
   New York State Dormitory Authority -- $230 million of
State University of New York education facilities revenue
bonds, via a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.
   New York State Medical Care Facilities Finance Authority
-- $120 million of Presbyterian Hospital revenue bonds,
FHA-insured, via a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group.
   Texas City Industrial Development Corp., Texas -- $53.3
million of marine terminal refunding revenue bonds, 1990
Series, Arco Pipe Line Co. Project, via a First Boston group.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0097
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0097.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   Soviet Union Gets Windfalls as Prices
   Of Gold, Oil Surge Due to Gulf Crisis
   ----
   By John J. Fialka
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   FREST MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
PRECIOUS METALS, STONES, GOLD, SILVER (PCS)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
</IN>
<LP>
   While it may spell economic distress for much of the
industrialized world, the Persian Gulf crisis is money in the
bank for the Soviet Union.
   According to Western experts, the surge in the prices of
gold and oil -- two of Russia's biggest foreign-currency
earners -- could inject as much as an extra $7.25 billion a
year into the Soviet economy if the crisis persists. The
windfalls came just as the Soviet Union was teetering on the
brink of a record trade deficit and was digging deeply into
its emergency gold reserves.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "It's as though someone has been listening to {Soviet
leader Mikhail} Gorbachev's prayers," says Marshall Goldman,
head of the Russian Research Center at Harvard University. He
has been among the most pessimistic experts on the longevity
of the reform-minded Soviet leader's regime.
   In addition, notes Mr. Goldman, the Soviet Union is likely
to have a record grain harvest of some 260 million metric
tons this fall, 23 million tons higher than the previous
record, meaning the country could cut the amount of food
normally imported from abroad.
   "The prospect for Soviet finances is fundamentally
changing," says Jan Vanous, director of PlanEcon Inc., a
Washington research firm that tracks the Soviet and Eastern
European economies. He and Mr. Goldman estimate that the
Soviet Union gains $1 billion from each dollar increase in a
barrel of crude oil because crude and other price-related
exports, such as natural gas, coke, electricity and coal,
bring in more than two-thirds of the Soviet Union's hard
currency. So far, the gulf crisis has kicked up the price of
oil to around $25 a barrel from $18 in world spot markets.
   Gold exports may bring in an additional $250 million a
year, resulting from a 7% increase since late July, when
tensions in the gulf began propelling the metal's price
upward. Roger Robinson Jr., who formerly studied Soviet
financial dealings as a staff member of President Reagan's
National Security Council, believes Soviet gold traders may
have actually helped trigger the rise by pulling out of the
gold markets, where the Soviets had been "dumping their
strategic reserves."
   In recent months, he believes, the Soviets have been
selling more than their annual production of gold to keep
afloat. In 1989, according to Mr. Goldman, the Soviet Union
had a $3 billion trade deficit, three times more than the
previous year. "Those kind of statistics show you why they
haven't been able to pay their debts," says Mr. Goldman.
   While the new cash has been pouring in, however, Soviet
leaders have suggested that they may play a larger military
role with the West in the crisis, even to the point of
sending troops to Saudi Arabia if the U.N. sanctions a
multinational force there as a way to stem the crisis.
   That would literally be lining up against their own
economic interest. Not only would the Soviet Union be acting
to ease the revenue-producing panic in the markets; the
country's soldiers would be facing one of the Soviet Union's
biggest export customers.
   The Soviet-made Iraqi tanks parked on Kuwait's border
aren't paid for yet. Iraq owes the Russians almost $6 billion
for weapons and has been paying for them in oil at the
equivalent of $1 billion a year, according to Mr. Goldman.
"They'll probably lose that," he adds.
   "The bigger bargain they {the Soviets} are looking for is
probably more help and aid from the West," suggests Charles
Wolf Jr., director of Rand Corp.'s research in international
economics. "So if they're a responsible player in the
international peace-keeping domain, presumably their
prospects for getting more government support from the West
will be stronger."
   Because of the peculiar economic climate of Eastern
Europe, the sunshine for the Soviets means gloom for their
former satellites, which once imported oil from the Soviet
Union at a subsidized price of around $7 a barrel.
   "The East bloc is terrible. The Soviets have stopped their
oil deliveries, preferring to sell to hard-currency
customers," explains Mr. Vanous. Recently, he says, the
situation in Czechoslovakia became so desperate that the
government began pumping from the Warsaw Pact's strategic
reserves of diesel oil, normally reserved to fuel tanks in a
military crisis. "They just raided it."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0096
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0096.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Santa Fe Pacific Corp.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   SFX
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   CHICAGO -- Santa Fe Pacific Corp. said it will make a
scheduled Sept. 1 interest payment of $62.5 million on its
16% subordinated debentures, due 2003.
   The payment will be made in cash to holders of record Aug.
15.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The railroad, real estate and natural-resources company
has the option of paying in cash or in additional debentures
until 1994.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0095
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0095.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Poco Petroleums Ltd.,
   And Voyager Energy
   Call Off Merger Talks
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   T.POC T.VGR ICRA ICR.A
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   CALGARY, Alberta -- Poco Petroleums Ltd. and Voyager
Energy Inc. said they have called off talks aimed at merging
the two oil and natural-gas concerns after their financial
advisers weren't able to agree on an exchange ratio.
   Voyager and Poco proposed in March to merge, forming a
company that would have been one of Canada's top 12 oil and
natural gas producers. Independent committees of both
companies' boards were appointed to negotiate the terms and
conditions of a merger.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Further details of the breakdown in discussions weren't
disclosed, and spokesmen for the two companies couldn't be
reached for comment.
   Poco, 49%-owned by Toronto-based Corona Corp., a
gold-mining concern, has about 41.1 million shares
outstanding, while Voyager has about 26 million shares
outstanding. In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange Friday,
Poco shares closed at 7.50 Canadian dollars (US$6.54), up
12.5 Canadian cents, while Voyager shares closed at C$7.125,
up 50 Canadian cents.
   Poco had cited the merger as a chance to expand its
operations and achieve a critical mass in some areas of its
exploration and development activities. The two Calgary-based
companies are predominantly natural-gas producers, and both
have most of their assets in the province of Alberta.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0094
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0094.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Western Union Corp.
   Locks Out Workers
   Amid Contract Talks
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   WU LABOR
</CO>
<LP>
   UPPER SADDLE RIVER, N.J. (AP) -- Western Union Corp. on
Saturday locked out 2,000 employees in the middle of contract
talks with their union.
   The company did not indicate whether the workers would be
rehired if it signs a new contract with their union, the
Communications Workers of America, which represents a total
of 2,500 workers at Western Union.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Western Union said the replacements would not affect its
money-transfer, telex, electronic mail and paper-based
message services.
   "We sincerely regret that, in the absence of a union
contract, we have reluctantly had to take this defensive
action," said Robert J. Amman, Western Union president and
chief executive officer. "We cannot operate under the
ever-present threat of an employee strike while continuing to
bear the cost required to ensure that the company would
survive one."
   Western Union has a total of 3,400 employees. The CWA
represents operators, customer relations clerks, clerical
workers and field technicians.
   Dan Beckstead, the chief union negotiator, deplored the
lockout, saying the union had not given the company any
indication it intends to strike.
   "In fact, we told them we wanted to continue to negotiate
in an attempt to reach an agreement," Mr. Beckstead said. CWA
workers have authorized their leadership to call a strike.
   Western Union said many of the replaced CWA workers were
from its central telephone bureaus in Bridgeton, Miss., and
Reno, Nev.; its computer centers in Middletown, Va., and
Bridgeton.
   It temporarily replaced them with workers from Western
Union headquarters and trained temporary replacements, the
company said.
   The company has been negotiating with representatives of
the CWA since July 23. The previous two-year contract expired
Aug. 6, but management and union negotiators have continued
to meet to try to agree on a new pact.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0093
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0093.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Hillhaven Corp. to Buy
   Six Nursing Centers It
   Currently Is Operating
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C8
</SO>
<CO>
   HIL
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
CDS, INTEREST RATES, COMMERCIAL PAPER (FIN)
</IN>
<LP>
   TACOMA, Wash. -- Hillhaven Corp. said it will purchase for
$20.8 million six nursing centers in Kentucky that it
currently operates under leasing agreements.
   The transaction will be financed through an offering of
asset-backed commercial paper, a company spokesman said. The
transaction is subject to governmental and other approvals
and is expected to close before Oct. 31. The nursing centers
to be acquired have 800 beds, and the company reports a 98%
occupancy rate.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Hillhaven owns about one-third and leases the remainder of
342 long-term care facilities in 38 states. Hillhaven
provides care for 42,000 people and operates 24 retirement
communities as well as 116 retail and institutional
pharmacies in the U.S.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0092
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0092.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   JLG to Cut Work Force
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   JLGI
</CO>
<LP>
   MCCONNELLSBURG, Pa. -- JLG Industries Inc. said it will
cut its McConnellsburg plant work force by 150, as a result
of soft residential and commercial construction markets.
   There has already been a reduction of 135 workers over the
past several months at the company's domestic and foreign
facilities.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The maker of hydraulic machinery reported that its work
force after the reduction will total about 1,400, with 1,150
in the U.S. and 250 overseas.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0091
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0091.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Global View:
   Europe Tiptoes Into the Gulf
   ----
   By George Melloan
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A11
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST EUROP
</CO>
<LP>
   BRUSSELS -- What NATO governments do in response to Iraq's
invasion of Kuwait, said U.S. Secretary of State James Baker
here Friday, "has significance far beyond the situation in
the Gulf." Indeed it does. It will test whether Europeans
have the collective will to defend Europe's own interests or,
once again, will simply "let the Yanks do it."
   That in turn will have a bearing on whether NATO has any
future as a military alliance, and whether Europe's vaunted
ambitions for "political unity" have a ghost of a chance.
Many of Europe's politicians, it should be noted, were as
eager as many U.S. congresspersons for unilateral disarmament
and the "peace dividend" before Saddam grabbed Kuwait. No
European policy coordination was evident.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   After the invasion, European responses were mostly
tentative. Everyone condemned Iraq, but so has the rest of
the world. The only immediate substantive action came from
Margaret Thatcher, the least "European" of all of Europe's
leaders. She began dispatching planes, ships and troops to
the Gulf to bolster American, Turkish and Egyptian forces.
She was the only European to provide instant military
firepower as a counter to any temptation Saddam might have to
take advantage of his immediate numerical superiority.
   France and Germany -- where most of the talk of "political
unity" originates -- displayed very little of that unity.
France said it would dispatch one of its two Clemenceau-class
small carriers to the area. But since French forces are not
under NATO command, it is not clear how its ships and planes
will be teamed up with other naval and air forces.
   That mostly endangers French sailors, since protecting
ships from missiles requires close coordination of defensive
units. France has been Iraq's second most important arms
supplier, after the Soviet Union. It would be supreme irony
if one of its own ships were hit with one of the Exocet
missiles it has sold Saddam.
   The German government has had even more trouble making up
its mind. Statements from the offices of the chancellor and
the foreign minister have conflicted, but both have stressed
legal restrictions on "out-of-area" use of German forces. Not
even a hint of support came from Karsten Voight, spokesman
for the opposition Social Democrats, who said that German
troops have "no business" in the Gulf. Germans, too, have
provided lethal technology to the Arabs. Industrialist Jurgen
Hippenstiel-Imhausen was convicted in June of selling Libya
equipment that could be used to make poison gas.
   Italy, although it has a strong navy, couldn't even decide
whether to support the United Nations embargo on Iraqi oil.
The foreign ministry was quoted last Thursday as saying the
embargo is not "total" so far as Italy is concerned.
   Italy, Spain and Germany did quickly agree to let the U.S.
dispatch planes and forces from their NATO air bases. That's
at least progress from responses to past Middle East crises.
U.S. F-111s from England had to give the European continent a
wide berth, entailing a long flight and midair refueling,
when President Reagan dispatched them to punish Moammar
Gadhafi. The fact that most of Gadhafi's terrorism had been
conducted in Europe was deemed immaterial.
   Europe's NATO members traditionally have found it
convenient to turn a deaf ear to U.S. pleas that they help
deal with out-of-area security problems. When the Soviets and
Cuba were building up their Caribbean presence through the
construction of air bases on the island of Grenada and the
northeast coast of Nicaragua, U.S. admirals warned that there
were strategic implications for Europe as well as the U.S. A
lot of Europe's commerce flows through the Panama Canal and
the Caribbean. The allies weren't interested, so the U.S.
tackled that problem independently, encountering opposition
from German leftist supporters of Castro's Sandinista
proteges in Nicaragua.
   Going back to the late 1960s, some Americans still
remember needling from Britons -- "pity about Vietnam" -- at
a time when American troops were trying to halt the spread of
communism in Southeast Asia. British interests were just as
much jeopardized as American interests. It has been left up
to the Americans to combat Arab terrorism, even though much
of it was directed at Europe, because France, Italy and, to
some degree, Germany and England, didn't want to jeopardize
their commercial and political ties with Arab nations. As
Albert Wohlstetter and Fred Hoffman wrote in the Journal last
week, there also was ambivalence over whether Turkey, a NATO
member, would merit NATO support if it were attacked by Iraq
or Syria.
   Saddam Hussein's grab does not necessarily chuck all those
conflicting interests out the window. Judging from Karsten
Voight's statement, it won't instantly cause the European
left to embrace American leadership. But judging from the
overwhelming (83%) public support in the U.K. for Mrs.
Thatcher's dispatch of forces to the Gulf, it is likely that
Europe's priorities will undergo some change. Those big
tankers sailing into Rotterdam from the Persian Gulf every
day are a vital lifeline for Europe. Saddam Hussein surely
has exploded the myth that the only threat to Europe was from
a now-dismembered Warsaw Pact.
   Whether NATO is unified sufficiently to step up to
out-of-area threats has not been resolved, however. The
preference among most European leaders is for conduct of the
Persian Gulf military operation under the aegis of the United
Nations, or maybe the Western European Union. That would
preserve NATO's purity, but it would also guarantee its
ultimate extinction, since its single mission, to protect
Europe from a Soviet attack, suffers from diminishing
credibility.
   Such a demise would be a shame. One of the largely hidden
virtues of NATO has been that it has combined under a central
command the military forces of nations whose quarrels have
cost the world many millions of lives in this century. German
reunification should, if anything, emphasize the importance
of that. It also should give France second thoughts about
that now-outdated DeGaulle decision to keep France's forces
outside the unified command, although there is no sign of
such second thoughts. Finally, a credible NATO, capable of
agreeing quickly on a military response to out-of-area
crises, would deter future Saddams from jeopardizing European
and North American interests.
   But if Europe's leaders -- other than Mrs. Thatcher -- are
aware of all this, it hasn't been immediately obvious. With a
potentially effective military alliance already in place,
there will be continued speculation on alternative "security"
structures, such as the Committee for Security and
Cooperation in Europe (CSCE), of dubious value. As Mr. Baker
said, Europe faces some big decisions. And events are moving
fast.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0090
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0090.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Abreast of the Market:
   Comstock Partners Bets the Ranch on a Bear Market
   ----
   By Craig Torres
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C1
</SO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
STOCK INDEXES (NDX)
MUTUAL AND MONEY-MARKET FUNDS (FND)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Comstock Partners carries the bear's torch.
This year, it almost burned the house down.
   Since January, the trio of money managers has applied its
bet-the-ranch style in an investment theme that can be summed
up as: Sell (almost) everything.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Comstock Partners has been betting against the U.S. stock
market, real estate, the U.S. dollar, Treasury bonds, and the
Tokyo stock market. The firm even slapped this year's
stock-market darlings across the face: It sold growth stocks
short.
   All the firm owns are some energy and gold stocks, and
various countries' short-term government debt, including U.S.
Treasury bills.
   Less than two weeks ago, many would have regarded such a
position as outrageous. One of the Comstock Partners, Michael
Aronstein, mused in his office here recently: "We've been
bears in a bull market. If we're wrong here, we aren't only
going to be laughing stocks, we will be out of the investment
management business {by} this time next year."
   Comstock's midyear performance was so bad that one client
couldn't stomach it anymore. In June, a state pension fund
yanked its $35 million out of Comstock's private money
management business, and walked away. The Dreyfus Capital
Value Fund, which the partners manage, limped 10.37
percentage points behind Standard &amp; Poor's 500-stock index at
the end of June, according to Morningstar Inc.
   But a turnaround may be at hand. By Aug. 3, the fund
snapped back to lag the S&amp;P by just four percentage points,
Morningstar says. And the Dow Jones Industrial Average's
280-point dive from a record high, the indigestion in the
bond market and the dollar's fragility have made Comstock
Partners' strategy look less radical, if not undeniably
smarter.
   Though Mr. Aronstein and his partners, Stanley Salvigsen
and Charles Minter, aren't planning to send a thank-you note
to Saddam Hussein, plunging stock and bond prices following
Iraq's invasion of Kuwait have been incredibly fortuitous for
them. As Mr. Aronstein prefers to put it, exploding oil
prices merely called to everybody's attention the fractures
in the stock and bond markets that were already evident to
guess who.
   With the outlook far from clear, and the bulls slightly
stunned, however, it's time for Comstock Partners to tell its
story. It's not a pretty tale. As Louis Markatos, portfolio
manager at IDS Financial Services says: "They articulate the
risks in the system as well as anybody. If {these risks}
materialize, we're in deep" trouble.
   Comstock Partners' hobbyhorse for the past 10 years has
been a series of prophetic calls, always accompanied by
high-rolling bets, on speculative booms and deflations. They
made their predictions in more than a dozen reports with such
provocative titles as "32nds Over Tokyo," "Homesick" and
"That Ain't Mud On Your Boots, Partner."
   The way Comstock sees it, as long as deflationary debacles
were isolated in sectors -- such as real estate or precious
metals -- credit, which fuels all investment, could be
quickly funneled into the next arena of speculative activity
-- the stock market, for example.
   In 1982 when the banking system groaned under loads of bad
farm and Third World debt, the Federal Reserve cut interest
rates by increasing the money supply. Some of that money
rushed into stocks. Though a recession was in progress, the
S&amp;P index finished 1982 with a 14.76% gain.
   As long as some sector within the broad economy was in
decline, and credit was flowing freely, interest rates stayed
relatively low and sometimes fell rapidly, rewarding
bondholders and usually lifting stocks.
   The same script is in play for 1990, according to the
stock-market bulls. One of them, Roger Engemann, a
growth-stock manager in Pasadena, Calif., says, "So what if
there's a recession? Interest rates would plummet and the
stock market would go straight up." In an Aug. 6 letter to
clients headlined "Buy Now]" Mr. Engemann notes that past
years of declining corporate profits haven't always resulted
in negative returns on stocks. A chart he produced shows that
in only one of the past six recessions did the S&amp;P index have
a down year; that was 1957.
   But Comstock Partners argues that the 1990s will be "a
whole new ball game." Federal safety nets have been thrown
under credit-shaky sectors, such as savings and loans. Now, a
downturn in the economy will give the government a growing
list of defaults to deal with, from student loans to real
estate. Instead of allowing bad debts to pass naturally, if
painfully, into extinction, the government keeps their
carcasses breathing with the life-support apparatus of
federal debt. With each new default, a government bond is
born.
   "The workings of this mechanism whereby the government
borrows to pay for a useless asset a second time means that
deflation now leads to a heightened pace of debt issuance
rather than liquidation," the partners write in a report
entitled "The Plumber Never Flushes Twice."
   A recession, Comstock Partners concludes, will produce a
sharp, devastating rise in interest rates, rather than a
decline. And that means the next investment vehicles in line
for deflation are stocks and bonds, which is why Comstock
Partners is staying clear of just about every investment
except cash.
   "Interest rates aren't going to go down despite all the
problems, so stocks are overvalued," Mr. Aronstein says.
"We've shorted a lot" of stocks -- meaning Comstock sold
borrowed shares in anticipation of price declines, hoping to
replace them later more cheaply.
   Mr. Aronstein derides hopes for lower interest rates and
rising stock prices this year as believing in "the liquidity
fairy." He adds: "Corporate profits are inflated by credit
and deflated by stagnation of credit. If people can't borrow,
their spending power is limited." As a result, he says,
consumer-related growth stocks are in for a sharp
re-evaluation.
   "What we're saying is that the overhang of debt service
has taken its toll across the society," Mr. Aronstein says.
"And the government, which has been the freest and easiest in
the world with other people's money, will be disciplined by
the market."
   Though their self-confidence seems abundant, following
their instincts has produced some harrowing experiences for
the partners. With returns up about 40% in August 1987, the
group started dumping their stock positions and buying bonds.
Bonds fell, and losses mounted. Then Black Monday came, and
all of a sudden Comstock looked as smooth as a toreador
sidestepping a stuck bull. The Capital Value Fund finished up
34.45% in 1987, according to Morningstar, beating the S&amp;P
index by 29.23 percentage points.
   By December 1988, the partners were foretelling a major
collapse of the junk bond market. Predicting a flight to
high-quality debt, they started buying U.S. Treasury bonds
until eventually they owned about 2% of all the $140 billion
of long-term government debt then outstanding. They sold
short several junk bond mutual funds, betting their prices
would fall. That paid off in a 25.31% return on the Dreyfus
fund for 1989, which was 6.36 percentage points behind the
S&amp;P but an enviable performance among money managers.
   "We're just going to do what we think is right," says Mr.
Aronstein about the firm's latest bet. He adds: "We commit to
extremes. If we go out, it will be like {tightrope walker}
Karl Wallenda -- 110 feet out onto the hood of a car."
   ---
   Friday's Market Activity
                                                                                                       

   Stocks moved broadly and sharply lower as few buyers
wanted to acquire stocks at the start of what might have been
a crucial weekend in the Middle East crisis.
   The Dow Jones Industrial Average, which had climbed a
total of 48.27 points in the two prior sessions as investors
bargain-hunted, retreated 42.33 to 2716.58. Trading slowed to
145,340,000 shares on the New York Stock Exchange from
155,810,000 shares Thursday.
   For the week, the industrial average fell 93.07 -- the
second largest weekly point loss so far this year -- or 3.3%;
it was the fourth consecutive weekly decline, the longest
losing streak in about 21 months. During these four weeks,
the average has fallen 263.62 points, or 8.8%.
   The S&amp;P 500 and the Dow Jones Equity Market indexes each
fell 2.7% last week, while the Big Board composite index
dropped 2.5%.
   Concerns about the possible escalation of hostilities in
the Middle East translated into buying of precious-metals
stocks, usually a safe haven for investors in uncertain
periods. Placer Dome rose 7/8 to 17 7/8 in Big Board
composite trading of 1.6 million shares, American Barrick
Resources rose 1 3/4 to 21 7/8, Battle Mountain Gold rose 3/4
to 12 5/8, Hecla Mining added 1/2 to 12 1/4 and
   Homestake Mining climbed 1 1/2 to 21 7/8.
   Selected oil stocks also rallied amid the market's retreat
as the Persian Gulf situation pushed oil prices higher;
Chevron gained 1 1/8 to 78; Phillips Petroleum gained 7/8 to
29 1/2, and Unocal rose 1/2 to 32. But Exxon slid 1/4 to 51
5/8 on 1.3 million shares; Texaco closed up 1/4 at 63 1/8,
and Mobil closed unchanged at 65 7/8.
   McDermott International dropped 3/8 to 32 5/8 after
reporting that its loss for the June quarter was more than
double the year-earlier level, but most oil field-services
issues rose. Global Marine gained 3/8 to 5 7/8 on 2.1 million
shares; Schlumberger rose 1/8 to 66 1/8; Baker Hughes added
3/4 to 32 7/8, and Halliburton went up 1/4 to 56 1/4.
   Blue-chip issues, especially the growth stocks that had
fueled the market's two-day rebound, were hit hardest. Boeing
went down 1 1/4 to 53 1/4 on 1.8 million shares; Philip
Morris fell 5/8 to 45 7/8; Wal-Mart Stores was off 3/4 to 29
7/8, and Waste Management dropped 1 5/8 to 38 1/4.
   Eli Lilly, hit with another lawsuit in connection with its
antidepressant drug Prozac, fell 2 3/4 to 75 1/4 on 1.3
million shares.
   Among other drug stocks, Merck dropped 1 1/4 to 84 3/4;
Johnson &amp; Johnson fell 3/4 to 66 1/8, and Warner-Lambert lost
1 7/8 to 63 1/8. Schering-Plough slid 1/2 to 46 1/2; the
company halted world-wide registration and marketing of a
hypertension drug, citing "isolated cases of liver toxicity"
in users.
   United Telecommunications rose 7/8 to 26 1/4 on 3.1
million shares amid takeover rumors, fueled by a television
report citing General Electric and BellSouth as potential
suitors. Officials at United Telecom and BellSouth couldn't
be reached for comment, according to Dow Jones Professional
Investor Report; GE declined to comment.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0089
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0089.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Canadian Steel Ingot Output
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   CANDA
</CO>
<IN>
STEEL MANUFACTURERS (STL)
</IN>
<LP>
   OTTAWA -- Canadian steel ingot production totaled 175,432
metric tons in the week ended Aug. 4, down 31% from 254,057
tons in the preceding week and down 43% from 305,149 tons a
year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.
   A metric ton equals 2,204.6 pounds. Cumulative output this
year is 8,437,013 metric tons, down 11% from 9,474,296 metric
tons a year earlier.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0088
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0088.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Chiefs of Two Thrifts
   In Puerto Rico Resign
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   PFBS FFPR WNEWS
</CO>
<LP>
   The chief executives at two large and troubled thrifts in
Puerto Rico resigned Friday.
   In Ponce, Ramiro L. Colon Jr. stepped down as president
and chief executive officer of Ponce Federal Bank. Mr. Colon,
who has been affiliated with the thrift for over 30 years,
will continue as chairman of the board during an interim
management transition period, the thrift said.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Ponce Federal said that, subject to regulatory approval,
Hans H. Hertell, an attorney in Puerto Rico and
public-interest director of the Federal Home Loan Bank of New
York, was named its president and chief operating officer to
succeed Mr. Colon.
   Separately, Mariano J. Mier resigned as chairman,
president and chief executive officer of First Federal
Savings Bank of Puerto Rico, based in San Juan, the thrift
said.
   First Federal said in a statement that Angel Alvarez Perez
was named acting president and chief executive and German
Malaret was named as the new chairman. Officials at First
Federal Savings couldn't be reached to comment on the
executive changes.
   Two other top officers at First Federal also resigned last
week: Arturo J. Somohano, former senior executive vice
president and chief operating officer, and Fernando Ochoa,
former senior vice president for investments.
   Both thrifts have been under the close scrutiny of federal
thrift regulators because of troubled loan portfolios.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0087
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0087.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Nippondenso of Japan
   And a Unit of Fiat
   Plan U.K. Venture
   ----
   Special to The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3D
</SO>
<CO>
   J.NND TOYOY I.MMI FIA
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
AUTO PARTS AND EQUIPMENT INCLUDING TIRES (AUP)
</IN>
<LP>
   TOKYO -- Nippondenso Co. said it and Italy's Magneti
Marelli S.p.A. agreed to establish a joint venture to produce
car air conditioners in Britain and to exchange shares in two
subsidiaries.
   The two companies will form the joint venture to pursue
market opportunities in the quickly developing European
market, the Japanese company said.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Nippondenso is the second-largest member of the Toyota
group and is 23.3%-owned by Toyota Motor Corp. Milan-based
Magneti Marelli is 60%-owned by Fiat S.p.A.
   Nippondenso will hold 75% of the joint venture, and
Magneti Marelli the remainder.
   The new firm is to be located in Shropshire and
capitalized at an initial investment of around #65 million
($121.4 million). The two parents aim for it to turn out
400,000 units each of automotive air conditioners and heaters
by 1995, Nippondenso said.
   Under the agreement, Nippondenso also will acquire 25% of
Magneti Marelli's Borletti Climatizzazione S.r.l. unit, which
makes air conditioners and heaters in Italy, while Magneti
Marelli will take 25% in Nippondenso's ND Marston Ltd., a
maker of radiators in the U.K.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0086
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0086.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Amsouth Bancorp.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   ASO WNEWS
</CO>
<LP>
   AMSOUTH BANCORP. (Birmingham, Ala.) -- Dan L. Hendley will
resign as vice chairman of this Southeast banking company and
will step down as president and chief operating officer of
its subsidiary, Amsouth Bank N.A. Mr. Hendley, 52 years old,
said he was resigning to pursue other business interests. No
specific date was given for the resignation, and no successor
was named.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0085
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0085.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Outlook:
   If a Recession Comes,
   Trends to Expect
   ----
   By Alfred L. Malabre Jr.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<IN>
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Economists remain divided over whether the
economy is entering a recession. Forecasters who believe a
recession is at hand have increased sharply since Iraq
invaded Kuwait. However, most analysts still look for
recession-free but very sluggish growth in coming months.
Forty-nine economists polled late last week by Blue Chip
Economic Indicators, a newsletter, on average expect the
economy to expand at annual rates of 1.4% this quarter and
0.9% next quarter, with brisker, accelerating gains in 1991.
   It is too early to know whether the Blue Chip consensus is
right. Much will depend on events in the Middle East and
their impact on oil prices. It is not too soon, however, to
try to gauge economic developments if the consensus is wrong
and a recession takes hold.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   If a new recession is arriving, these developments very
likely will be full-blown by the time the recession is
plainly evident. The 1973-75 recession began in November
1973, but as late as August 1974 Arthur F. Burns, the Federal
Reserve chairman, was assuring Congress that the economy was
expanding.
   The National Bureau of Economic Research, the official
arbiter of when recessions start and end, bases its calls on
dozens of statistics, many of which appear months after the
fact and then are revised and revised. The economy can be in
a recession a year or more by the time the nonprofit group
announces the fact.
                                                                                                       

   While recessions are hard to spot, they also can be hard
to stop. There is a widespread assumption that a prompt
easing of the monetary reins by the Federal Reserve will
prevent or mitigate an incipient recession. But monetary
policy is a blunt, slow-acting tool.
                                                                                                       

   In the 1981-82 recession, which began in July 1981, the
money supply -- broadly defined to include most savings and
adjusted for inflation -- started to expand at the very start
of the recession and continued to do so. Yet, the slump
persisted for 16 months and brought the highest joblessness
of the post-World War II era. Moreover, most interest rates
fell throughout the 1981-82 recession. Over its course, the
average prime rate of banks dropped from nearly 21% to less
than 12% and the average yield on new issues of high-grade
corporate bonds fell from nearly 17% to about 12%. There were
similar trends in earlier recessions.
   If a recession sets in, the federal budget deficit,
already huge and growing, will probably increase sharply,
whatever happens in the Middle East. This invariably has
occurred in recent recessions. It reflects two recessionary
patterns: rising relief spending as unemployment spreads and
declining tax revenues as incomes erode.
   As the 1981-82 recession began, the budget deficit was
running at an annual rate of about $50 billion and when the
recession ended the deficit rate topped $200 billion. When
the 1973-75 recession started, the deficit rate was under $2
billion and when it ended the rate exceeded $8 billion. A
fourfold increase in the current budget deficit would push
the level of red ink up close to $800 billion, a daunting
amount.
                                                                                                       

   The civilian unemployment rate climbed to 5.5% last month
from 5.2% in June. Though the rise was considerable, far
sharper increases are probable if a recession sets in. The
jobless rate rose from about 7% to nearly 11% over the course
of the 1981-82 recession and from less than 5% to about 9%
during the 1973-75 slump.
                                                                                                       

   While unemployment invariably rises over the course of a
recession, corporate profits typically decline sharply. In
the 1981-82 recession, after-tax profits fell nearly 30% to
an annual rate of $104 billion.
   Not surprisingly, share prices also declined, but only in
the first year of the recession. With the approach of
economic recovery, the stock market turned up and in fact was
generally higher at the end of the recession than at its
start. The stock market, it should be added, is among the key
leading indicators that forecasters monitor to anticipate
turning points in the business cycle.
   Recessions vary greatly in length and severity. There have
been eight since World War II. The average length comes to 11
months, but the range runs from 16 months down to six. At the
end of the 10-month recession of 1953-54, the unemployment
rate was as low as 5.9%, compared to 10.8% at the end of the
far longer 1981-82 slump.
                                                                                                       

   There appears to be no clear relationship between the
magnitude of each period of economic expansion and the
subsequent recession. The 1981-82 recession followed a feeble
expansion that lasted only 12 months, the shortest in 60
years. The recession of 1969-70 lasted 11 months and the
unemployment rate was only 5.9% when the slump hit bottom.
Yet, the preceding expansion endured 106 months, longer than
any other upturn in the business cycle's 136-year history.
                                                                                                       

   Economists disagree over how severe a new recession would
be, if one materializes. The Middle East remains a huge
imponderable, but other considerations can be weighed.
Forecasters who anticipate at worst a modest slump tend to
discount the depressing effect of debt levels and voice
confidence in the Fed's ability to induce recovery promptly.
Analysts who foresee a severe downturn generally worry more
about debt and place less faith in the Fed's efficacy.
   The record, on balance, seems to support the more
pessimistic view. So let us hope -- but by no means assume --
that the recession-free consensus of the Blue Chip
forecasters is correct.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0084
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0084.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Iraq, Kuwait Boosted
   Crude Sales to U.S.
   Before Restrictions
   ----
   Special to The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Thirty supertankers, each carrying one million
to 2.5 million barrels of Iraqi and Kuwaiti crude oil, will
arrive in the U.S. over the next week, suggesting that Iraq
and Kuwait had sold substantially more crude than previously
estimated to the U.S. before an embargo was imposed Aug. 2.
   The oil was loaded and shipped before the embargo, and
therefore can't be turned away from their destinations at
ports in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico. In addition, U.S. Customs
officials in the region said Friday that many more ships are
expected to follow close behind throughout the month.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The number of ships suggests that Iraq and Kuwait had sold
substantially more crude oil for delivery to the U.S. in
August and September than the approximately 800,000 barrels a
day of imports that the U.S. Energy Department estimates the
two Persian Gulf producers averaged from January to May 1989.
   Assuming the ships are of a median size of 1.75 million
barrels and averaging the volumes over 30 days, imports of
Iraqi and Kuwaiti crude would total together about 1.75
million barrels a day over that period.
   It isn't clear, however, whether buyers were expecting
such elevated volumes to continue or whether those countries
simply made substantial sales in advance of the last
Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries meeting, when
the group agreed to cut its output to a new ceiling of 22.5
million barrels a day.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0083
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0083.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   UAW Official Says
   `True Job Security'
   Is Key to Contract
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   LABOR C GM
</CO>
<IN>
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
</IN>
<LP>
   TRAVERSE CITY, Mich. -- A top United Auto Workers union
official said the union would moderate its pay demands and
back three-shift production schemes at Big Three assembly
plants in exchange for "true job security."
   "I think management is right that they need more
flexibility to keep their plants running at capacity and to
keep jobs in this country," Stan Marshall, the UAW vice
president leading the union's negotiations with Chrysler
Corp., said Friday at an industry conference here.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But Mr. Marshall said the union has no interest in
Chrysler's proposal to pay UAW members with stock in exchange
for wage and work-practice concessions. He also said the
union isn't interested in Chrysler's proposal to pay
employees at certain factories for achieving specific
productivity goals, such as reducing absenteeism or improving
quality.
   Chrysler officials had no comment on Mr. Marshall's
remarks. Both General Motors Corp. and Chrysler have made
union approval of three-shift production a major objective of
their current national contract negotiations with the UAW.
   Analysts say expanding vehicle production over three
shifts from two could yield as much as $200 million more a
year in gross profits from a plant building a popular model.
GM credits three-shift work schedules for helping to produce
record profits in the past three years at its European
operations.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0082
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0082.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology:
   Phoenix Laser Systems Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   PXLS
</CO>
<IN>
MEDICAL SUPPLIES (MDS)
</IN>
<LP>
   SAN FRANCISCO -- Phoenix Laser Systems Inc. said that
human clinical trials for its ophthalmic workstation have
begun at the Barraquer Institute in Bogota, Colombia.
   The workstation is a self-contained unit that combines
on-line diagnostic measurement, advanced laser beam
positioning, high-speed tissue tracking and therapeutic
devices for the precise control of laser surgery.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The tests are under the guidance of a team of doctors from
the institute, the Horatio Ferrer Institute in Miami and the
Pacific Presbyterian Medical Center in San Francisco.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0081
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0081.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Complaining Comic:
   Paramount's Problems
   With Eddie Murphy
   Sour Honey of a Deal
   ---
   Star Says Studio Underpays,
   Misuses Him; It Wonders
   If He's Worth the Trouble
   ---
   Big Tab for Full-Time Cronies
   ----
   By Laura Landro
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<CO>
   PCI DIS TWX
</CO>
<IN>
RECREATION, ENTERTAINMENT, TOYS, MOVIES, PHOTOGRAPHY, SPORTS (REC)
</IN>
<LP>
   When Paramount Pictures signed its exclusive five-picture
contract with Eddie Murphy in 1983, it agreed to pay the star
comedian a then-astonishing $3 million per movie -- quite a
nice raise from the $200,000 it gave him for his first hit,
"48 Hours."
   He was "ecstatic," Mr. Murphy recalled in a recent court
deposition. "I thought I was the king of the hill." Paramount
has renegotiated his contract three times since then. It now
is obligated to pay him $9 million per movie up front against
a guaranteed 15% of each picture's gross revenue -- and for
his most recent film, "Another 48 Hours," he reportedly was
paid about $12 million up front.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But the 29-year-old doesn't feel so ecstatic or rich
anymore. Mr. Murphy now is believed to want between $15
million and $18 million per movie up front. He is mighty
steamed at reports that Sylvester Stallone and Arnold
Schwarzenegger are commanding up to $20 million. And he is
upset that many of what he considers Hollywood's best acting
roles and hottest scripts aren't being offered to him or
developed for him by Paramount.
   Thus while the exclusive contract that ties Mr. Murphy to
Paramount doesn't expire until he completes two more films,
the battle for Mr. Murphy's future services is already on. It
is one that could spark a new round of inflation in
Hollywood, where many say costs have already gotten out of
control. Studios like Walt Disney Co. are circling like
buzzards around Mr. Murphy, most claiming privately that
Paramount has mishandled its star property.
   For Paramount, the stakes are high. Its relationship with
Mr. Murphy has, on the whole, been the most lucrative in
modern Hollywood history, bringing in more than $1 billion in
revenue world-wide since 1982 for the subsidiary of Paramount
Communications Inc. The studio has come under attack in
Hollywood recently for focusing too heavily on marketing and
not enough on creative development, and losing one of its
major assets could be a further blow to its image.
   But Mr. Murphy's movies are increasingly costly to make,
his entourage increasingly more demanding and expensive, and
his managers, according to Paramount insiders, more
obstructionist and uncooperative. His 1989 movie "Harlem
Nights," which Mr. Murphy insisted on making against the
studio's advice, is likely to break even at best for
Paramount.
   Mark Manson, an entertainment-industry analyst at
Donaldson Lufkin &amp; Jenrette Inc., says that an Eddie Murphy
movie "may be a guarantee of revenue, but it is not a
guarantee of profit."
   Internal Paramount documents and depositions taken during
the "Coming to America" trial, in which syndicated columnist
Art Buchwald has sued Paramount over profits from that film,
show how tough it is to manage the megastar.
   In his deposition in that case, for example, Mr. Murphy
described his Paramount deal with an expletive and dubbed it
the "worst" in Hollywood, even though one of his managers
admitted in court testimony that the contract is probably
"one of the best deals in town."
   Mr. Murphy's Paramount deal is virtually the only such
large-scale, exclusive arrangement in town. Many big stars,
such as Messrs. Stallone and Schwarzenegger, are themselves
forgoing exclusive deals in order to sell their latest
projects to the highest bidder.
   On the other hand, a deal with one studio can be
comforting, particularly to someone like Mr. Murphy, who
likes to maintain a very large staff when he's shooting --
and even when he's not.
   Paramount houses Mr. Murphy's companies in one of the
choicest buildings on its lot and pays his considerable
overhead, including the year-round salaries of the 50-plus
employees of Mr. Murphy's movie and television companies.
While shooting "Coming to America," Paramount spent an
additional $600,000 or so on the salaries and living expenses
of a half-dozen relatives and cronies, a valet, a personal
trainer, a 24-hour limousine and driver, and a luxury
motorhome and driver for Mr. Murphy, not to mention such
sundry items as a $235.33 tab at McDonald's.
   A lucrative, multiple-picture deal also might be
reassuring to someone whose latest projects have come in for
some nasty notices from critics and haven't performed as well
at the box office as some previous efforts.
   "Like many superstars, Eddie Murphy may have gotten so
tangled up in the myths and myopia of high-power movie-making
that he can't get back to the gritty, pungent,
kick-in-the-throat awareness earlier audiences loved," said a
scathing review of "Harlem Nights" in the Los Angeles Times.
Mr. Murphy hasn't fared much better in his latest effort;
Newsweek dismissed "Another 48 Hours" as "atrocious" and Time
magazine declared him "the late great Eddie Murphy . . . now
missing and presumed dead."
   Regardless of the reviews, virtually every other studio in
Hollywood would like to sign Mr. Murphy up. One of those is
Disney and its chief, Jeffrey Katzenberg, who as an executive
at Paramount in the early 1980s helped oversee Mr. Murphy's
early meteoric rise, and who has been unofficially wooing the
star ever since joining Disney in 1984. Personal friends, the
two frequently dine or play tennis and discuss Mr. Murphy's
career. Mr. Katzenberg declines to comment, but Hollywood
agents say Disney is quietly developing about 10 scripts with
Mr. Murphy in mind.
   Another prime suitor is Time Warner Inc.'s Warner Bros.
subsidiary. Warner has formed a company with Murphy pal
Quincy Jones, who flew the actor on one of Warner's planes to
the company's Acapulco beach house recently.
   Paramount has said it will take immediate legal action if
any rivals formally approach Mr. Murphy now. The star's
managers stress that no negotiations can begin until 30 days
after Mr. Murphy completes two more movies, which could be a
year or more away.
   "Eddie will end up going to the studio that makes him the
best offer," says co-manager Mark Lipsky. "Paramount has
treated him well and we hope Paramount will be in the ball
game." Mr. Murphy declined to be interviewed, saying only, "I
have two films remaining on my contract with Paramount. When
I have completed my work, I will fully examine my options."
   Paramount's only comment: "The company has had a long and
successful collaboration with Mr. Murphy and would like to
extend it under mutually beneficial terms." Paramount this
month rehired David Kirkpatrick, who worked closely with Mr.
Murphy before leaving the studio in 1985, and was most
recently at Disney. Insiders say in recent years there has
been no operating executive with close ties to the Murphy
camp.
   Controlling virtually every aspect of Mr. Murphy's
business life, including screening all movie projects before
they are shown to the star, is contentious attorney Robert
Wachs. Mr. Wachs, who helped give Mr. Murphy his big break at
Mr. Wachs's part-owned Comic Strip club in New York several
years ago, and co-manager Mr. Lipsky each get 5% of Mr.
Murphy's earnings and each own 25% of Eddie Murphy
Productions; the actor owns 50%. Mr. Wachs also manages talk
show host Arsenio Hall, a friend of Mr. Murphy's, but Mr.
Hall is negotiating to cut most of his ties with Mr. Wachs.
   Mr. Wachs, who declined to comment for this article,
admitted in his "Coming to America" court testimony that he
often immediately rejects things that are submitted after a
quick glance. He said in his "Coming to America" deposition
that he gets hundreds of movie ideas and often gives a
"cursory `no we're not interested'" without explaining why.
   Some of these indeed seem to need no explanation,
including scripts such as "Cyrano de Boogie," "Black
Musketeer," "A Black Yankee at the Court of Queen Liz," and
"Count Cool and The Knights of the Round Table."
   In fact, Messrs. Wachs's and Murphy's biggest complaint is
that Paramount isn't bringing Mr. Murphy the kind of
imaginative scripts he deserves. "I've pretty much had to
develop my own stuff the last three, four years," Mr. Murphy
has testified.
   International Creative Management recently signed a new
agreement with Mr. Murphy that lasts only until his current
deal with Paramount ends. Mr. Wachs is equally displeased
with the efforts of Mr. Murphy's agents at ICM, who Mr. Wachs
testified "just ride the wave" of Mr. Murphy's success
without bringing him creative ideas.
   Mr. Wachs testified, for example, that neither ICM nor
Paramount initially thought of Mr. Murphy for "The Golden
Child," a script ICM sold to a producer, who brought it to
Paramount with Mel Gibson in mind. ICM declined to comment.
Mr. Wachs said he heard about the script one night when he
was telling Mr. Kirkpatrick the kind of movie Eddie wanted to
do next. "He told me they had a movie like that but they had
never thought about it for us," Mr. Wachs said in his
deposition.
   Mr. Murphy immediately agreed to do the movie, about a
social worker hired to locate a Tibetan child with magical
powers who has been kidnapped by an evil modern-day sorcerer,
which sold about $80 million in tickets in the U.S., and cost
about $30.2 million to produce.
   Paramount executives argue that they always have 20 to 30
projects for Mr. Murphy in development at any one time. And
some Paramount insiders and others contend that neither Mr.
Wachs nor Mr. Murphy have proved a hotbed of creativity or
good judgment lately.
   Mr. Murphy is said to be furious that he wasn't shown the
script for the hit Paramount movie "Ghost," starring Patrick
Swayze. But people familiar with the script say it was given
to Mr. Wachs and others in the Murphy camp who rejected it.
   Mr. Murphy recently hired his own development executive,
but by his own admission the actor often loses interest in
projects or lets them simmer for years. One idea of his own
he's been toying with on and off for about five years is
"Satan's Key," an idea that he said came to him after reading
Dante's Inferno. His description of that idea, contained in
his deposition, didn't exactly reflect five years of
development: "In a nutshell, guy dies, goes to hell, and
tries to escape."
   And the star's detractors say he has surrounded himself
with a coterie of yes-men, buddies and family members who
rarely try to persuade him to do something he or Mr. Wachs
isn't immediately enthusiastic about.
   Tensions between Paramount and the Murphy camp have
escalated recently over "Another 48 Hours." Although it
opened to a respectable $19.4 million, the Murphy camp
accused Paramount of not spending enough on advertising and
hurting the movie by changing its release date. In response
to a letter from a Paramount executive defending the
company's promotion campaign and noting that the star did
little to promote the movie, Mr. Murphy shot back a withering
letter telling the executive in essence what he could do with
his missive.
   This follows the tensions created by "Coming to America,"
which cast an embarrassing spotlight on the Paramount-Murphy
relationship and led some to conclude it won't survive, at
least in its present form. In January, a Los Angeles Superior
Court ruled that the columnist Mr. Buchwald had provided the
story idea for "Coming to America" and was therefore entitled
to be paid part of the proceeds. The second stage of the
trial, due to begin soon, will determine how much, if
anything, Paramount must pay Mr. Buchwald.
   But as long as Mr. Murphy and Mr. Wachs stay together, it
isn't clear that a close relationship with another major
studio is in the offing. Mr. Wachs seems determined to
maintain his complete control over Mr. Murphy's movie career
and may resist the activist approach taken by the likes of
Disney's Mr. Katzenberg, who has helped resuscitate the
careers of stars Bette Midler and Richard Dreyfus. In his
court deposition, Mr. Wachs said he had a problem with Mr.
Katzenberg in his Paramount days "when he tried to manage
Eddie instead of me."
   Meanwhile, the search for Eddie Murphy material goes on at
Paramount. One possible script is "Fountain of Youth" about
two old con men who grow younger. But an on-again, off-again
"Beverly Hills Cop III" appears to be permanently off, in
part because it would cost too much, and because no one has
been able to come up with a good script. And Mr. Murphy also
has said he doesn't want to be pigeonholed as the Axel Foley
character from "Cop."
   Under Mr. Murphy's agreement with Paramount, another "Cop"
wouldn't even count as one of the two more movies he is
obligated to do under his contract. Although the newly
returned Mr. Kirkpatrick is hard at work on projects for the
actor, and has been squiring Mr. Murphy around to meet with
some of Hollywood's hottest directors and writers, there's
nothing firm on the horizon. While praising Mr. Kirkpatrick's
recent efforts, Mr. Lipsky, the star's co-manager, says,
"We're all looking, but to date we just haven't found
anything that Eddie's excited about."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0080
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0080.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   North Carolina Sues Exxon
   Over Run-Up in Gas Prices
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B3
</SO>
<CO>
   XON
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
OIL, INTEGRATED MAJORS (OIL)
</IN>
<LP>
   RALEIGH, N.C. -- Following public outcry about the huge
run-up in gasoline prices, the state attorney general filed
suit against Exxon Corp., alleging deceptive trade practices.
   While a number of states have said they would pursue
investigations into allegations of price-gouging and
profiteering by major oil companies after the Iraqi invasion
of Kuwait, it is believed this is the first suit following
the big gasoline price increases.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   North Carolina charged that Exxon raised its wholesale
gasoline prices to distributors by as much as six cents a
gallon after contracting to sell that gasoline at a lower
price. In some cases, the state alleges, distributors had
made deliveries to service stations before learning of the
increase in prices.
   An Exxon spokesman in Houston declined to comment on the
suit.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0079
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0079.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Coca-Cola Venture
   To Spend $187 Million
   For New Plant in U.K.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C10
</SO>
<CO>
   KO CADBY
</CO>
<IN>
BEVERAGES (BVG)
</IN>
<LP>
   ATLANTA -- Coca-Cola Co., seeking to build its
fast-growing business in Britain, said its British joint
venture plans to invest $187 million to build a new
soft-drink plant.
   The joint venture, Coca-Cola &amp; Schweppes Beverages Ltd.,
is 49%-owned by Coca-Cola and 51%-owned by Cadbury Schweppes
PLC.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The plant, to be completed in the spring of 1992, will be
located in southern England, possibly in Banbury or
Northampton.
   The announcement of the new plant comes on the heels of
the opening of another plant the joint venture recently
completed in Wakefield, in northern England. The Wakefield
plant is the largest soft-drink production facility in
Europe. Like the Wakefield plant, the new facility will
produce soft drinks in plastic bottles and cans.
   Coca-Cola will need the extra plant capacity, according to
a spokesman, to keep up with growing demand. Unlike the U.S.,
where the soft-drink market is more mature and limped along
at a 2.5% growth rate last year, industry soda volumes in the
U.K. jumped 13%. And sales of Coke products in that country
are growing at double to triple that rate, the spokesman
said.
   The joint venture's job is to boost consumption levels by
making soft drinks more available in restaurants, vending
machines and grocery stores, and by generating advertising to
increase public awareness of the products.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0078
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0078.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   SmithKline Beecham Suit
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B3
</SO>
<CO>
   SBE
</CO>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
</GV>
<LP>
   PHILADELPHIA -- SmithKline Beecham Corp. said a federal
judge here gave preliminary approval to a proposed $22
million settlement of a class-action suit brought by
shareholders in 1988.
   The company, which denied any liability or law violation,
said the proposed settlement approved by Judge Robert
Gawthrop III is subject to final court approval at an Oct. 3
hearing. SmithKline said it was settling to "eliminate the
burden and expense of litigation." The shareholders alleged
that SmithKline officials delayed disclosure of
pharmaceutical sales trends that would have hurt the
company's stock price.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0077
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0077.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Cardis Loss Shrank
   In Fiscal 4th Period;
   Sales Declined 1.9%
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3D
</SO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
</IN>
<LP>
   CERRITOS, Calif. -- Cardis Corp., which late last year
emerged from its Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law reorganization,
reported that its fourth-quarter net loss narrowed to $1.1
million, or 11 cents a share, from a net loss of $13.8
million, or $1.26 a share, a year ago.
   The wholesale distributor of automotive parts, supplies,
and accessories, said improved operating results reflect
reduced interest expense since it was not charged on debt
deferred by its Chapter 11 bankruptcy.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Cardis said that the year-ago net loss included a loss
from discontinued operations of $4.1 million, an
extraordinary loss from debt restructuring and its
reorganization of $1.7 million, and a gain from an accounting
change of $3.7 million.
   Cardis reported the loss on a 1.9% decline in sales to
$21.2 million from $21.6 million a year earlier.
   For the year ended April 30, the company reported an
operating loss of $3 million, or 28 cents a share, compared
with an operating loss of $22.2 million, or $2.03 a share, a
year ago. In the current year, an extraordinary gain from
debt restructuring and reorganization of $67.9 million made
net income $64.9 million, or $5.92 a share. In the previous
year, a loss from discontinued operations of $5 million, an
extraordinary loss of $1.7 million, and a gain of $3.7
million from an accounting change, gave the company a net
loss of $25.3 million, or $2.31 a share.
   Cardis reported a 9.5% drop in sales to $84.8 million from
last year's $93.7 million.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0076
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0076.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   World Wire
   ----
   Compiled by Robert L. Muller
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   JAPAN LATAM NSANY TOYOY HMC G.LHA EUROP FREST
</CO>
<IN>
BANKS (BNK)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
ENVIRONMENT (ENV)
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
RAILROADS (RAI)
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
</IN>
<LP>
   UNMILITARY JAPAN
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   Few young men want to join the Japanese military, and
those who are in it complain of low pay, bad working
conditions and little public recognition.
   Those serving in what are officially called "the
Self-Defense Forces" labor under a handicap unique among the
world's major countries. The constitution, adopted a year
after Japan's defeat in World War II, renounces war.
   Thus, Japanese soldiers haven't been involved in combat
since 1945. Overseas military involvement is banned, the
military adopts a very low profile in public life and the
public remains acutely sensitive to any hint of militarism.
   "We are facing difficulties in recruiting young people,"
said Rear Adm. Yasuaki Imaizumi at the Etajima First Service
Naval School in Kure on Japan's Inland Sea. A senior naval
officer said more than half of his 50 classmates in aviation
school now work for commercial airlines. "I can't blame them.
As far as pay is concerned, there is no way I can compete
with them," he said.
                                                                                                       

   LOANS TO VENEZUELA
                                                                                                       

   Japanese banks won't make new loans to Venezuela because
they are dissatisfied with the progress of its economic
restructuring, international banking sources told a Japanese
news agency. The decision is based on a perception that the
Venezuelan economy has shown little improvement despite
higher oil prices, the sources said. Venezuela's medium-term
to long-term foreign debts total about $20 billion, of which
20% is owed to 30 Japanese banks.
                                                                                                       

   NISSAN'S CFC PHASE-OUT
                                                                                                       

   Nissan Motor Co. said it will completely phase out
chlorofluorocarbon gas from air conditioners on its new cars
by the end of 1995. In addition, the company will install CFC
recycling devices at its service centers and used-car
dealerships world-wide by March 1992. Two other major auto
makers, Toyota Motor Corp. and Honda Motor Co., have
announced similar plans to eliminate the gas. CFC gas is
suspected of damaging the atmosphere's ozone layer, which
acts as a shield against the sun's harmful rays.
                                                                                                       

   LUFTHANSA'S BERLIN PLANS
                                                                                                       

   Lufthansa said it applied to serve West Berlin and East
Berlin as of the start of its winter flight plan on Oct. 28.
The carrier, which is 51%-owned by the West German
government, hasn't been allowed to make scheduled flights to
Berlin since the end of World War II. Only airlines of the
four victorious World War II powers have been allowed to fly
to Berlin.
                                                                                                       

   CHINA-HONG KONG RAILROAD
                                                                                                       

   China plans to construct a 1,465-mile railroad line
between Beijing and Hong Kong in preparation for the
scheduled return of the British crown colony to China in
1997, the China Daily reported. The Ministry of Railways
estimated the total construction cost at the equivalent of
$3.3 billion, of which 20% to 25% will be borne by the
provinces and municipalities along the projected route. The
railroad will be built between the present Beijing-Shanghai
and Beijing-Guangzhou lines, linking 10 provinces and
municipalities.
                                                                                                       

   ARGENTINE INFLATION
                                                                                                       

   Argentine President Carlos Menem threatened to open the
door to imported goods to cut the nation's inflation rate.
His comments were in response to reports that prices have
risen by 10% so far this month. The rise in the nation's
consumer prices had slowed steadily in the past few months,
to a monthly rate of 10.8% in July from 95.5% in March, but
now shows signs of accelerating.
                                                                                                       

   MEXICAN DRUG ABUSE
                                                                                                       

   Although narcotics abuse hasn't reached epidemic
proportions in Mexico, such cheap inhalants as glue, paint
thinner and other industrial solvents are becoming popular
among the nation's poor, and fears are growing that Mexico is
fertile ground for drug addiction.
   One reason is the availability of a wide variety of
illegal drugs. Marijuana and opium poppies are grown in
Mexico, and the country is a transit point for cocaine and
heroin bound for the U.S. from South America.
   The latest National Survey of Addictions, conducted in
1988 and released this year, found that 4.3% of Mexicans,
more than half of them under age 34, had experimented with
drugs at least once. And the federal attorney general's
office said that of an estimated 500,000-plus drug addicts in
Mexico, 300,000 use inhalants, 200,000 use marijuana, 30,000
use cocaine and the rest use heroin or opium.
   A half pint of paint thinner costs the equivalent of seven
cents, and a tube of glue $1.07. Street prices for marijuana
and cocaine, respectively, are about $1.80 a cigarette and
$35 a gram.
                                                                                                       

   POSTSCRIPTS . . .
                                                                                                       

   A liaison council of officials from 15 Japanese ministries
and agencies, discussing ways to increase the nation's
birthrate, said it is considering changes in the system of
maternity leave, improvements in housing policies and better
child-care services. . . . Anticipating history, the National
Geographic Society said it is unifying East and West Germany
in the sixth edition of its world atlas due out in November.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0075
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0075.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Italy's Industrial Production
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<LP>
   ROME -- Italy's unadjusted index of industrial production
fell 3.6% in June from a year earlier, the State Statistical
Institute Istat said.
   Istat said the index (1985 equals 100) registered 125.2 in
June, compared with 129.9 in June 1989.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The drop was partly due to fewer working days in June of
this year. The index was based on 21 working days; while June
1989 counted 22 working days.
   The drop, which followed a year-on-year rise of 0.7% in
May, confirms a downard trend in economic activity in recent
months. Taking into account the difference in number of
working days, the average daily industrial production edged
up 0.1%, Istat said.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0074
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0074.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Price Stern Sloan Inc.
   And Mattel Sign Pact
   For Barbie Doll Books
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3A
</SO>
<CO>
   MAT DIS
</CO>
<IN>
RECREATION, ENTERTAINMENT, TOYS, MOVIES, PHOTOGRAPHY, SPORTS (REC)
MEDIA, PUBLISHING, BROADCASTING, ELECTRONIC PUBLISHING (MED)
</IN>
<LP>
   LOS ANGELES -- Mattel Inc. said it signed an exclusive
licensing agreement with Price Stern Sloan Inc. to produce a
series of books, including a cookbook, based on its Barbie
doll toy.
   The books will add to a plethora of products Mattel is
introducing around the image of Barbie, the world's
best-selling plastic playmate. Already, the toy maker has
unvieled several new Barbie Style products, including a line
of girl-sized costumes, bed sheets and accessories.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Over time, Mattel has said it plans to take Barbie beyond
the toy category and into children's clothing, beauty
products and other consumer goods -- hoping that by doing so,
the company will bolster sales of the doll.
   Mattel said it is considering several proposals from movie
producers to take Barbie to the silver screen. A Mattel
spokesman said a decision on whether to make a movie hasn't
been made. One consideration the company has always had is
that a Barbie movie, which would show how the doll supposedly
sounds and acts, would impinge on each individual girl's
fantasies about the doll, the Mattel spokesman said.
   Barbie accounted for $600 million of Mattel's $1.2 billion
in total revenue for 1989.
   Los Angeles-based Price Stern Sloan, a publisher and
distributor of children's books, said it plans to introduce
the first of several lines of Barbie books in the spring of
1991.
   In addition, Price Stern said that in July, it entered
into a licensing agreement with Walt Disney Co. to produce an
electronic wand with a Mickey Mouse head and to publish six
books featuring Disney characters.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0073
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0073.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Politics &amp; Policy:
   Ambiguous Barry Verdict Leaves Sense of Unease
   In a City Troubled by Drug Crimes and Tension
   ----
   By Paul M. Barrett
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A12
</SO>
<IN>
LAW AND LEGAL AFFAIRS (LAW)
</IN>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- The ambiguous verdict on Marion Barry --
certainly a personal victory for the capital's mayor -- will
leave deep scars in a city torn by drug crimes and divided by
racial tension.
   For immediate practical purposes, the mayor beat the
federal case against him by escaping with a conviction on
only one misdemeanor cocaine-possession count. The jury
acquitted him of another possession charge and was deadlocked
on 12 other counts. Mr. Barry, cheered by supporters at
weekend appearances, is said to be considering another run
for public office, most likely for an at-large city council
seat.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   But the fact remains that the mayor -- who for years had
denied drug-related allegations and preached abstinence in
city schools -- was found guilty of cocaine possession, and
his lawyer conceded to the jury that Mr. Barry indulged in
the drug.
   The city will long be haunted by the image of its chief
executive admitting to criminal activity, said Jack
Friedenthal, dean of George Washington University's law
school. Also, Mr. Friedenthal added, "You are left with
terrible feelings, terrible divisiveness on the racial
issue."
   The eight-week Barry trial not only shook up the city, but
had reverberations as far away as Colombia, where political
commentators interpreted the verdict as an endorsement of
tolerance that would undercut efforts in that country to
fight cocaine trafficking, violence and corruption.
   The white U.S. attorney, Jay Stephens, portrayed the trial
results as justification for a massive federal investigation
of the mayor and his associates. Even the lone conviction,
the prosecutor said, "emphatically emphasizes that no one is
above the law."
   But as Mr. Stephens spoke Friday outside the U.S.
courthouse near the Capitol, a black crowd nearly shouted him
down with warnings to "get out of town" and chants of "Barry,
Barry, Barry] Four More Years]" After the mayor delivered an
emotional apology to supporters at a foot-stomping rally
Saturday, arguments broke out on the street between whites
and blacks.
   Mr. Barry, though appearing humble about his personal
failings, stopped well short of admitting to any criminal
guilt. At his rally Saturday, he reiterated charges that
white prosecutors and journalists had singled him out for
racial reasons. Some civil rights leaders, including Benjamin
Hooks, also have contended that the Justice Department has
targeted Mr. Barry and other black politicians.
   "My trial has helped expose deep divisions and racism in
our community that are reflective of what is happening around
the nation," Mr. Barry said.
   "American citizens," he continued, "should not have to
walk around in fear that their constitutional rights and
civil liberties are being eroded and trampled, and Big
Brother is all powerful and all knowing." Prosecutors all the
way up to Attorney General Dick Thornburgh have denied that
the Barry prosecution was racially motivated.
   Much remains unclear about the city's political future and
that of its three-term chief executive. Mr. Barry isn't
expected to reverse his decision not to seek re-election as
mayor, but he hasn't committed himself on whether he will run
for the city council, where he served in the 1970s. Today is
the deadline for Mr. Barry to switch his party registration
to independent from Democratic to qualify for the November
ballot. If he does switch, he would have two weeks to decide
whether to run.
   Another Barry campaign would almost certainly stir racial
animosity and keep the spotlight on the propriety of the
federal government's tactics in prosecuting him. Law
enforcement officials said that continuing investigations of
city contract abuse have been stalled by the Barry verdict
and could be derailed altogether if U.S. Attorney Stephens
decides not to retry the mayor. On the other hand, Mr.
Stephens has said that the government held back on bringing
some charges against Mr. Barry, and it is possible that the
prosecutor could seek a new, even broader indictment.
   Mr. Stephens said he won't reveal his decision until a
hearing scheduled for Sept. 17. Prosecutors said they will
interview jurors to find out whether the panel came close to
conviction on any of the 12 drug and perjury counts on which
they deadlocked.
   Weighing against a new prosecution was the account of one
of the few jurors who answered reporters' questions over the
weekend. Johnnie Mae Hardeman said that after eight days of
deliberation, the panel had split 6-6 or 7-5 for acquittal on
the three felony perjury counts, although she didn't recall
the results in detail.
   City Council Chairman David Clarke, a Democratic candidate
for mayor, said, "I'm very sorry for this city that the mayor
has been found guilty on the one charge." But Mr. Clarke, who
is white, urged the prosecution "to let the city go," and not
retry Mr. Barry.
   Mr. Friedenthal of George Washington University said, "The
point has been made: He {Mr. Barry} used cocaine." The legal
academic predicted a plea bargain under which Mr. Barry would
admit to another misdemeanor or two in exchange for the
prosecution's dropping all other charges. Judges in
Washington rarely, if ever, sentence first-time drug
posession offenders to jail.
   Mr. Barry's lawyer, R. Kenneth Mundy, said, "It is time
for each side to extend the olive branch." But his success in
turning the tables and putting the federal government's
tactics on trial may prompt his client to refuse any plea
agreement.
   Mr. Mundy dispatched the prosecution's evidence that the
mayor used cocaine on more than 200 occasions by simply
admitting that Mr. Barry was an occasional user. In effect,
the lawyer invited one or more findings of guilt on the
lesser possession counts as a compromise, while stressing
that the government witnesses all "had something to gain" by
cooperating with prosecutors.
   Among the charges on which the jury couldn't agree was the
possession count based on a videotaped sting that caught Mr.
Barry smoking crack in a Washington hotel room. He had been
lured there and encouraged to use the potent cocaine
derivative by a former woman friend cooperating with
investigators. Mr. Mundy painstakingly guided the jury in
dissecting the 82-minute videotape, building a defense that
the mayor had been entrapped.
   The prosecution's failure to convict even with filmed
evidence of Mr. Barry's drug use will certainly demoralize
some federal and local police in Washington, law enforcement
officials predicted. But investigators here and elsewhere
aren't likely to drop tactics such as undercover stings and
reliance on testimony from witnesses themselves implicated in
criminal activity. "In a dirty business, you deal with dirty
people," said one federal investigator.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0072
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0072.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Mosbacher Is Taking Part
   In Gulf Crisis Discussions
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<GV>
COMMERCE DEPARTMENT (COM)
EXECUTIVE (EXE)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher said his
recusal from energy-policy matters has been waived because of
the crisis in the Persian Gulf.
   "I have a temporary waiver from my recusal because we're
talking about the Iraq-Kuwait problem. With something that
pressing, the president wanted his full team," Mr. Mosbacher
said in an interview.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Mr. Mosbacher has previously been recused from
energy-policy matters because of possible conflicts of
interest. Before taking his present post, he spent his career
in the oil business in Houston, where he managed his family
oil concern Mosbacher Energy Corp. The company is now run by
his son Robert Mosbacher Jr.
   Discussing the current crisis, the commerce secretary was
critical of those retailers of oil and gas who have increased
their prices drastically. "I think it's shortsighted of these
guys. If I was in business, I'd be a little more circumspect.
Long-term it isn't smart business," he said.
   The longstanding friendship between President Bush and Mr.
Mosbacher dates back to the 1960s, when both men sought their
fortunes in the oil exploration business in Texas.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0071
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0071.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   World Markets:
   Tokyo Shares Slip to 1990 Low on Mideast Fears;
   London Prices Also Decline in Cautious Trading
   ----
   A Wall Street Journal News Roundup
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C10
</SO>
<CO>
   CANDA FREST EUROP JAPAN
</CO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
COMMODITY NEWS, FARM PRODUCTS (CMD)
PRECIOUS METALS, STONES, GOLD, SILVER (PCS)
</IN>
<LP>
   Tokyo stocks retreated to a new 1990 low, with waves of
arbitrage selling accelerating the slide Friday afternoon as
investors held off buying ahead of a possible weekend
worsening of the Persian Gulf crisis.
   London shares finished lower in subdued dealings as events
in the Middle East overshadowed any genuine interest in the
market.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Tokyo's Nikkei index of 225 issues lost 286.18 to finish
at 27329.55. The index plunged 893.41 points Thursday. Volume
on the first section was estimated at 320 million shares,
down from 409.4 million Thursday. Losers outnumbered gainers
616-303, with 169 unchanged.
   At the end of the morning session in Tokyo Monday, the
Nikkei index had tumbled 763.12 points, or 2.8%, to 26566.43
on selling by arbitragers.
   The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the
first section, which lost 31.61 Thursday, was down 11.53, or
0.56%, at 2056.88 Friday. The Second Section Index, which
gained 22.25 Thursday, was down 0.83, or 0.02%, to close at
4112.11. Volume in the second section was estimated at 11
million shares, down from 14.8 million.
   "There was no bad news for the market, with both currency
and bond markets stable and no significant developments in
the Middle East," said a trader at James Capel Pacific.
   "Investors who are nervous about the Iraqi issue have
already sold off their holdings," the trader said. "But
investors can't buy, due to fears that something may happen
over the weekend."
   Petroleum shares ended mixed, with Teikoku Oil down 110
yen at 1,610 yen ($10.75) a share, but Mitsubishi Oil edged
up 10 to 1,280.
   High-priced technology shares ended generally lower. Sony
lost 120 to 7,810, while TDK fell 160 to 6,450.
   Isetan advanced 140 to 4,420, prompting speculation that
the buying may be linked to a merger and acquisition attempt,
traders said.
   Paper and pulp makers were sold, with Jujo Paper down 21
to 730 and Oji Paper falling 20 to 960.
   Shionogi lost 90 to 1,210 on rumors about side effects
from the company's blood pressure-reducing drugs, traders
said.
   Plant engineering companies fell sharply, as their
activities in Iraq and Kuwait have been frozen by Japan's
economic sanctions against Iraq. Chiyoda lost 150 to 1,660.
   In London, investors were said to be flattening out
positions ahead of the weekend in case the Middle East became
more volatile before today. Most participants fled to the
sidelines and were unwilling to open fresh positions,
commentators said.
   In addition, a murky start on Wall Street and a drop
during the London afternoon caused players to take a more
cautious footing, dealers said. At the close of the London
session, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was off 27.23
points at 2731.68.
   There was also a dearth of major corporate or economic
news, giving players little incentive to adjust current
short-term positions, traders said. And some strong falls in
international stocks, which were nervous in the wake of the
Middle East turmoil, also sent the market lower late in the
session.
   At the closing bell, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange
100-share index was down 11.1 at 2233.8, the day's low and
well below its opening peak of 2249.2.
   The FT 30-share industrial index was down 9.8 at 1743.0.
Volume was a meager 312.4 million shares, compared with 429.2
million issues a day earlier.
   Among the few corporate features, health and household
products group Glaxo Holdings fell 43 pence to 761 pence
($16.08) a share. Forecasts for the company's 1990 pretax
profit were downgraded to #1.05 billion by Schroder
Securities Ltd. from a previous estimate of #1.15 billion.
   The downgrading came on worries that the strength of the
pound against the dollar could affect the company's earnings.
In addition, Glaxo's American Depositary Receipts were sold
heavily on Wall Street overnight, dealers said.
   Carlton Communication had another steep fall, shedding 41
to 319. Dealers said the stock dropped as one large sell
order had difficulty being placed.
   ICI, Britain's largest chemical concern, shed 25 to 941 as
market-makers tried to get rid of stock picked up since the
Iraqi invasion of Kuwait Aug. 2, dealers said. They said
investors are shying away from international stocks because
of uncertainty over world economies in the wake of higher
crude-oil prices.
   Anglo-Dutch health and household products group Unilever
fell 9 to 661. The company said second-quarter pretax profit
rose 4.8% to #477 million, although analysts suggested that
the 1989 purchases of Faberge/Elizabeth Arden and Calvin
Klein had hindered results because of large interest
payments.
   Among other oil stocks, British Petroleum rose 2 to 360,
and Ultramar retreated 5 to 345.
   Ultramar said it contracted to buy three one
million-barrel capacity oil tankers for $212 million from
Samsung Shipbuilding &amp; Heavy Industries Co. of South Korea.
   Ultramar said the ships will secure Ultramar's anticipated
long-term crude oil transportation requirements to its Quebec
refinery on the St. Lawrence River in eastern Canada "at an
advantageous cost."
   Brewers Whitbread and Allied-Lyons both dropped sharply,
with Whitbread falling 11 to 411 and Allied-Lyons losing 17
to 477. Whitbread said it agreed to sell its 50% stake in a
joint venture to partner Allied-Lyons. The price wasn't
disclosed.
   Under the agreement, Whitbread will sell its half of
European Cellars (Holdings) Ltd., a British shipper and
wholesaler of wines, to the wines and spirits division of
Allied-Lyons.
   Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Frankfurt,
Amsterdam and Madrid, were unchanged in Paris and Zurich and
ended mixed in Brussels, Milan and Stockholm. South African
gold stocks were higher.
   In Asian and Pacific markets, shares closed lower in
Tokyo, Singapore, Hong Kong, Wellington, Taipei and Manila
and higher in Seoul and Sydney.
                                                                                                       

   Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets,
as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International
Perspective, Geneva. To make them directly comparable, each
index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100. The
percentage change is since year-end.
                                                                                                       

                                                  % This
                                Aug 9     Aug 8     Year
                                                                                                       

 U.S. .......................   314.5     312.7    - 3.2
 Britain ....................   666.4     663.5    - 7.6
 Canada .....................   384.8     384.7    -11.0
 Japan ......................  1142.3    1163.5    -31.0
 France .....................   498.7     493.6    -12.0
 Germany ....................   280.9     278.6    - 1.6
 Hong Kong ..................  2270.1    2306.8    + 8.3
 Switzerland ................   200.0     198.6    - 9.4
 Australia ..................   322.7     322.9    - 2.6
 World index ................   488.5     488.4    -13.9
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0070
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0070.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   GTE Corp. Forms
   New Business Group
   With Parker as Head
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C18
</SO>
<CO>
   GTE WNEWS
</CO>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
</GV>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- GTE Corp. formed a Telecommunications Products
&amp; Services Group and named the chief of its mobile
communications business to head it.
   The group comprises four businesses: GTE Government
Systems, Information Services, Mobile Communications and
Spacenet. It will be headed by Terry S. Parker, president of
Houston-based GTE Mobile Communications.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Mr. Parker, 45 years old, has also been named to the
company's policy committee and may end up supervising several
business units of Contel Corp., which is merging with GTE.
   A spokesman said GTE made the appointment in part to
relieve Charles R. Lee, GTE's president and chief operating
officer, who had supervisory responsibility for the units now
in Mr. Parker's group.
   "This will give Chuck more time to work on strategic
planning and work more closely with {GTE chairman James L.
Johnson} on corporate vision, direction and culture," the
spokesman said.
   Mr. Parker will run Mobile Communications until a
successor is found.
   Meanwhile, a federal judge in Boston set aside a jury
verdict against GTE Products Corp., including damages of
$15.9 million awarded to Cool Light Co., Hollywood, Calif.
   Cool Light, a maker of television studio lights that
generate less heat than conventional units, alleged that GTE
Products breached a contract to manufacture parts of Cool
Light's product and instead produced its own version of the
light.
   However, Judge John J. McNaught questioned the logic of
the June 29 verdict and ordered a new trial. Cool Light was
unavailable for comment.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0069
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0069.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Brady Sees Rise
   In Oil Prices
   Cutting Growth
   ---
   He Says Rate of Expansion
   Will Decline to 0.75%,
   But Rules Out Recession
   ----
   By Alan Murray and David Wessel
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3
</SO>
<CO>
   MDEST TAXES
</CO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
SECURITIES INDUSTRY (SCR)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
FEDERAL RESERVE BOARD (FED)
EXECUTIVE (EXE)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady said
rising oil prices resulting from the Middle East crisis will
cut already sluggish economic growth in the U.S. by half but
won't cause a recession.
   Mr. Brady again called on the Federal Reserve to ease
credit and "tip the scales toward growth." But he said those
in Congress who view the Iraqi invasion, higher oil prices
and a weak economy as reasons to put off cutting the budget
deficit are "dead wrong."
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The Treasury secretary, in an interview Friday, said that
if oil prices stay near their current levels, that will
reduce the nation's growth to an annual rate of 0.75% -- down
from the 1.5% pace in the first half of the year.
   But Mr. Brady continued to argue that a recession isn't in
the works. "Even if growth dips under 1%," he said, "we'll
still be growing."
   He blamed the slower growth on the budget deficit, which
he said has "held interest rates at a high level," and on the
savings and loan fiasco, which he said fueled overbuilding in
the 1980s.
   Mr. Brady also said a credit crunch "has got something to
do with it." But he called it a "chicken and egg" problem.
"Part of the credit crunch is banks are being more careful,
especially on real estate loans, and part is demand for loans
is down," he said.
   Repeating his call for the Federal Reserve to lower
interest rates, Mr. Brady said the country should "avoid an
over-single-minded emphasis on inflation." He noted the Fed
"is an independent institution," but said its independence
"shouldn't prevent us from speaking out."
   Mr. Brady also said the Middle East events and the slowing
economy make it "all the more important to move apace" on
budget cuts. He said he anticipates the budget negotiations,
which reconvene after Labor Day, will produce an agreement
before the November elections.
   Because of the weakness in the economy and the likely
difficulty in agreeing on cuts in defense spending, some
congressional budget negotiators are reconsidering their goal
of shrinking the deficit by $50 billion in the fiscal year
that begins Oct. 1 and by $500 billion over the next five
years.
   Although Mr. Brady reiterated his support for those
objectives, he said, "It is not so critically important to
have exactly $50 billion in the first year as long as we have
$500 {billion} over five years." He emphasized that the
administration will insist on a growth-oriented package -- a
reference to the administration's proposed cut in
capital-gains taxes -- and on alterations to the budget
process to assure that the deficit reductions projected for
future years are realized.
   Mr. Brady acknowledged that an energy tax, an idea that
had gained support from negotiators from both parties,
"doesn't make a whole lot of sense" if the recent rise in oil
prices persists. If oil prices come down, however, such a tax
might be attractive, he said.
   Mr. Brady tried to put the onus on the Democrats for the
slow pace of the budget talks, which began in mid-May and
have accomplished little. He said the president took a "large
political risk" in convening the talks and that the
Republicans were prepared to put forward a package of
spending cuts and tax increases last month. Democrats
weren't, however. "You can't negotiate with yourself," he
said.
   On other topics, Mr. Brady said:
   -- Recent events in the turbulent stock market demonstrate
the success of mechanisms installed to prevent a market crash
-- mechanisms such as the so-called circuit breakers that
stop trading in stock and futures markets when prices fall by
a set amount. "The circuit breakers . . . worked and they
worked well," he said. Mr. Brady, who chaired a presidential
commission that recommended such changes after the 1987
stock-market crash, added that some who opposed the changes
have written him recently to admit they were wrong.
   -- A securities-transfer tax, one of many options examined
as a way to reduce the deficit, has good points and bad, and
Mr. Brady declined to take a position on such a tax. "There's
a lot of economic theory on both sides of that," he said.
   -- President Bush will move to fill a vacancy on the Fed's
seven-member board of governors "very quickly" after Congress
returns in September. Manuel Johnson, the Fed's vice
chairman, announced his resignation two months ago.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0068
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0068.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology:
   Weyerhaeuser Recycling Plant
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   WY
</CO>
<IN>
PULP, PAPER, PACKAGING (ALL TYPES) (PUL)
</IN>
<LP>
   TACOMA, Wash. -- Weyerhaeuser Co. said it will open one of
the nation's largest paper recycling facilities in Portland,
Ore., by the end of the year.
   The plant will be devoted exclusively to the collection,
sorting and redistribution of old newspapers and other paper
products. The new facility will supply the giant pulp and
paper company's North Pacific Paper Corp. newsprint mill in
Longview, Wash. Company officials are working to expand
production there by as much as 50% and add a de-inking
facility by mid-1991.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The new plant is expected to handle 700,000 tons of paper
a day, which represents about 150,000 daily newspapers, and
employ 70 to 80 people. The company owns and operates 16
recycling facilities.
   ---
   Corrections &amp; Amplifications
                                                                                                       

   WEYERHAEUSER Co.'s new paper recycling facility, when
opened, will handle 700 tons of paper a day. In Monday's
edition, the capacity of the recycling plant was misstated.
   (WSJ Aug. 15, 1990)
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0067
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0067.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Hawaiian Airlines Fare Increases
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   HA
</CO>
<IN>
AIRLINES (AIR)
</IN>
<LP>
   HONOLULU -- Hawaiian Airlines said surcharges have
resulted in fare increases to compensate for higher fuel
costs, which have recently risen 17%.
   The cost of trans-Pacific flights increased $10 each way
and South Pacific routes will cost passengers $15 more each
way, the airline said. A fuel surcharge raised inter-island
flights $2.50 each way this past week.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The airline said it would resist increasing air fares as
much as 10%, as other airlines have done, in hopes that oil
prices will stabilize. The airline has 230 daily flights to
the West Coast, South Pacific islands and Australia.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0066
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0066.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Spending Cuts Won't Apply
   To Accounts of Military
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A4
</SO>
<IN>
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
</IN>
<GV>
EXECUTIVE (EXE)
DEFENSE DEPARTMENT (DEF)
CONGRESS (CNG)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- The Bush administration exercised its option
to exempt all military personnel accounts from any
across-the-board spending cuts this fall.
   "This is considered to be in the national interest . . .
to maintain the force levels required for our national
security," Budget Director Richard Darman said in notifying
Congress of President Bush's decision on Friday.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   About $84 billion of spending cuts will be triggered in
October by the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction law, unless
Congress and the president agree on a way to shrink the
deficit or alter the law before then.
   Even though Mr. Bush has exempted military personnel, the
law requires that other Pentagon spending accounts absorb
half of any Gramm-Rudman cuts. The Office of Management and
Budget estimates these accounts would be slashed by 34.9%.
Non-defense accounts covered by the law would be cut by
31.9%. Social Security and many other government benefit
programs are exempt.
   Earlier last week, White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater
indicated that Mr. Bush was planning only to shield some
portion of the military personnel accounts from the cuts.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0065
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0065.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Evans Inc.:
   Retailer Gets $33.5 Million
   Revolving Credit Agreement
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3A
</SO>
<CO>
   EVAN
</CO>
<LP>
   Evans Inc. said it received a $33.5 million revolving
credit arrangement from a bank and an insurance company that
gives the specialty retailer more financial flexibility.
   Chicago-based Evans wouldn't name the lenders. The working
capital loan agreement, secured by all Evans's assets, also
stretches out some principal payments on a note payable.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Evans had a loss of $3.2 million, or 64 cents a share, in
the quarter ended June 2, on sales of $20.3 million. David B.
Meltzer, chairman, said the new financing means the company
"can now focus on the execution of our business plan."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0064
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0064.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Massachusetts Acts to Stop
   Gouging by Oil Companies
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B4
</SO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
</IN>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION (FTC)
</GV>
<LP>
   BOSTON -- Massachusetts, responding to rising fuel prices
in the wake of Iraq's invasion of Kuwait, adopted emergency
regulations to protect consumers from price-gouging in sales
of gasoline and other petroleum products.
   The regulations, which will be in effect for the next 90
days, make it "an unfair act or practice for a petroleum
related business to charge an unconscionably high price for
petroleum products during any market emergency." They define
gouging as a "gross disparity" in the price of petroleum
products immediately before and after a market emergency that
isn't "substantially attributable to additional costs imposed
by suppliers." The regulations carry a civil penalty of
$5,000 for each violation.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The regulations were put in place by Massachusetts
Attorney General James M. Shannon under the state's Consumer
Protection Act. Mr. Shannon called the rules "essential
safeguards in dealing with this crisis. I am in no way
prejudging the situation, but I want to put these oil
companies on notice that in Massachusetts we're watching, and
that we will take whatever action we can to stop
price-gouging."
   He added that officials from the U.S. Justice Department
and the Federal Trade Commission have agreed to meet with him
and other attorneys general on Aug. 20 in Washington to
discuss the issue.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0063
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0063.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Money Rates
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C19
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP CANDA JAPAN FNM FRE MER GM
</CO>
<IN>
CDS, INTEREST RATES, COMMERCIAL PAPER (FIN)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
BANKS (BNK)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
MORTGAGES, MORTGAGE BANKERS, MORTGAGE-BACKED SECURITIES (MOR)
</IN>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
FEDERAL RESERVE BOARD (FED)
</GV>
<LP>
   Friday, August 10, 1990
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a
guide to general levels but don't always represent actual
transactions.
                                                                                                       

   PRIME RATE: 10%. The base rate on corporate loans at large
U.S. money center commercial banks.
                                                                                                       

   FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 1/16% high, 7 15/16% low, 8% near closing
bid, 8 1/16% offered. Reserves traded among commercial banks
for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more. Source:
Babcock Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.
                                                                                                       

   DISCOUNT RATE: 7%. The charge on loans to depository
institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.
                                                                                                       

   CALL MONEY: 9 1/4%. The charge on loans to brokers on
stock exchange collateral.
                                                                                                       

   COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors
Acceptance Corp.: 7.85% 30 to 44 days; 7.75% 45 to 59 days;
7.65% 60 to 89 days; 7.575% 90 to 119 days; 7.50% 120 to 179
days; 7.40% 180 to 270 days.
                                                                                                       

   COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through
dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 7.97%
30 days; 7.87% 60 days; 7.80% 90 days.
                                                                                                       

   CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 7.65% one month; 7.66% two
months; 7.70% three months; 7.92% six months; 8.05% one year.
Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary
new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1
million and more. The minimum unit is $100,000. Typical rates
in the secondary market: 7.93% one month; 7.93% three months;
7.93% six months.
                                                                                                       

   BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 7.84% 30 days; 7.76% 60 days; 7.67%
90 days; 7.61% 120 days; 7.57% 150 days; 7.54% 180 days.
Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically
financing an import order.
                                                                                                       

   LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 1/16% - 7 15/16% one month; 8
1/16% - 7 15/16% two months; 8% - 7 7/8% three months; 8% - 7
7/8% four months; 8% - 7 7/8% five months; 8% - 7 7/8% six
months.
                                                                                                       

   LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 1/16% one month;
8% three months; 8% six months; 8 1/8% one year. The average
of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London
market based on quotations at five major banks.
                                                                                                       

   FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 14.75%; Germany 10.50%; Japan
7.13%; Switzerland 10.88; Britain 15%. These rate indications
aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by
location.
                                                                                                       

   TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 6, 1990,
auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a
discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million:
7.23% 13 weeks; 7.19% 26 weeks.
                                                                                                       

   FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted
yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30
days. 10.04%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages;
8.125%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.
Source: Telerate Systems Inc.
                                                                                                       

   FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted
yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30
days (priced at par). 9.99%, standard conventional fixed-rate
mortgages; 8.35%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate
mortgages. Source: Telerate Systems Inc.
                                                                                                       

   MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 7.69%. Annualized
average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days;
not a forecast of future returns.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0062
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0062.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Monsanto Co. Joint Venture
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B5
</SO>
<CO>
   MTC
</CO>
<LP>
   ST. LOUIS -- Monsanto Co. said it signed an agreement in
principle to form a joint venture in Southeast Asia with
Golden Hope Plantations Berhad, located in Malaysia.
   The venture will focus on the manufacture of thermoplastic
elastomers, which are vulcanized rubber products with
applications in the automotive, medical, food and electrical
industries.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0061
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0061.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Lionel, Perlmutter Venture
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   LIO PICN
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Lionel Corp. said it formed a joint venture
with Isaac Perlmutter, former head of Odd Lot Trading Corp.,
to purchase the Job Lot/Pushcart retail chain from Pic "N"
Save Corp.
   Through the venture, Job Lot Associates L.P., Lionel and
Mr. Perlmutter will contribute $3 million each to the Job
Lot/Pushcart chain, which consists of 14 closeout stores in
the New York metropolitan area. Under the agreement, Lionel
will contribute only inventory to the stores; Mr. Perlmutter
will contribute cash and inventory.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Lionel, which operates 94 specialty toy stores in 15
states, has been under pressure from some shareholders to
find a buyer. Earlier this year, the company turned down
investor Robert I. Toussie's offer of $8 a share, or $94.4
million.
   Mr. Perlmutter is a principal in a media-buying company
that has Lionel as a client, and Lionel has purchased toy
inventory from companies controlled by Mr. Perlmutter's
Admerex International Inc.
   Trendex Capital Management Corp., a Fort Lauderdale, Fla.,
concern representing a dissident group of Lionel shareholders
with a 5% stake, had asked Lionel to form a panel of
outsiders to examine Lionel's relationship with Mr.
Perlmutter -- a request the company refused. The Trendex
group also has asked Lionel not to impede prospective
acquirers such as Mr. Toussie, who dropped his bid earlier
this year when the stock was trading for $5.625 a share.
   In American Stock Exchange composite trading Friday,
Lionel stock closed at $2.625 a share, unchanged.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0060
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0060.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Comstock Resources Inc.:
   Maple Gas to Purchase Gas,
   Install Processing Facilities
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3B
</SO>
<CO>
   CMRE
</CO>
<LP>
   Comstock Resources Inc., Dallas, said it reached a
definite 15-year agreement for the sale of all casinghead gas
produced at its 54,000-acre Bivins Ranch lease in Texas.
   Comstock said Maple Gas Corp. agreed to purchase the gas
and to install processing facilities that will have a
capacity of 20 million cubic feet a day by Dec. 1. Subject to
Comstock's deliverability, capacity will increase to 40
million cubic feet a day by April 1. Comstock said production
would come from 102 wells, each producing about five barrels
of oil and at least 180,000 cubic feet of gas a day. Comstock
said the number of producing wells on the lease would
increase.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Comstock said Maple, a private Texas company, would
construct pipeline connections and gathering facilities at an
estimated cost of $20 million. Starting Dec. 1, Maple will
pay Comstock based on 90% of residue gas and 70% of all
liquids extracted by the processing facilities, Comstock
said.
   Comstock said that proceeds from its public offering in
May are being used to fund completion of its well and
drilling program on the Bivins lease. It said the proceeds
were also used to pay off all bank debt.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0059
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0059.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Canada Housing Starts Fall 11%
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   CANDA
</CO>
<LP>
   OTTAWA -- Canadian housing starts declined 11% in July to
a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 173,000 units from a
June level of 195,000 units, Canadian Mortgage and Housing
Corp., a government agency, said.
   The corporation said the July decline provided further
evidence that weakness in house-building activity is becoming
more widespread across the country.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Separately, Statistics Canada, a government agency,
reported that Canada's seasonally adjusted unemployment rate
rose to 7.8% in July from 7.5% in June.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0058
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0058.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Exabyte Corp. 3rd-Quarter Sales
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   EXBT
</CO>
<LP>
   BOULDER, Colo. -- Exabyte Corp. said it expects
third-quarter sales to "substantially exceed" the sales of
$23.9 million for the same period a year ago. But the company
said sales and net income for the third quarter will fall
below second-quarter results.
   For the second quarter, ended June 30, Exabyte reported
profit of $8 million, or 38 cents a share, on sales of $46.3
million.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The maker of cartridge-tape systems said third-quarter
sales will be affected by excess inventory at certain
customers, seasonal slowness in the European market and a
general softening in the computer industry.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0057
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0057.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Sonat to Offer Notes
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C21
</SO>
<CO>
   SNT
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   BIRMINGHAM, Ala. -- Sonat Inc. said it registered an issue
of zero-coupon, subordinated notes having a face value of
$575 million at maturity and convertible into Sonat common
shares.
   The energy company said proceeds from the offering,
expected to total about $200 million, will be used for
general corporate purposes, including debt reduction.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The notes, registered with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, are LYONs, or Liquid Yield Option Notes, a
trademark of Merrill Lynch &amp; Co. Merrill Lynch Capital
Markets will serve as the underwriter for the offering.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0056
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0056.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Badger Meter Class B Shares
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   BMI
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   MILWAUKEE -- Badger Meter Inc. said it scheduled a special
shareholders meeting for Sept. 18 to vote on a proposal to
allow seven corporate officers to become holders of the
company's Class B shares, which have so-called super-voting
rights.
   Until now, only existing Class B holders could buy Class B
shares as they became available. The maker of flow
measurement products, which has about 562,785 B shares
outstanding, said the proposal doesn't involve the issuance
of new B shares.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The B shares have 10 votes a share vs. one vote for
regular common.
   The proposal, the company said, is aimed at increasing its
ability to "attract and retain high quality officers." The
proposal covers only the top seven officers.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0055
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0055.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Child World's Board
   Supports the Purchase
   Of Stock by Toys Plus
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3A
</SO>
<CO>
   CWLD
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   AVON, Mass. -- Child World Inc. said its board unanimously
approved the previously announced purchase by Toys Plus Inc.
of the 18% of Child World's shares that are currently in
public hands. The purchase price will be $14 a share, or $28
million.
   Toys Plus recently was formed by Trefoil Capital Investors
Limited Partnership, which last month agreed to purchase CNC
Holding Corp.'s 82% stake in Child World in a "non-cash
transaction." Terms of that transaction haven't been
announced, and Child World said negotiations concerning it
are continuing.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   CNC is a Cleveland-based holding company. Trefoil was
formed by the executives of Shamrock Holdings Inc., a holding
company controlled by Roy E. Disney, a California investor
and nephew of the late Walt Disney.
   Child World, the nation's second-largest toy retailer
after Toys "R" Us Inc., said its merger with Toys Plus is
conditioned on Trefoil's prior purchase of the CNC stake in
the retailer. Child World would be the surviving corporation
after the merger. Trefoil earlier said it plans to retain
Child World's current management.
   Child World, which operates 175 toy supermarkets in 31
states, has been squeezed for capital. Last year, the company
cut overall inventories 8.1% to save cash. For the first
quarter, ended May 5, Child World reported sharply higher
losses of $7.4 million, or 65 cents a share, because of a
shortage of sale items after the 1989 Christmas season.
   Child World said its board found Trefoil's $14-a-share
offer for its public stock "to be fair and in the best
interests" of shareholders. Trefoil earlier said that its
capital could help reinvigorate the cashstarved retailer.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0054
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0054.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Farah Predicts It Will Win
   Proxy Fight With Ex-Chief
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   FRA
</CO>
<LP>
   EL PASO, Texas -- Farah Inc. predicted the company would
prevail in a proxy battle with former chairman William F.
Farah.
   The company made its prediction after a surprisingly
anticlimactic special shareholder meeting Friday, called by
Mr. Farah to consider his demand that seven of the company's
nine board members be ousted. A company counterproposal
sought the removal of Mr. Farah and longtime associate
Charles C. Wood as directors.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   While preliminary results won't be disclosed until later
this week, the company said it has enough votes to defeat Mr.
Farah. A spokesman for Shareholders Communications Inc., Mr.
Farah's New York proxy solicitation firm, insisted the vote
was too close to call.
   Officials also indicated the company expects to report a
third-quarter loss; results are expected to be disclosed in
two weeks. In the six months ended April 30, Farah had a net
loss of $2 million, or 32 cents a share, on sales of $59.9
million. In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange
Friday, Farah fell to $2.875, down 62.5 cents.
   If the company prevails, it would mark the end of Mr.
Farah's 53-year career at the apparel manufacturing company
founded by his parents. Throughout his tumultuous, 25-year
reign as chief executive officer, Mr. Farah had outlasted
several potential successors, including his oldest son James,
and survived one previous ouster backed by the company's
creditors.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0053
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0053.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Chemical Waste Management
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C19
</SO>
<CO>
   CHW
</CO>
<IN>
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   OAK BROOK, Ill. -- Chemical Waste Management Inc. offered
$500 million of subordinated convertible notes.
   The debt, due in 2010, was priced at $306.56 for each
$1,000 note, to yield 6% to maturity. The notes are
convertible into shares of the hazardous-waste disposal and
cleanup company's common stock at an initial rate of 11.676
shares per note.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The company expects the offering to yield $150 million in
proceeds. The funds will be used to retire debt of Waste
Management Inc., which owns 77% of Chemical Waste Management.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0052
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0052.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   U.K. Data Give New Signs
   Of Economic Slowdown
   ----
   A Wall Street Journal News Roundup
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
</IN>
<LP>
   LONDON -- Fresh evidence of a British economic slowdown
emerged from a study showing sluggish consumer spending and
slow retail sales growth.
   The Confederation of British Industry's latest monthly
survey of distributive trades found low growth in retailing
activity across the United Kingdom. The survey also found
that demand among wholesalers and automobile companies was
lower than a year ago.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "The economic slowdown is continuing to have a pervasive
impact throughout the distributive trades," said the report,
to be released today. The report provides fresh evidence that
the British government's tight-money policy is beginning to
slow consumer activity.
   Despite a modest rise in monthly retail demand, orders by
retailers were no higher than a year ago, the survey found.
Particularly hard hit have been machinery and
office-equipment sales and the auto industry.
   "We are now witnessing a fall in distributors sales as a
whole for the first time since the survey began seven years
ago," said Andrew Sentance, the confederation's director of
economic affairs.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0051
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0051.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   SL Industries Expects
   To Report a Deficit
   For Its Fourth Period
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   SL
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
BUYBACKS, REDEMPTIONS, SWAP OFFERS (BBK)
</IN>
<LP>
   MOUNT LAUREL, N.J. -- SL Industries Inc. said it expects
to report a loss for the fourth quarter, ended July 31.
   The company also said that because of increasing softness
in most phases of its business, it expects to report that
earnings from operations fell significantly from the
year-earlier period. In the fiscal 1989 fourth quarter,
per-share earnings were 14 cents, adjusted for a 6% stock
dividend distributed last November.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, SL
slumped $1.75 to close at $4.875.
   In a series of announcements, the company said it plans to
repurchase up to one million shares, or 15% of its common
stock, and will establish in the fourth quarter a pretax
reserve of $3.5 million, or about 33 cents a share. The
reserve is for environmental cleanup related to manufacturing
plants the company operated in the 1960s and 1970s.
   The company also said it has accelerated spending at its
Electrostatic Technology Inc. subsidiary, which has developed
a way to coat materials with polymers. Demand for the
technology, the company said, "has been growing rapdily." SL
Industries further said that it sold its SL Plastics unit
Aug. 2. It said profit on the transaction wasn't material,
and it didn't disclose the purchaser or terms of the
transaction.
   Daryl L. Renschler, SL president and chief executive
officer, said the company "remains in excellent financial
condition, with only 4% of long-term debt to total capital."
He added that book value at April 30 was $5.49 a share and
that developmental expenditures continue to be funded
internally.
   SL Industries designs, manufactures and distributes
engineered products.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0050
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0050.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Enterprise:
   Guerrilla Marketer Makes Its Name With Bold Theatrics
   ---
   Wave Promotions `Ambushes' Consumers
   On the Beaches and in the Streets
   ----
   By Tuesday Georges
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B2
</SO>
<IN>
ADVERTISING, MARKETING, PUBLIC RELATIONS (ADV)
CORPORATE PROFILE (PRO)
</IN>
<LP>
   Some call it "ambush sampling." Some call it "guerrilla
marketing." Whatever the name, it's helping a small company
called Wave Promotions Inc. stand out from the pack of
marketing firms.
   At some New Jersey beaches recently, 25 make-believe
pirates, sporting black eyepatches, red bandannas and
black-and-white clothing, raced into crowds of sunbathers --
not to loot their treasures, but to hand out free bags of
popcorn. Within minutes, 50 to 100 people were thus
"ambush-sampled" by young people hired by Wave, a Washington,
D.C., firm that uses such stunts to promote clients'
products.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Wave's samplers, usually dressed in loud costumes, conduct
ambushes in supermarkets and public parks, on ski slopes and
public sidewalks, reaching as many as 2,000 people in a few
hours. Such attention-getting tactics have helped Wave hook
such big clients as Coca-Cola Co., Lorillard Inc., PepsiCo
Inc.'s Frito-Lay subsidiary, MTV, and Source Perrier S.A. But
the method has its doubters.
   "To me, the word `ambush' doesn't sound very upscale,"
says George Avery, regional manager for Bacardi Imports Inc.
Wave conducts much more conservative in-store promotions for
the importer of rum and other liquor products. "They {Wave}
are not doing that for Bacardi," he adds. "I would never use
that technique because all my projects are planned events."
   Adds Steven Shugan, a University of Chicago marketing
professor, "Those things only last for so long before the
novelty wears off, and then after a while, the technique
becomes cliche."
   None of this is stopping Wave so far. The pirate promotion
was one of several done for Smartfood Inc., a small
Marlborough, Mass., company that -- like Wave -- was out to
make a name for itself. Wave's young samplers have walked
into downtown-Washington rush-hour traffic dressed as giant
popcorn bags to give out Smartfood samples to commuters
caught in traffic. Wave's founders, Mike Napoliello and Jason
Moskowitz, say they develop such projects after looking at
their clients' overall marketing needs.
   "Ambush sampling is like finding the largest market by
whatever means necessary," says Mr. Moskowitz, a partner and
chief financial officer for Wave. "The consumer isn't always
in their house watching the `Cosby Show' or listening to the
radio, so we have to go were they are."
   Wave's techniques are a new twist to methods used over the
years to promote products, says Robert Blattberg, also a
professor of marketing at the University of Chicago. "They
have just thought of another way to startle the consumer and
cut through the clutter," he says.
   What makes ambush sampling different from other so-called
interactive sampling techniques, such as in-store sampling,
is that the promotion, designed to draw a festive crowd of
consumers to sample the product, is an unannounced event.
Most other sampling techniques are cleared with property
owners or managers before the event date.
   "We're the uninvited guests or the invited guest,
whichever really doesn't matter much," says Mr. Napoliello, a
partner of Wave and director of client programs. "Sometimes
we just show up at the bar, grocery store or wherever and
just say, `We are here with free T-shirts, may we come in?'
If they say no, we just go to the next place."
   But some potential hosts resist in no uncertain terms.
Outside a Who concert in East Rutherford, N.J., two of Wave's
snack-food samplers were arrested by security guards. The
samplers had been told to leave, but simply went to another
area where they were spotted by the guards. Wave says the
samplers were "overambitious."
   Despite an occasional chilly welcome, Wave's founders say
the promotional stunts have helped their company grow from
one small office in Spring Lake, N.J., to a national company
with offices in Washington, Los Angeles, Chicago, Boston,
Miami and New York. Wave now handles about eight clients at a
time, doing about 15 promotional projects a year. Five years
ago, Wave only did one project at a time.
   Mr. Napoliello and Mr. Moskowitz, both 27 years old,
founded Wave in 1981 while in college. Over the past five
years, Wave's staff has increased from three full-time
employees and 10 part-time workers to about 30 full-time and
200 part-time employees nationwide.
   Mr. Moskowitz says business for Wave has just "boomed"
over the past two years. He says Wave is profitable and its
1990 revenue has already reached about $2.5 million, compared
with $1.8 million grossed in all of 1989.
   Many of Wave's clients say sales increased during Wave
promotions. Stuart Ross, a spokesman for Monsieur Henri
Wines, the importer of Stolichnaya Vodka and a Wave client,
says: "We have had double-digit growth in Stoli sales over
the last five years, and we know that the Wave Promotions had
something to do with that."
   Wave has used "bar parties" to promote Stolichnaya. In one
such promotion Wave set up indoor miniature-golf courses in
bars, restaurants and night clubs in Miami during spring
break. Wave decorated the places with Stolichnaya banners and
balloons and gave out free T-shirts. And it usually persuaded
the establishments to offer a discount on the drinks.
   Wave also sponsored volleyball tournaments on behalf of
Stolichnaya at Point Pleasant, N.J. Because Wave couldn't
hand out free samples of the vodka, it threw a party at a bar
overlooking the beach and invited the tournament's adult
observers to go join the party. "Anyone over 21 could go to
the party," Mr. Moskowitz says.
   For Bacardi, Wave usually puts on in-store demonstrations
giving out free samples of a specially made non-alcoholic
"Bacardi Breezer." The sample supposedly looks and taste like
the alcoholic "Breezers."
   Last year, Wave sent a "comedy van" from Washington, D.C.,
to Maine. It stopped at colleges, parks and other places.
Then a comedian called "the Fat Doctor" got on top of the van
with a microphone and went into his act to attract a crowd,
which then was ambush-sampled with Smartfood popcorn.
   Smartfood sold about $12 million of its popcorn in the
three years, including two years as a Wave client, before
Smartfood was bought by PepsiCo's Frito-Lay early last year
for about $14.5 million. Smartfood has since dropped Wave. It
claims that it generated the ideas for the Smartfood stunts
that Wave executed. But Frito-Lay remains a Wave client for
promoting such products as Ruffles potato chips.
   Meanwhile, the young employees who pull off the stunts
seem to enjoy the elaborate sampling events. "It's great,"
says Wendy Meere, who has dressed up as a giant popcorn bag
several times. "It was really exciting because you have all
these little kids running up to you saying, `Hi] It's Mrs.
Popcorn.'"
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0049
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0049.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Hogan Systems Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   HOGN WNEWS
</CO>
<LP>
   HOGAN SYSTEMS Inc. (Dallas) -- Patric J. Jerge was named
president and chief executive officer, and William O. Hunt
was named chairman, succeeding Gary W. Fiedler, who resigned
from all three positions to resume a career in banking. Mr.
Jerge previously was executive vice president of the
company's Integrated Banking Applications group. Mr. Hunt is
and will remain chairman and chief executive of Alliance
Telecommunications Corp. Mr. Fiedler will remain a member of
the board of this software maker.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0048
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0048.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   News Corp. Ltd.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   WNEWS NWS
</CO>
<LP>
   NEWS CORP. Ltd. (Sydney, Australia) -- Tom Sherak was
named executive vice president of Twentieth Century Fox, the
film unit of News Corp.'s Fox Inc. Mr. Sherak, 45 years old,
has been president of distribution and marketing for the
studio since he joined the company in 1983. He will continue
to oversee distribution and marketing, the company said, but
his responsibilities will be expanded for him to work more
closely with Twentieth Century Fox Chairman Joe Roth on
production activities.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0047
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0047.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Bank of New England Plan
   To Merge Units Is Blocked
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C17
</SO>
<CO>
   NEB
</CO>
<LP>
   BOSTON -- Bank of New England Corp. said a Massachusetts
state court judge temporarily blocked the previously
announced merger of the company's main Boston-based affiliate
with its affiliate bank in Western Massachusetts.
   As reported, the troubled bank holding company had planned
to merge its Springfield, Mass.-based Bank of New
England-West affiliate with its Bank of New England, N.A.,
Boston, as part of its program to streamline operations and
cut costs.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   A Bank of New England spokesman said the state court
granted a motion to block the merger that had been made by a
group of 16 investors in the bank. They were shareholders of
a small Massachusetts bank that previously merged with
another bank, which, in turn, was acquired in 1986 by Bank of
New England Corp.
   The shareholders are seeking additional payment for their
holdings in the original bank. They assert that Bank of New
England's currently planned merger could hurt their chances
of receiving the payments, which a state judge earlier
ordered Bank of New England to make to them. The bank has
appealed that order.
   The Bank of New England spokesman said, "We believe {the
state court's action} is a temporary obstacle and expect to
resolve all legal issues and proceed promptly with the
merger."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0046
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0046.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Riggs Buys Most Assets
   Of Bank in Washington
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<CO>
   RIGS WWBC
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
BANKS (BNK)
BANKRUPTCIES (BCY)
</IN>
<GV>
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (FDL)
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Riggs National Corp. acquired most of the
assets and deposits of the National Bank of Washington for a
$33 million premium after federal regulators declared the
bank insolvent and closed it.
   National Bank of Washington was a unit of Washington
Bancorp., Washington, D.C., which filed for Chapter 11
bankruptcy protection Aug. 1.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Under the agreement with the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corp., Riggs National Bank assumed about $1 billion in
deposits and will purchase about $1.1 billion in assets,
mostly loans.
   FDIC will retain about $500 million of "adversely
classified" assets and may be forced to keep certain other
loans, Riggs said.
   Separately, the Treasury Department said it fined National
Bank of Washington $368,000 for money laundering just before
the bank was closed. The Treasury said that the bank failed
to report currency transactions as required under the Bank
Secrecy Act. In 1988, former bank senior vice president Roger
Schultz pleaded guilty to several violations under the
secrecy act.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0045
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0045.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Storehouse PLC
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   WNEWS U.SHS
</CO>
<LP>
   STOREHOUSE PLC (London) -- Martin A. Burke was named
executive vice president and chief operating officer, a new
post, at Conran's Habitat USA, a New York division of Habitat
Group, a London subsidiary of this retailing company. The
37-year-old Mr. Burke had been vice president of R.H. Macy &amp;
Co., the New York retailer.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0044
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0044.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   California Agency Passes
   Air-Pollution Standards
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<IN>
ENVIRONMENT (ENV)
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
</IN>
<LP>
   California's air pollution control agency said it passed
additional emission-control standards that will cut by 80%
emissions of smog-forming hydrocarbons generated by
evaporating gasoline in new cars and trucks.
   "Evaporating gasoline can account for as much as one third
of the pollution generated by a new car," said board
chairwoman Jananne Sharpless.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The California Air Resources Board said that the about 1.4
million new cars and trucks made in the state each year will
have to be fitted with larger charcoal-filled canisters that
absorb evaporation from fuel lines and gas tanks and route
them to the engine, where they are burned. The filters and
other changes required, which the state said were opposed by
various auto makers, will add $18 to the cost of each
vehicle. The requirement will be phased in between 1995 and
1998.
   In 1989, California, which has the nation's strictest
tailpipe standards, required equipment that would reduce by
41% the emission of hydrocarbons for cars made in 1993 and
after.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0043
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0043.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Endevco Inc.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   WNEWS EI
</CO>
<LP>
   ENDEVCO INC. (Dallas) -- Kelcy L. Warren was named
president and chief operating officer of this natural gas
concern. The president's position previously was held by
James W. Bryant, who will continue as chairman and chief
executive officer. The position of chief operating officer is
a new one for the company.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0042
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0042.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Marketing &amp; Media:
   Disney, Cinergi
   Reach Distribution
   Pact for Movies
   ----
   By Richard Turner
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B4
</SO>
<CO>
   DIS
</CO>
<IN>
RECREATION, ENTERTAINMENT, TOYS, MOVIES, PHOTOGRAPHY, SPORTS (REC)
</IN>
<LP>
   HOLLYWOOD -- Walt Disney Co. said it reached a five-year
exclusive motion picture distribution agreement with Cinergi
Productions Inc., a new company formed by former Carolco
Pictures Inc. co-chairman Andy Vajna, best-known for
co-producing the "Rambo" series and "Total Recall."
   The deal, which had been rumored in Hollywood for months,
represents a departure for Disney's film division, which,
unlike other studios, hasn't had outside producers regularly
finance and make movies for it to distribute. Though Disney
has wanted to increase the number of films flowing through
its distribution pipeline, it also likes to exert tight
controls over the production of these films. Last year it
started its own new film unit, Hollywood Pictures, rather
than resort to a distribution deal or acquisition.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Disney will still have strong behind-the-scenes input into
how Cinergi's films are made, industry observers say. And
Disney will be able to release a series of expensively made
films without having to pay for them or sully its image as a
cost-conscious producer unwilling to pay huge sums for
"talent."
   Disney executives see Cinergi as a source of big-budget
action/adventure films, a genre they themselves generally
have avoided. Cinergi's first project is "The Stand," a love
story set in the Amazon rain forest. The film features the
director-actor team from "The Hunt for Red October," John
McTiernan and Sean Connery, with a script by Tom Schulman,
who was involved in writing Disney's two biggest hits of last
year, "Dead Poet's Society" and "Honey, I Shrunk the Kids."
   Mr. Vajna said his company expects to produce two to three
films a year: "event-oriented" pictures with "big stars and
big directors."
   Under the agreement, Disney acquires all North and South
American distribution rights, including home video and
television, while Cinergi and Mr. Vajna, who is experienced
in international distribution, retains distribution rights
for the rest of the world. Partly by pre-selling these
foreign rights, Cinergi will finance the pictures and Disney
will receive a fee for marketing and distribution.
   Mr. Vajna co-founded Carolco with Mario Kassar in 1975 and
departed last year, selling his 36% stake to Mr. Kassar for
more than $100 million.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0041
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0041.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Commodities:
   Lower Coffee Prices Expected as Brazil's Backlog
   Hits Market, Crowding Central American Harvest
   ----
   By John Valentine
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C14
</SO>
<IN>
COMMODITY NEWS, FARM PRODUCTS (CMD)
PRECIOUS METALS, STONES, GOLD, SILVER (PCS)
PETROLEUM (PET)
</IN>
<LP>
   As the old song said, there's a lot of coffee in Brazil.
And it could hit the market this fall, swamping prices.
   Brazil currently isn't shipping as much coffee as it
normally does, so the beans are piling up. Moreover, this
backlog will be swollen by the crop now being harvested, says
one veteran U.S. coffee dealer.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The result, he says, is that Brazil will have to sell its
coffee just when Central American production will also be
coming to market -- meaning that prices could drop sharply.
   The nearby futures contract on the New York Coffee, Sugar
&amp; Cocoa Exchange closed Friday at 93.5 cents a pound, up from
85 cents in mid-July but below this year's high of $1.05 in
March.
   Usually, prices of green unroasted coffee beans rise in
the fall as roasters buy supplies for the peak winter
coffee-drinking season. However, these buyers already have
ample supplies, so they might not be eager to load up and
push prices higher. Instead, they're expected to buy what
they need and allow prices to remain under pressure from
mounting supplies.
   Brazil is harvesting coffee for its 1990-91 season, which
began July 1. Estimates of its output range from 22 million
to 30 million 132-pound bags.
   "Let's say production amounts to 25 million bags," the
veteran coffee dealer says. "Add 17 million bags the
government has in store which were bought by the IBC {the
Brazilian Coffee Institute, a government agency that used to
supervise the coffee industry but was eliminated by the
current government} and you have 42 million bags."
   Add in about six million bags left over from the 1989-90
season that farmers and exporters had on hand as the new
season began, and Brazil will have about 48 million bags
available for sale. From this, deduct about eight million
bags for domestic use. In addition, about five million bags
from the former IBC stocks probably can't be shipped because
of quality problems.
   However, these non-exportable coffees can be used within
Brazil, and "every one of these bags used internally
liberates an exportable bag for sale abroad," the dealer
says. So, figuring conservatively, Brazil will have about 36
million bags of exportable coffee.
   "Since July 1, only 3.5 million bags of coffee have been
registered in Brazil for shipment through Dec. 31," the
dealer says. Brazil historically has shipped about 16 million
bags a year to International Coffee Agreement member
countries, and in recent years it has been selling about two
million bags annually to consumer countries that aren't
members of the agreement, he says. The agreement's export
quotas were suspended in July 1989.
   For Brazil to continue to export the 18 million bags it
has annually sold and maintain its 30% share of the world
market, the dealer says, "it has to sell like bandits."
   Such heavy selling will come just as the harvest begins in
September in Mexico, Guatemala, El Salvador and some other
Latin American producers. These countries don't have the kind
of storage capacity Brazil has, and they traditionally try to
sell out their harvests as quickly as possible. Currently,
their coffees are also in great demand. The Central American
nations, for example, are usually completely sold out by
March. These factors will create strong competition for
Brazil.
   Colombia, the world's second largest producer, whose
harvest also begins in September, sells year-round. In the
first full International Coffee Organization year without
export quotas, which will end Sept. 30, Colombia is expected
to ship about 12 million bags, the dealer estimates. That
would be about three million more than it sold under ICO
quotas. In addition, its 1990-91 crop is expected to amount
to around 13 million bags, "so it can be expected to continue
to sell in quantity from its new crop," the dealer says.
Colombian coffee, regarded as one of the best in the world,
is always in strong demand, he says.
   Meanwhile, buyers won't exactly be starved for coffee.
Green coffee inventories in the U.S. amount to about 6.2
million bags, one dealer says, more than twice the average of
2.5 to three million bags over the past 15 to 20 years.
   These stocks include those held by importers, dealers,
roasters and in warehouses of the Coffee, Sugar &amp; Cocoa
Exchange in New York. The exchange's stocks alone amount to
2.2 million bags, "a huge figure," according to the dealer.
"This is indicative of the inability of roasters to absorb
all the coffee that's available," he says. In Europe, about
9.2 million bags are on hand, which industry sources think is
too much coffee at the start of a new season, the dealer
says.
   From time to time, the industry expresses hope that the
ICO export quotas will be reinstated, which would push prices
higher, the dealer notes. However, Brazil, the biggest
producer, is against restoring the quotas, as are the Central
American countries. Brazil and Central America together
account for about 60% of world coffee production, and they
have the voting power to prevent the quotas' restoration.
Most consuming countries are also against reinstatement of
the quotas, so fiercely competitive selling can be expected
to continue for the foreseeable future.
   Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:
                                                                                                       

   Precious Metals
                                                                                                       

   Prices surged Friday and are expected to continue rising
along with any increased tensions in the Middle East.
   The highest prices of the day were posted in the closing
minutes. "A close of this nature in heavy volume portends a
bull market with further gains," said one analyst.
   December delivery gold ended $11.10 an ounce higher at
$405.90, the highest price since April 16. December silver
gained 12 cents an ounce to $5.11. October platinum was up
$9.40 an ounce to $496.30.
   "This was the first time since June that silver and
platinum have joined gold in a strong rally," said David A.
Poole, vice president and chief economist for International
Investors Inc., a New York-based gold mutual fund.
   The advances were triggered by news reports of
disagreements at the Arab conference in Cairo and a call by
Iraqi President Saddam Hussein for Arab unity against U.S.
and other Western forces, analysts said.
                                                                                                       

   Energy
                                                                                                       

   Crude oil and gasoline prices rose Friday, though the
movement was small compared with the huge swings earlier in
the week. Generally traders were avoiding taking large
positions so they wouldn't be overtaken by events over the
weekend. The market-moving news Friday was Baghdad's call for
a "holy war" against foreign troops in Saudi Arabia. Some
market participants said the call heightened tensions, while
others said it was mainly rhetoric. Crude for September
delivery rose 56 cents a barrel to $26.23 on the New York
Mercantile Exchange. September gasoline went up 3.03 cents to
79.45 cents a gallon. Separately, U.S. Deputy Energy
Secretary Henson Moore, who met with several oil producers
last week, said they may produce an extra 50,000 barrels of
oil a day from Alaskan oil fields starting in two or three
weeks. This month, the trans-Alaska pipeline transported an
average of 1.79 million barrels of oil products a day.
                                                                                                       

   Grains and Soybeans
                                                                                                       

   The export picture is looking grimmer.
   Good growing conditions are generating large crops in
China and the Soviet Union that will probably reduce their
demand for U.S. crops.
   At the same time, two markets for U.S. crops have
effectively dried up: Iraq and Kuwait.
   If a U.S. embargo against Iraq is effective, farmers would
lose a market that annually imported between $700 million and
$800 million in U.S. agricultural goods. According to a trade
source, a vessel holding U.S. sunflower oil originally bound
for Iraq was unloaded last week in a Gulf of Mexico port.
   The Kuwait market has also evaporated. Although it isn't a
major purchaser of U.S. crops, as recently as July it had
arranged for the shipment of U.S. wheat as food aid for
Egypt.
   All this is expected to further depress wheat and corn
prices, which were already skidding.
   Wheat prices have fallen to their lowest levels in about
four years because the harvest, which is mostly complete, is
about 33% larger than last year's poor crop, and stockpiles
are building.
   Corn prices have slipped nearly 50 cents a bushel, or
about 15%, since June as good growing weather improved the
prospects for a strong harvest. September corn was unchanged
Friday at $2.5025 a bushel on the Chicago Board of Trade.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0040
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0040.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology Brief -- Commodore International Ltd.:
   Net Loss in June Quarter
   Narrowed From 1989 Period
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B5
</SO>
<CO>
   CBU
</CO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
</IN>
<LP>
   Commodore International Ltd., West Chester, Pa., posted a
net loss of $3.5 million, or 11 cents a share, for the fourth
quarter, ended June 30, as demand for its personal computers
remained lackluster.
   The loss represented an improvement over the year-earlier
loss of $8.9 million, or 28 cents a share, but much of the
difference was accounted for by the company's decision to
reduce by $10 million the amount it had set aside to cover
future tax payments. The operating loss in the latest quarter
was only somewhat narrower than in the year-earlier period --
$14 million compared with $16.7 million.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Sales rose 10% to $198.1 million from $180.3 million, but
Commodore said favorable foreign currency exchange rates
accounted for much of that gain. Unit sales of the Amiga
personal computer -- the machine on which Commodore has
staked its future -- climbed 40%. But unit sales of the
venerable C64 declined, as did sales of some IBM-compatible
machines.
   Commodore said its results continued to be hurt by heavy
marketing expenses.
   For the full fiscal year, Commodore posted a profit of
$1.5 million, or five cents a share, down 97% from a year
earlier.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0039
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0039.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   German Publisher Forms
   Electronic Media Division
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   G.SPR
</CO>
<LP>
   FRANKFURT -- West German publishing group Axel Springer
Verlag AG said Friday it has formed a new Electronic Media
division.
   West Berlin-based Springer said the new operating unit
will be responsible for the group's expansion into the
rapidly growing global electronic communications sector. It
cited specific areas such as "new (communications)
technologies and mobile communications."
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Springer added that it will place a priority on growth in
the electronic media market. That would include shareholdings
in satellite television stations, among others, officials
said.
   Meantime, the company that publishes West Germany's
popular mass-circulation daily newspaper, Bild, said it will
continue to expand aggressively in the newspaper and magazine
markets despite "hard competitive pressures" in West Germany.
   The company also said it plans to broaden its presence
abroad. Springer has been expanding into Eastern Europe since
the liberalization of the East Bloc.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0038
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0038.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Safety-Kleen Corp.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   SK WNEWS
</CO>
<LP>
   SAFETY-KLEEN Corp. (Elgin, Ill.) -- Joseph F. Knott, 54
years old and formerly executive vice president of this
automotive and industrial cleaning concern, was named
president and chief operating officer. He was also named a
director, expanding the board to nine members. Donald W.
Brinckman, 59, and formerly president, was named chairman and
remains chief executive officer. The former chairman, Russell
A. Gwillen, 68, was named chairman emeritus and remains a
director.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0037
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0037.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- WestAir Holding Inc.:
   Revenue Passenger Miles
   Increased 37% Last Month
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   WAH
</CO>
<IN>
AIRLINES (AIR)
</IN>
<LP>
   WestAir Holding Inc., Fresno, Calif., said July revenue
passenger miles increased 37% to 57.3 million from 41.8
million a year earlier. A revenue passenger mile is one
paying passenger flown one mile.
   The load factor, or percentage of seats filled, for the
month was 45.5%, compared with 48% a year earlier. WestAir
attributed the drop to last year's "kids fly free" promotion,
which boosted load factors.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The company also announced that it will raise fares 5%
Wednesday to offset higher fuel prices. WestAir operates as
United Express through a marketing agreement with United Air
Lines. It operates more than 850 daily flights to 60 U.S.
cities.
   For the year through July 31, WestAir said revenue
passenger miles rose 36% to 364.6 million from 267.7 million
a year earlier.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0036
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0036.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Morrison Knudsen
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   WNEWS MRN
</CO>
<LP>
   MORRISON KNUDSEN Corp. (Boise, Idaho) -- Joseph G. Fearon
was named chairman of this construction, transportation and
engineering concern's Rail Systems Group. Thomas J. Smith was
named president and chief executive officer of the group. The
company said it made the adjustment to meet the needs of its
rapidly growing mass transportation manufacturing group. Mr.
Fearon was formerly the president of the group. Mr. Smith was
formerly the senior vice president of manufacturing
operations for Fokker Aircraft BV in Amsterdam.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0035
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0035.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- May Department Stores Co.:
   Stock Offering Is Postponed
   In Venture Stores Inc. Unit
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B5
</SO>
<CO>
   MA VEN
</CO>
<IN>
INITIAL STOCK OFFERINGS (INI)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
</IN>
<LP>
   May Department Stores Co. said it postponed an initial
public offering of stock in its Venture Stores Inc. unit
because of "current market conditions."
   In June, St. Louis-based May said it planned to offer 14%,
or about 2.3 million Venture shares, at between $16 and $18 a
share. May then planned to spin off the remaining Venture
shares to May shareholders.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Since then, however, the stock market has declined, and
the environment for new offerings is less friendly.
   May nevertheless said it plans to complete the offering
"as soon as market conditions allow," and spin off the
remaining Venture shares before year end.
   The spinoff of the discount chain would allow May to
concentrate on its main business of department stores and
would better capitalize Venture, which plans to expand with
more stores.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0034
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0034.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Who's News:
   Chiron Corp.
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   CHIR WNEWS
</CO>
<LP>
   CHIRON Corp. (Emeryville, Calif.) -- John H. Williford,
60, was elected a director of this biotechnology concern,
increasing board membership to eight members.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0033
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0033.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Mexico to Get $300 Million
   From Development Bank
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   LATAM GE GM
</CO>
<IN>
BANKS (BNK)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- The Inter-American Development Bank approved
a $300 million loan to Mexico for improvements in the
country's transportation and telecommunications industries.
   The IADB said this was its first loan to support whole
sectors of a country's economy. Previous IADB lending to
Latin American countries has been linked to specific economic
development projects.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The IADB said the $300 million loan will be used by the
Mexican government to improve the efficiency, reduce costs
and expand the capacity of its trucking industry. It will
also support improvements in Mexico's telecommunications
services through the privatization of Telefonos de Mexico, a
government-owned company.
   IADB officials said the loan to Mexico is a co-financing
venture with the World Bank, which has approved $380 million
in other credits to support the same programs.
   Meanwhile, the U.S. Export-Import bank said it will
guarantee $20.5 million in loans to Mexico for the purchase
of about $24.1 million in railroad equipment from General
Electric Co. and General Motors Corp.
   The guarantee was extended to Mexico's Nacional
Financiera, which will arrange for the loans from U.S.
commercial banks or other private lenders.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0032
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0032.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   The Mideast Conflict:
   Pump Prices for Gasoline
   Decline but Not by Much
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3
</SO>
<IN>
PETROLEUM (PET)
</IN>
<LP>
   Gasoline pump prices fell Friday for the first time since
Iraq invaded Kuwait, but not by much.
   After prices ran up 15 cents to 20 cents a gallon in many
parts of the nation, a handful of major oil refiners began to
cut wholesale prices and it seems some of those reductions
are filtering on to the corner service station. Some big oil
companies froze their prices.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Companies said they made the unsually quick cuts in
response to falling crude-oil markets and to President Bush's
plea for pricing restraint.
   The American Automobile Association said the average price
nationwide for self-serve unleaded gasoline declined 0.3 cent
to $1.25 a gallon. The AAA survey found wide disparities from
area to area. In Michigan prices dropped by one cent and in
Indiana by five cents, while prices rose one cent in Texas.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0031
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0031.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Technology Brief -- PharmaKinetics Laboratories Inc.:
   U.S. Attorney Investigates
   Firm, Generic Drug Makers
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   PKLB BLR
</CO>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
</GV>
<LP>
   PharmaKinetics Laboratories Inc. disclosed that the U.S.
Attorney's office in Baltimore is investigating the company
and its chief scientific officer in connection with the grand
jury investigation of generic drug makers.
   The Baltimore-based company said a letter from the U.S.
Attorney didn't indicate the scope of the investigation of
the company and its chief scientific officer, Mark Perkal. It
said it wasn't aware "of any facts or circumstances that
would lead it to believe that Perkal or any other employee
has violated any laws."
</LP>
<TEXT>
   PharmaKinetics did testing for both Bolar Pharmaceutical
Co. based in Copiague, N.Y., and Vitarine Pharmaceuticals
Inc., of Spring Valley, N.Y. Both companies have pulled
generic drugs from the market because of evidence suggesting
they passed off brand-name drugs as their own to obtain
government clearance to market a generic version.
   Steven A. Woodman, PharmaKinetics chief executive, said
that the letter came "as a surprise to us, given the active
and positive nature of Dr. Perkal's and the company's
assistance in the various government investigations of the
generic drug industry over the last year."
   A lawyer for the company said it "has been and continues
to be cooperating in the investigation."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0030
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0030.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Interlake Corp.:
   Aerospace Parts Tested
   Incorrectly; Inquiry Begins
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C6
</SO>
<CO>
   IK WYMN
</CO>
<LP>
   Interlake Corp. said that some tests of aerospace parts
produced by the company weren't performed properly. The
company said it is investigating and doesn't believe any of
the parts are unsafe.
   The testing problems occurred at a Cleveland plant
Interlake sold in May to Wyman-Gordon Co., which notified
Interlake about the testing deficiencies and corrected the
problem.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The plant makes fittings, brackets, manifolds, housings
and swirlers, which are used to mix fuel and air, and sells
these products "throughout the aerospace industry," a
spokesman said.
   Interlake, based in Oak Brook, Ill., said that some tests
weren't handled properly and that some parts were welded
without customer approval. Interlake wouldn't identify the
customers, except the U.S. government, but said it has
informed them all. It said it also hired Arthur Andersen &amp;
Co., the accounting firm, to review the investigation into
the problem.
   The parts made at the plant sold for about $50 each, on
average, the spokesman said, and the plant produced annual
sales of between $8 million and $13 million while owned by
Interlake.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0029
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0029.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Heard on the Street:
   Chemical Stocks' Future May Be Clouded
   By Turmoil in the Oil Market, Analysts Say
   ----
   By Richard Koenig and Randolph B. Smith
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B2
</SO>
<CO>
   DOW VC UK CUE NLC GLK DD MTC
</CO>
<IN>
HEARD ON THE STREET (HRD)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
CHEMICALS, PLASTICS (CHM)
</IN>
<LP>
   Chemical stocks weren't a bad place for investors to hide
out after the oil market turmoil of 1973. But don't expect
history to repeat itself, analysts warn.
   Back in 1973, when war broke out in the Mideast and an oil
embargo sparked panic buying of many chemicals from already
busy plants, prices soared. For petrochemical makers, "it was
a short-term Shangri-La," recalls Paul Leming, a Morgan
Stanley analyst.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Chemical stocks handily beat the market in the 1974-75
decline. The Standard &amp; Poor's chemical index rose 8% in the
first three quarters after the oil shock while the S&amp;P 500
was declining 14%, Mr. Leming recalls.
   Now, however, analysts see trouble ahead, especially for
makers of bulk chemicals and plastics, whose costs are
closely tied to pricing at the oil well. The shares of Dow
Chemical, Vista Chemical, Union Carbide and Quantum Chemical,
already slumping before Iraqi troops invaded Kuwait, have
since continued to weaken.
   The threat of a sustained rise in oil prices deepens Wall
Street's doubts about when these stocks will rebound. Since
the invasion, analyst Harvey Stober at Dean Witter has
lowered his buy/hold rating on Dow and Quantum to hold, while
maintaining a hold on Carbide and a "swap" on Vista. He has
cut earnings estimates for all four. Leslie Ravitz at Salomon
Brothers has erased his buy recommendation for Carbide.
   Clouding the outlook is the industry's brisk expansion. A
survey by Anantha Raman &amp; Co., which tracks U.S. production
capacity, projects the industry will grow 7.2% in 1990 for
ethylene, a basic chemical building block; 16% for
polyethylene, the highest-volume plastic, found in milk jugs,
food wraps and housewares; and 8.8% for polyvinyl chloride,
widely used in construction.
   Expanding output will keep pressure on prices, perhaps
forcing producers to eat the higher cost of oil-based raw
materials. Analyst Leonard Bogner at PrudentialBache has
worked up some numbers for a "worst-case scenario." He
estimates that, if raw-material costs stemming from a
$3-a-barrel rise in oil prices had to be entirely absorbed,
the hit to annual per-share earnings would be $3.70 at
Quantum Chemical, $1.50 at Vista Chemical, 60 cents at
Carbide and 40 cents at Dow.
   Some building plans may be canceled. But demand could
change, too. DRI/McGraw Hill, a consulting firm, says its
preliminary analysis shows demand for petrochemicals slipping
5% in 1991 if oil is priced at $25 a barrel instead of
between $18 and $20.
   All this numbers-crunching comes amid great uncertainty
about what will happen next in the Mideast. Professional
stock watchers don't relish their additional roles as
geopolitical deep thinkers. "I'm not convinced this uptick in
oil prices will stick," says John Neff, manager of Windsor
Fund, which holds about 8 million Carbide shares. He calls
Carbide cheap at 2.8 times 1990 cash flow, and doesn't expect
to change his position in the short term.
   Indeed, if the stocks keep getting hammered, buying
opportunities may emerge. Morgan Stanley's Mr. Leming, while
glum about industry fundamentals, is recommending Quantum,
which has lost about 70% of its value in 12 months.
   Katharine Plourde, a specialty-chemicals analyst at
Donaldson Lufkin &amp; Jenrette, says Nalco Chemical and Great
Lakes Chemical also have been "overpenalized." She considers
the stocks "attractive now" with 20% growth potential over
the next 12 months, though she hasn't put them on her buy
list yet. She thinks Great Lakes, whose big line is fire
retardants, can raise prices to offset any lower demand for
its gasoline additives. Nalco's strengths are water and waste
treatment chemicals. Both companies have sidelines in
chemicals used in oil drilling.
   There is another oil shock on record, of course. But
during the 1979 climb in oil prices, chemical plants weren't
as busy; that year the stocks as a group did no better than
the S&amp;P 500. Since then, some industry giants have tried to
cushion themselves from oil swings. Du Pont and Monsanto have
sloughed off petrochemical businesses and diversified
further. Du Pont also bought an oil company, Conoco.
Salomon's Mr. Ravitz has upgraded Du Pont to a buy from a
hold because of the potential strength on its oil side.
   The widely diversified giants have won some fans among
analysts worrying about the next recession. Pharmaceutical
and farm-chemical businesses at Du Pont and Monsanto don't
follow the slopes of overall economic cycles. Monsanto argues
that even its core chemical business, long tied to the
housing and auto industries, isn't as subject to recessionary
pressures as it was in the early 1980s. For example, the
company makes the nylon for Wear-Dated carpet but says that
for every yard going into a new house, five are bought for
redecorating.
   "These companies during the '80s were saying, `We have
made ourselves more recession-proof,'" says Gerald Adolph, a
chemicals-industry consultant at Booz Allen &amp; Hamilton. "Now
we may find out."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0028
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0028.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Law -- Legal Beat:
   Nationwide Plan Set for Asbestos Cases
   ----
   By Wade Lambert and Paul M. Barrett
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B3
</SO>
<CO>
   MVL EPI WNEWS
</CO>
<IN>
LAW AND LEGAL AFFAIRS (LAW)
BUILDING MATERIALS (BLD)
</IN>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (FDL)
</GV>
<LP>
   After 20 years of relentless litigation, federal judges
from across the U.S. approved an unusual joint arrangement to
resolve the 90,000 asbestos personal-injury cases now
clogging the courts.
   Faced with thousands of new cases filed each month --
often by victims who will die before their claims are paid --
the judges approved an order Friday addressing the urgency of
the problem and setting up three forums for resolving the
cases. The actions announced in the order are intended to
pressure the defendants either to agree to a national
settlement or go to trial in a class-action lawsuit.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   For now, however, the judges' action is likely to bring
current settlement efforts to a halt as defendants size up
their new alternatives. Supporters of the judges' plan,
though, say that a consolidated, nationwide effort to resolve
the cases will benefit asbestos victims in the long run by
ensuring that funds are distributed more equitably and by
guaranteeing that money is left to pay future claims.
   Asbestos, once widely used as insulation, causes cancer
and respiratory ailments. Most of the claimants are former
shipyard and construction workers who became ill years later
from the asbestos dust they inhaled on the job. The
defendants are former asbestos makers and distributors who
are accused of failing to warn workers of the serious health
risks.
   "The need for a multicourt cooperative effort to dispose
of these cases is compelling," the judges said in the order.
"The various case management techniques utilized by the
federal courts over the last 10 years have proved to be
ineffective. . . . The asbestos litigation has become the
classic example of civil cases that cost too much and take
too long."
   The order was issued by Judge Thomas Lambros, chief judge
of the Northern federal district of Ohio, and by Judge Robert
Parker, chief judge of the Eastern federal district of Texas.
U.S. Judge Jack B. Weinstein of Brooklyn, whose criticism of
the Manville asbestos trust a few weeks ago was the catalyst
for the national effort, agreed to the order. Seven other
federal judges approved the order at a meeting in Washington
on Friday.
   The order includes plans for two possible class-actions,
one of which is likely to be kicked off today in Judge
Weinstein's courtroom in Brooklyn. That class action is meant
to include the less financially secure former asbestos makers
and is expected to eventually involve the Manville trust. The
trust's resources would be combined with those of other
defendants.
   The Manville trust, instrumental to Manville Corp.'s
bankruptcy-court reorganization plan in 1986, was set up to
pay asbestos personal-injury claims against the company. The
asbestos litigation controversy came to a head after the
trust said it couldn't pay new claimants for more than 20
years because it was running out of cash.
   The class-action motion before Judge Weinstein was filed
by Eagle-Picher Industries Inc., which claims that it and
other defendants don't have enough money to continue fighting
the cases. In court filings, the company said it spent $119.7
million on the litigation last year and is named in 2,000 new
suits a month.
   Under Friday's order, as many as five other defendants can
join Eagle-Picher in the class action. For the case to
proceed, the court will have to determine that the defendants
don't have enough money to pay current and future claims.
   Meanwhile, a national settlement effort for all cases will
be set up by Judge Lambros in Cleveland. The joint order
envisions a massive settlement. Several judges are expected
to participate by encouraging plaintiffs and defendants to
settle.
   In order to give the settlement process clout with
defendants, a wider class action will be heard by Judge
Parker in Beaumont, Texas. He will oversee cases against
defendants who are unwilling to settle.
   The judges will hear objections to the proposals at a
hearing on Sept. 14 in federal court in Cleveland. In recent
weeks, the judges' efforts to come up with a national
solution has drawn mixed reviews from plaintiffs and
defendants, and aspects of Friday's order are likely to be
appealed. But some attorneys indicated that the judges may
have found an acceptable middle ground.
   Louis S. Robles, an attorney for asbestos victims in
Miami, said he still opposes a class action. But considering
the judges' determination to come up with a national
approach, the latest order "was a prudent way to go" because
it doesn't immediately force the parties into a class action
and it allows current cases to continue, he said.
   Attorneys for Eagle-Picher praised the judges' decision.
"It is consistent with our goals," said Arvin Maskin, an
attorney for the company. "The corporate defendants remain
viable, transaction costs {of resolving the cases} are
reduced, and it alleviates a tremendous burden on the
courts."
   ---
   FORMER THORNBURGH AIDE indicted on cocaine-related
charges.
   A former Justice Department official was accused of using
cocaine in the latest of a string of highly visible problems
for Attorney General Dick Thornburgh.
   In a four-count indictment, a grand jury in Harrisburg,
Pa., accused Henry Barr of using cocaine over a four-year
period, including the time he served in the Justice
Department. In a highly unusual charge, Mr. Barr was also
accused of lying to cover up his drug use on an application
for a security clearance.
   Mr. Barr, a former federal prosecutor who served on Mr.
Thornburgh's staff when he was governor of Pennsylvania, quit
his Justice Department post in May 1989, citing personal
reasons. He had coordinated major criminal investigations for
the attorney general, including those involving drugs. His
lawyer, Charles Scarlata of Pittsburgh, said Mr. Barr would
plead not guilty.
   Mr. Thornburgh, trying to stay clear of the situation, has
recused himself from the Barr case on the grounds that he
knows the defendant personally. "I have no knowledge of the
particular circumstances of this case," the attorney general
said in a prepared statement on Friday.
   Mr. Thornburgh has suffered several political defeats,
including seeing top appointments rejected by the Senate and
personal aides implicated as not being fully truthful on
lie-detector tests administered during investigations of
Justice Department leaks.
   Both Mr. Barr's defense lawyer and Sen. Arlen Specter (R.,
Pa.) have called for appointment of a special independent
prosecutor in the Barr case to avoid conflicts of interest.
Mr. Thornburgh hasn't officially responded but isn't expected
to comply with the requests.
   Lawyers familiar with the case said they believe Mr. Barr
is the highest-ranking U.S. law enforcement official ever
charged with a drug offense.
   ---
   LIABILITY CRISIS seen by lawyers at small firms, survey
finds.
   The majority of lawyers surveyed by Lawyers Alert, a
Boston trade publication, feel that the legal system is too
complex and generates excessive litigation. But they don't
support any current reform proposals, the survey found.
   Five hundred plaintiff and defense lawyers practicing in
law firms of nine or fewer attorneys participated in the
study.
   According to the survey, 61% of the lawyers oppose federal
legislation to create a uniform national system for product
liability cases, 60% oppose limiting personal injury damages,
and 69% oppose statutes limiting the liability of doctors,
which have been enacted in many states.
   The lawyers were split on only one issue: 47% of the
lawyers said they favor no changes in medical malpractice
laws, while 41% said damages should be made easier to recover
from doctors.
   ---
   LEGAL SERVICES Corp. chooses former ethics chief as new
president.
   David Martin, director of the Office of Government Ethics
during the Reagan administration, was chosen to lead the
controversial poverty-law organization, which is funded by
the federal government.
   Chairman George Wittgraf said Mr. Martin "has strong
credentials both as a lawyer and as an administrator" with
extensive experience in government.
   But Caroline Stewart, spokeswoman for the National Legal
Aid and Defender Association, an advocacy organization for
legal aid, said: "We really don't know that much about him.
He has no discernible legal experience in legal services."
   Mr. Martin assumes the presidency of LSC at a time when it
is the focus of considerable controversy. Among the issues
currently being debated in Congress are whether the
organization should continue to participate in redistricting
suits and whether a current prohibition against litigating
abortion suits should remain in place.
   After leaving the Reagan administration, Mr. Martin was
affiliated with the Washington office of Porter, Wright,
Morris &amp; Arthur, a Columbus, Ohio, law firm. Since last year
he has had a solo law practice in Washington. He is expected
to assume office in September.
   ---
   GOING GREEN: Hannoch Weisman, a 150-lawyer firm in
Roseland, N.J., is abandoning traditional yellow legal pads.
From now on the firm will use white pads. Sanders M.
Chattman, chairman of Hannoch's 20-lawyer environmental
department, said that when the law firm started participating
in a recycling program, they learned that the yellow dye in
the pads made the cost of recycling prohibitive. One added
benefit is that white legal pads cost less.
   ---
   Amy Dockser Marcus and Timothy Noah contributed to this
article.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0027
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0027.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Advertising:
   Ad Spending
   For 2nd Half
   Looks Bleak
   ----
   By Joanne Lipman
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B1
</SO>
<CO>
   WPPGY IPG OMC
</CO>
<IN>
ADVERTISING, MARKETING, PUBLIC RELATIONS (ADV)
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   In the wake of the Iraqi invasion, with the twin threats
of inflation and recession looming at home, the advertising
business is facing a second half that may be even worse than
expected.
   After a generally slow first half, ad agency executives --
professionally optimistic, as usual -- had been promising
some recovery in the second half and next year. But the
Mideast crisis, and the economic threat that it set off,
appear to have splashed very cold water on that idea, some
executives said last week. Several said they are girding for
possible further client spending cutbacks. And the agencies
themselves have begun re-evaluating their own costs to see if
they can batten down and prepare for the worst.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "We haven't had any specific reaction from a client
saying, `The economy is bad, we have to cut,' but I've got to
tell you, I would be brain-dead not to feel that the yellow
light is on," says Burton Manning, chairman and chief
executive officer of WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson Co. unit.
"We're on budget now. But whether that will continue in light
of all this news, I just don't know."
   As events unfold, Thompson, like other agencies, is also
taking a second look at its own expenses, such as new hires
and department expansions. "We haven't stopped," Mr. Manning
says, "but we don't have our foot to the floor. We want to
make sure we aren't going to be foolish in terms of our own
costs."
   Several big agencies had already been scrambling to cut
costs. Interpublic, where domestic ad revenue dropped 5% to
6% in the first half, won't allow anyone to fly first class
beginning Sept. 1. The agency is also considering wage and
hiring freezes, says Eugene Beard, executive vice president.
And it is scrutinizing entertainment costs, chipping away at
what once was the backbone of Madison Avenue culture.
   The specter of rising oil prices adds yet another problem
to the already dangerous mix of the budget deficit and the
savings and loan crisis, Mr. Beard says. And that doesn't
augur well for client spending.
   "Clients are deferring spending or just cutting budgets,"
he says. The cuts are "incremental, 2% to 3%, not radical,"
he says, but they add up. As a result, Interpublic "is
looking at every single item in our operations. There are no
sacred cows." He adds, though, that the agency group isn't
considering layoffs and that it isn't changing its 1990
earnings forecast of $2.35 to $2.40 a share.
   Should Mideast tensions escalate and oil shortages result,
almost all major advertisers would be affected, ad executives
say. Manufacturers would see expenses rise, appliance and
home entertainment businesses would be hurt by rising costs
and skittish consumers, and travel-related industries would
be squeezed.
   "It will impact just about every business in the country,
and some will cut advertising spending," says Bob Wolf,
chairman and chief executive of North American operations at
ad agency Chiat/Day/Mojo. "Advertising is something a lot of
people believe they can cut short-term. Many times that's a
serious mistake."
   Mr. Wolf believes the Iraqi situation makes the economic
outlook for advertising "dramatically different" from just a
few weeks ago. He hadn't been optimistic even before. In the
past two weeks, Chiat laid off about 40 people, imposed pay
cuts on senior management, and replaced the top management of
its New York office following a rash of account losses. Mr.
Wolf says a number of remaining clients, including American
Express, New York Life Insurance and Arrow shirts, have
slashed ad spending.
   With the escalating threat in the Middle East, Mr. Wolf
says: "There's no good news on the horizon. I think optimism
would be if it {the economy} stays the way it is. Pessimism
is it's going to get worse."
   Not everyone agrees with that dire picture, though. At
Omnicom Group, ad revenue grew a better-than-average 8% in
the first half and will probably continue at that pace in the
second half, says Fred Meyer, chief financial officer. He
says the agency was spared in part because it isn't involved
in product categories that have slashed ad spending, such as
cigarettes. And, while a number of car companies have pared
spending, Omnicom's two auto clients, Chrysler and
Volkswagen/Audi, "had practically no cutbacks," he says.
   McCann-Erickson's top ad spending guru, Robert Coen, has
been predicting a modest 5.3% increase in 1990 U.S. ad
spending. He believes the Iraqi situation won't much change
that. He notes that after the 1973 oil embargo, ad spending
by food, packaged goods, liquor and other major consumer
companies "did surprisingly well. . . . It held up."
   Furthermore, if inflation does threaten as a result of the
Iraqi situation, he contends, "it could help advertising." He
reasons that with inflation on the rise, companies might not
be so quick to pour money into promotions, such as price
breaks given to retailers as an incentive to stock products.
Manufacturers will "figure their expenses are going to be
higher, so why give big discounts to retailers?" he says.
Instead, he suggests: "Advertising's relative importance
could rise. There may be a return to basic advertising,
rather than daily price cuts."
   ---
   Korey Dies at 56
                                                                                                       

   Lois Korey, president of ad agency Korey, Kay &amp; Partners,
New York, died Thursday night of a heart attack. She was 56
years old.
   Ms. Korey set up the agency more than eight years ago with
Allen Kay, her longtime collaborator. Together, Ms. Korey and
Mr. Kay created the New York area Honda ads that featured
"Danny," a woeful car salesman who sells "the car that sells
itself." They also created ads for Members Only clothing.
   Mr. Kay, who is the shop's chairman, said there are no
plans to replace Ms. Korey as president. "We were two people
who functioned as one person," he said.
   ---
   Ad Notes. . . .
                                                                                                       

   LONDON ACQUISITION: As expected, D'Arcy Masius Benton &amp;
Bowles acquired Yellowhammer PLC, a financially troubled
London ad agency with billings of about #60 million ($112
million). DMB&amp;B said its London office would operate
separately from Yellowhammer. Terms weren't disclosed.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0026
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0026.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- McCaw Cellular Communications:
   Loss Narrowed in Quarter
   As Revenue Jumped 102%
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   MCAWA
</CO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
TELEPHONE SYSTEMS (TLS)
</IN>
<LP>
   McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. reported a narrowed net
loss of $60.7 million, or 34 cents a share, in the second
quarter compared with $87.5 million, or 65 cents a share, a
year earlier.
   The Kirkland, Wash., company said revenue and cash flow
were at record levels. For the quarter, revenue increased
102% to $242.2 million from $120.1 million a year earlier.
Cash flow rose to $63.4 million, compared with $11.6 million.
The company cited the strength of its operations, further
penetration into the market and the consolidation of its
financial results with LIN Broadcasting Corp., which it
acquired control of in March.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   For the first six months, the company reported net income
of $791.1 million compared to a loss of $185.2 million a year
earlier. The latest six months includes the gain from the
sale of its Southeast cellular systems to Contel Cellular
Inc.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0025
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0025.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Webster Clothes Inc.:
   Edison Brothers Stores Plans
   To Buy Baltimore Operation
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE B6
</SO>
<CO>
   EBS WEBS
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   Edison Brothers Stores Inc., moving to expand its group of
menswear stores, plans to acquire Webster Clothes Inc. for
$19.2 million.
   St. Louis-based Edison said it agreed to pay $6 a share
for Webster's common stock. Fifty cents a share will be
placed in escrow, subject to certain events and adjustments.
A Webster official said the company will disclose details of
the contingencies on Monday in its merger filing with the
Securities and Exchange Commission. Certain Webster
shareholders, who own 80% of the stock, have granted Edison
an option to purchase their shares at the merger price.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The merger, subject to approval by Webster shareholders as
well as other conditions, is expected to close in late
September, Edison said.
   Edison operates about 1,200 menswear stores. Webster,
based in Baltimore, operates 128 young men's clothing stores
under the names Webster, Zeidler &amp; Zeidler, and Aggio.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0024
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0024.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   What's News --
   Business and Finance
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<LP>
   RISING OIL PRICES will cut the nation's already sluggish
economic growth by half but won't cause a recession, Treasury
Secretary Brady said. He again called on the Fed to ease
credit, and said those in Congress who view the current
problems as reasons to put off cutting the budget deficit are
"dead wrong."
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   The likelihood of a rebound in corporate profits in the
second half all but evaporated with Iraq's invasion of
Kuwait. The oil crisis makes it more likely that profits will
continue to decline until sometime in 1991.
   ---
   Producer prices fell 0.1% in July, suggesting that
inflationary pressures were easing before the recent jump in
oil prices. The report will make it easier for the Fed to
push down interest rates, although higher oil prices might
prevent it from lowering rates enough to avoid a recession.
   ---
   Thousands of asbestos cases could be dealt with under an
unusual plan approved by federal judges across the U.S. The
move is intended to pressure the defendants to either agree
to a consolidated nationwide settlement or go to trial in a
class-action suit.
   ---
   Robert Campeau was removed as chief executive of Campeau
Corp. and replaced by representatives of the troubled firm's
major creditors.
   ---
   Tokyo stock prices sank Monday morning on heavy selling by
arbitragers. At midday, the Nikkei index was down 763.12
points, or 2.8%.
   ---
   Chase Manhattan plans to offer a severance program to
several thousand U.S. employees as part of its effort to trim
costs by $300 million.
   ---
   Pic 'N' Save deflected a proxy fight by agreeing to name
three people to its board, widen a buy-back and drop
anti-takeover measures.
   ---
   Donald Trump intends to hire First Boston Corp. to
organize a restructuring of $1.3 billion in casino bonds,
according to several individuals.
   ---
   GM signaled that it plans broad price increases on most of
its 1991 cars and trucks, but will continue to offer
discounts if buyers balk.
   ---
   First Executive Corp. said Deloitte &amp; Touche has decided
not to continue as its auditor. The insurance firm earlier
this year reported an $859 million write-down of its
junk-bond portfolio.
   ---
   Chrysler was ordered to pay $7.6 million for mail fraud in
connection with the sale of about 30 previously wrecked cars
as new vehicles.
   ---
   UPS agreed with the Teamsters union to keep negotiating on
a new labor pact even if employees reject the
delivery-service firm's latest offer.
   ---
   Fuji Securities is adding personnel to its U.S. government
securities trading operation, a surprise in an industry that
has been devastated by losses.
   ---
   Homestead Financial posted a surprising $30.2 million
second-quarter loss, reflecting loss reserves tied to the
California real estate market.
   ---
   Southmark emerged from Chapter 11 reorganization and began
distributions to creditors and shareholders.
   ---
   Markets --
   Stocks: Volume 145,340,000 shares. Dow Jones industrials
2716.58, off 42.33; transportation 974.82, off 23.36;
utilities 203.09, off 1.39.
   Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3379.77, off
5.54.
   Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 133.41, up 0.74; spot
index 132.55, up 0.67.
   Dollar: 150.45 yen, up 0.65; 1.5905 marks, off 0.0060.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0023
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0023.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Economy -- Tracking the Economy:
   Analysts Ponder Chances of Recession,
   Look to Consumer Spending, Oil Crisis
   ----
   By Pamela Sebastian
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A2
</SO>
<IN>
ECONOMIC NEWS (ECO)
ECONOMIC AND MONETARY INDICATORS (EMI)
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- The indicator most likely to kick-start a
recession -- consumer spending -- occupies economists' minds,
if not their calendars, this week.
   Instead, the days ahead are heavy with July economic
reports, most of which are passe in light of the recent
Middle East oil crisis. Thursday carries the heaviest data
with reports on the consumer price index, industrial
production, capacity utilization, housing starts and building
permits. The week also brings July retail sales due tomorrow
and the June trade deficit, due Friday.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The industrial reports are likely to be flat, confirming
beliefs that the economy had already stalled before the oil
crisis. As for inflation, the consensus view calls for the
July CPI to log a moderate 0.3% increase, on the heels of a
slight fall in the July producer price index.
   "But no one will care," says Brian J. Fabbri, chief
economist at Midland Montagu Bank, New York. "The obvious
focus is on what the CPI and PPI will do in the next two
months: They're both probably going to be up over one
percentage point," he adds.
   Now, economists are trying to figure how that higher
inflation will bite into consumer spending, which accounts
for about two-thirds of all economic activity.
   Donald Ratajczak, a Georgia State University economist,
calculates that every $6.25 increase in the price of a barrel
of oil adds a full percentage point to the CPI. So, the
approximately $26-a-barrel price will add nearly 1 1/2
percentage points to the CPI.
   Traditionally, about half of the increase comes out of
personal savings as consumers spend on energy needs what they
would have banked, he said. "But the other half comes out of
discretionary spending," he added. So, Mr. Ratajczak figures
the initial trickle-down impact on consumer spending will be
a drop of about three-quarters of one percentage point.
August statistics should begin to record the drop.
   Will that be enough of a spending shock to drop the
economy into recession? "That question rests on where you
thought we were going when the oil crisis happened. I think
we were headed toward recession anyway," said Mr. Ratajczak.
He just lowered an already-sluggish growth rate forecast on
real gross national product to 0.5 percentage point from one
percentage point for the next four quarters.
   Not everyone thinks the oil crisis will force a recession.
Stephen H. Roach, senior economist at Morgan Stanley &amp; Co.,
New York, just issued a post-crisis economic outlook that
noted: "We continue to maintain that the U.S. economy has
enough forward momentum to avoid contraction -- even in the
face of an energy shock."
   Midland Montagu's Mr. Fabbri noted that the oil crisis
could tarnish a longstanding bright spot: exports. Since
Eastern Europe and Asia will be paying more for their oil,
too, their appetite for U.S.-made goods may tumble, he said.
   A drop-off in global demand would work against the U.S.
trade deficit, as would higher prices for imported oil. On
the other hand, lower imports to the U.S. because of cooler
consumer spending could help the trade balance. Mr. Fabbri
noted such offsetting forces may mean that the overall trade
deficit doesn't move very much. "So, people might
underestimate the effect of oil," he said. "But there will no
doubt be a shift of resources to the oil-producing countries
and probably weaken the U.S."
   The consensus on the June trade deficit calls for a slight
narrowing to $7.1 billion from $7.7 billion in May, according
to MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc. MMS noted
the oil imports were lower and prices were softer in June.
Since trade figures lag by two months, the oil crisis isn't
expected to be reflected in the deficit report for some time.
   Other views call for a meager 0.1% increase in July
industrial production after June's 0.4% gain. The operating
capacity is likewise expected to rachet down to 83.4% from
83.5% in June. July retail sales are expected to log a weak
0.3% increase on the heels of June's 0.5% gain.
   ---
                  Closely Watched Reports
                                                                                                       

      Statistics Released in the Week Ended August 10
                                                                                                       

                                                     CHANGE
                                                (from prior
                                   TOTAL            period)
                                                                                                       

   Money Supply
                                                                                                       

     M1 -- Week ended
     July 30 (in billions)          $807.8          + $2.0
                                                                                                       

     M2 -- Week ended
     July 30 (in billions)        $3,270.4          + $0.3
                                                                                                       

     M3 -- Week ended
     July 30 (in billions)        $4,056.8          + $0.2
                                                                                                       


     July                            118.0          - 0.1%
                                                                                                       

   Consumer credit
     June (in billions)            $723.30          +$0.46
                                                                                                       

   New jobless claims
     Week ended July 28            344,000          - 3.1%
                                                                                                       

            Statistics to Be Released This Week
                                                                                                       

   Retail sales (Tues.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   Auto sales (Tues.)
   Early August
                                                                                                       

   Housing starts (Thurs.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   Money supply (Thurs.)
                                                                                                       

   Building permits (Thurs.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   Consumer price index (Thurs.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   Industrial production (Thurs.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   Capacity utilization (Thurs.)
   July
                                                                                                       

   New jobless claims (Thurs.)
                                                                                                       

   Trade deficit (Fri.)
   June
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0022
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0022.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Mutual Funds:
   Stock Funds Hold Up in Stormy Week
   ---
   Income Groups
   Cushion Gulf Crisis
   ----
   By Ellen E. Schultz
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C1
</SO>
<IN>
MUTUAL AND MONEY-MARKET FUNDS (FND)
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- Mutual fund investors just weathered one of
the stormiest weeks since the Crash of '87.
   But while all fund categories dropped, most stock-fund
groups outperformed the market as a whole in the week ended
Thursday.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   As might be expected, some fund groups that are supposed
to cushion the ride for investors were among the least
affected as the markets went into spasms following news of
the Middle East crisis. Equity-income funds and
growth-and-income funds both declined less than the 3.13%
drop in the Standard &amp; Poor's 500-stock index. According to
figures compiled by Lipper Analytical Services Inc., the
equity-income group was down 2.48%, while the
growth-and-income category lost 2.73%.
   Perhaps surprisingly, some other fund groups that
typically follow the performance of the overall market
managed to do a bit better this time. Capital-appreciation
funds declined 2.97%, while growth funds were off 3.03%, the
Lipper numbers show.
   One-week performance numbers shouldn't be the basis of
anyone's investment decisions, of course. But the results of
the latest period show once again how portfolios with
income-oriented investments, such as high-dividend stocks,
can lessen the shocks of unruly markets.
   The Lipper numbers also show the importance of looking
beyond group results. Many individual funds did strikingly
better or worse than their group averages. Among
equity-income funds, for instance, Bull &amp; Bear Equity Income
lost 3.88%, underperforming the group average by 1.4
percentage points. Some capital-appreciation funds actually
posted gains. These included Shield Portfolio: Aggressive
Growth, up 2.84%; Sherman Dean Fund, up 2.40%, and Dreyfus
Capital Value, up 2.25%.
   The week's biggest losers were international funds. The
general international stock fund category was off 5.68%, but
funds that specialize in stocks of companies in the Pacific
region were off an even bigger 7.03%. According to Lipper's
compilation, the worst-performing fund of any group was
Tyndall-Newport: Tiger. The fund, which invests mostly in
Singapore, Hong Kong, Thailand and Malaysia, dropped 12.80%.
   Even among international funds, however, there were
exceptions to the overall group performance. Some Australian
funds posted gains for the week, while some Canadian funds
lost very little: First Australia Income was up 2.31%,
MacKenzie Canada was down 1.41%. Among the reasons, says A.
Michael Lipper, president of the analytical firm, is that
higher oil prices could benefit oil-producing countries
outside the Middle East, including Australia and Canada.
   Other poor performers included small-company growth funds,
down 3.67%, and science-and-technology funds, down 3.8%.
Historically, these categories are among the weakest
performers in market drops, according to Lipper.
   Gold funds were the strongest performing stock-fund
category, losing 1.29%. Indeed, the best performing fund of
the 1,784 stock and bond funds that Lipper tracks was
Strategic Gold &amp; Minerals, up 5.26%.
   On the whole, funds that include both bonds and stocks
lost less than straight stock funds. That's because the bonds
in their portfolios generate yields that offset the falling
values of the stocks.
   These groups include convertible securities funds, which
contain corporate bonds or preferred stocks that can be
converted into a specified number of a company's shares, and
balanced funds, which typically have at least 40% of their
portfolios invested in bonds.
   "Flexible-portfolio" funds also held up well. These are
asset-allocation funds that are structured to include stocks,
bonds, gold, other securities and cash, in percentages that
reflect the fund manager's perception of what will perform
best under current economic conditions.
   ---
         How the Major Types of Funds Have Fared
                                                                                                       

   Performance of various mutual fund categories following
news of the Middle East crisis.
   (Total returns with dividends and capital gains
reinvested)
                                                                                                       

                           ASSETS     LATEST WEEK
   FUND                    IN         8/2/90 TO    LATEST 12
   CATEGORY                MILLIONS   8/9/90       MONTHS
                                                                                                       

   STOCK EQUITY FUNDS
                                                                                                       

 Growth &amp; Income            $82,131     -2.73%     - 1.97%
 Growth                      76,165     -3.03      - 1.76
 Equity-Income               23,908     -2.48      - 4.05
 Capital Appreciation        19,204     -2.97      - 3.63
 Small Company Growth        11,594     -3.67      - 4.40
 Utilities                    6,011     -2.51      + 1.16

 Option-Income                2,850     -2.11      - 3.62
 Science &amp; Technology         2,066     -3.80      + 2.15
 Natural Resources            1,961     -2.25      + 3.78
                                                                                                       

   INTERNATIONAL STOCK FUNDS
                                                                                                       

 Global                      14,042     -4.81      + 2.44
 International                9,786     -5.68      + 4.81
 European Region              3,912     -5.14      +14.18
 Pacific Region               1,492     -7.03      - 0.32
                                                                                                       

   STOCK AND BOND FUNDS
                                                                                                       

 Balanced                    14,114     -2.12      + 0.33
 Flexible Portfolio           4,172     -2.05      + 0.68
 Convertible Securities       2,720     -1.99      - 2.84
 Global Flexible              1,478     -2.56      + 0.48
                                                                                                       

   BOND FUNDS
                                                                                                       

 Fixed-Income               160,534     -1.15      + 3.49
 World Income                 3,716     -0.26      + 7.18
 Average Equity Fund          -----     -3.24      - 1.20
 S&amp;P 500 Index                -----     -3.13      + 1.0
                                                                                                       

   Source: Lipper Analytical Services Inc.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0021
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0021.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- AmeriFirst Bank:
   Thrift Signs Pact to Accept
   Strict Regulatory Control
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A6
</SO>
<CO>
   AMRI
</CO>
<GV>
TREASURY DEPARTMENT (TRE)
</GV>
<LP>
   AmeriFirst Bank of Miami said it signed an agreement with
the Office of Thrift Supervision that puts it under the
strict control of regulators in the areas of commercial
lending, foreclosures and development real estate.
   AmeriFirst said in a statement that the agreement permits
federal regulators to appoint a conservator or receiver for
the institution if it deems the step necessary.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The thrift said the pact allows "the bank to continue to
serve fully its retail and deposit customers."
   AmeriFirst has been hurt by a large portfolio of troubled
commercial real-estate loans.
   Earlier this month, after spending more than a year as
chairman of the board, M. Lee Pearce, a prominent Miami
businessman, resigned, saying he felt he had done all he
could. He was succeeded by Laurence Brodym, a local dentist.
   As reported, AmeriFirst recently said a capital plan,
which included an infusion of private capital, appeared
"infeasible," and, as a result, the Office of Thrift
Supervision rejected it.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0020
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0020.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Corrections &amp; Amplifications
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A6
</SO>
<LP>
   STEVEN L. GLAUBERMAN, a former associate at the New York
law firm of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher &amp; Flom gave
inside-trading information to his sister, Lori Glauberman,
the government has alleged. Friday's edition misstated where
Ms. Glauberman allegedly got her information.
   (See: "U.S. Files Charges in Insider-Trade Case Involving
Ex-Scadden Takeover Lawyer" -- WSJ Aug. 10, 1990)
</LP>
<TEXT>
   ---
   THE SALARY for H.J. Heinz Co. Chairman Anthony J.F.
O'Reilly in the fiscal year ended May 2 was $708,117 in cash
compensation and $2.6 million in bonuses. In Friday's
edition, Mr. O'Reilly's salary was misstated.
   (See: "Heinz'z O'Reilly Signs 5-Year Contract, Receives
Options to Buy 4 Million Shares" -- WSJ Aug. 10, 1990)
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0019
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0019.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   OTC Focus:
   Mideast Tension
   Cools the Market
   For New Issues
   ----
   By Anne Newman and Anita Raghavan
   Staff Reporters of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C1
</SO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
STOCK INDEXES (NDX)
INITIAL STOCK OFFERINGS (INI)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- The hot market for new issues has suddenly
cooled.
   As tensions in the Middle East shook the financial
markets, investment bankers postponed 13 out of 15 initial
public stock offerings planned for last week, according to a
tally by Investment Dealers Digest, a trade publication.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Many underwriters say they will try to creep back this
week if stock prices remain stable, but they agree the
euphoria that bathed the IPO market this summer isn't likely
to return soon.
   If last week's lone new stock offering is an example, IPO
prices will fall and companies won't be willing to sell as
much stock as they had been to the public. Volatile stock
prices also may drive both short-term investors and marginal
companies from the IPO market, analysts say.
   "It's an extraordinarily fragile market," says Kenneth
Fitzsimmons, head of the syndicate department at Robertson,
Stephens &amp; Co., San Francisco, which last week underwrote an
initial offering of Easel Corp. at a lower price than
planned.
   Surging oil prices have sparked concern about a recession
and higher inflation in the U.S. In uncertain times,
investors are particularly wary of infant companies that may
be vulnerable to economic upheavals. Recently, analysts add,
companies with relatively weak finances, lured by rising IPO
prices, have been testing the public market.
   "In the past few weeks, you've seen some issues being
filed that have no business coming to the market," says Mark
Basham, a new-issues analyst for Standard &amp; Poor's Corp. The
recent plunge in stock prices will weed out many of those
companies, he predicts.
   Falling stocks prices also will damp demand for new
offerings by investors expecting quick profits from sharply
rising new shares, says Alan Radlo, portfolio manager of the
$734 million Fidelity OTC Fund. "This market will start
separating the long-term investors from the people who throw
money at the markets," he says.
   Whether companies go through with planned offerings at
their hoped-for prices will depend on how events in the
Middle East unfold, says Mr. Fitzsimmons of Robertson
Stephens. "It's really out of our control."
   By one investment banker's estimate, potential offering
prices for proposed new issues fell 15% last week. If the
stock market remains at current levels, fully onethird of all
new and secondary offerings planned for this year could
vanish, predicts David Weild, director of the equity
syndicate department at Prudential-Bache Securities.
   On the other hand, he adds, if the stock market rebounds,
many of those offerings could still be completed. "There are
still a lot of people out there with cash" to spend on new
issues, he says. "You could still see 20 deals a week, even
with a market correction."
   Initial offerings were humming before they came to a
standstill last week. Through the end of July, there were 152
new offerings at $1 a share or more this year, with a total
of more than $8 billion, according to IDD Information
Services. This year had been the best for new offerings since
the 1987 stock-market crash; July set a record with 29 IPOs.
   Despite the current stock-market plunge, investment
bankers remain plucky  -- at least about their intentions.
Underwriters of 11 IPOs scheduled for last week have said
they plan to come back to the market this week, according to
Frank Santos, managing editor of Eliot Sharp's Financing
News, an IDD newsletter that tracks new issues.
   Mr. Santos, however, says that even if this week's stock
market finds some sturdy ground, he expects only half of
those will actually go public. Even that half will probably
trade at the low end of their estimated price ranges, he
adds. "The market's just too shaky," he says.
   Some of this year's busiest syndicate directors also
expect a slowdown. "In a market where there's considerable
unrest, I don't think you can ask buyers to step up to the
plate," says Alexander Daignault, head of the equity
syndicate department at Alex. Brown &amp; Sons Inc., Baltimore,
which ranks among this year's top underwriters.
   Should uncertainty continue to rattle the markets, some
underwriters say they may be forced to use creative marketing
techniques to sell IPOs. Mr. Daignault says one way
underwriters could successfully sell an offering in these
conditions is to market it as a "quasi-private placement,"
targeting it to a small group of buyers.
   That's similar to what Robertson Stephens did when it
underwrote the Easel offering last week. The brokerage
company, which was the first underwriter to bring a company
public after the 1987 crash, managed to sell a 1.6
million-share offering Thursday by Easel, a software product
concern, at $8 a share.
   The secret to selling the Easel offering, Mr. Fitzsimmons
says, was cutting the price of the issue and targeting it to
a small group of long-term institutional investors. Robertson
Stephens shaved the price to $8 a share from an expected $9
to $11 a share. Easel also reduced the size of the offering,
which was oversubscribed, to 1.6 million shares from an
originally planned 1,850,000 shares.
   More than 100 buyers originally subscribed to the
offering. After the market plunged, if the original buyers
"didn't call to cancel, we assumed they canceled," Mr.
Fitzsimmons explains. The underwriters then found 30
institutional buyers who were seasoned investors in emerging
growth companies. "They tried to select people who weren't
going to flip the stock quickly," says John McDonough, chief
financial officer at Easel.
   Instead of giving members of the syndicate stock to sell,
Robertson Stephens completely controlled the allocation of
the stock, allowing the company to keep a close eye on how
the shares were distributed. By limiting distribution and
selecting buyers that were unlikely to sell out of the stock
once it started trading, Robertson Stephens was able to
reduce the chances of the stock plunging in the secondary
market. Easel closed Friday at 8 5/8.
   "That's one way and a good way to do a deal in this kind
of environment," says Mr. Daignault of Alex. Brown, which had
been expected to price initial public offerings by Black Box
Inc., Crescent Jewelers Inc. and Gerrity Oil &amp; Gas Corp. last
week.
   Gerrity Oil &amp; Gas is now targeted for pricing today, with
Crescent slated to come to market later in the week. Black
Box shares won't be offered until late this month, syndicate
officials say.
   ---
   Friday's Market Activity
                                                                                                       

   The over-the-counter market fell as investors and traders
sold shares amid concerns that tensions in the Middle East
might flare up over the weekend.
   The Nasdaq Composite Index fell 4.95 points, to 408.03, a
1.2% slide, as volume eased to 112 million shares from 129.9
million shares Thursday. Declining shares overtook advancers,
1,248 to 722.
   Sun Microsystems added 1 1/4 to 31. Late Thursday, the
Mountain View, Calif., maker of computer workstations
exceeded analysts' expectations with fiscal fourthquarter net
income of 51 cents a share, compared with a year-earlier loss
of 25 cents a share.
   Exabyte dropped 3 7/8 to 12 3/8. The Boulder, Colo., maker
of cartridge-tape systems said it expects its net income for
the third quarter ending Sept. 30 to fall below the 38 cents
a share earned in the second quarter. The company earned 17
cents a share in the third quarter a year earlier.
   Shares of office supply "superstores" fell after Salomon
Brothers cut its earnings estimates for Office Club, one of
the leaders in the young industry, according to Dow Jones
Professional Investor Report. Office Club dropped 1 1/2 to
12.
   Staples, another warehouse-style retailer of office
products, eased 1/2 to 18 3/4. Meanwhile, BizMart fell 1/2 to
11 1/8. The stock remains above its recent lows, however,
which it hit at the end of July when the company said it
would post a loss in its latest fiscal first quarter. The
company made the announcement just days after completing a
2,750,000-share offering of its stock at $15.75 a share.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0018
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0018.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Bonsai Take Years
   To Grow, Which Is
   A Very Good Thing
   ---
   A Nurturing Environment
   Is Ideal for Tiny Trees
   -- And Men With Tattoos
   ----
   By Asra Q. Nomani
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A1
</SO>
<LP>
   STILLWATER, Minn. -- Emil Johnson isn't a typical tree
lover.
   The 53-year-old, his arm tattooed with a wolf howling at
the moon, daintily snips needles from a potted Juniper. Four
years ago, the tree was scraggly and four-feet tall. Now, it
reaches only a foot and is shaped like one of the Great
Pyramids at Giza.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Mr. Johnson is practicing the Oriental art of "bonsai" --
pruning and shaping trees until they become miniature
sculptures. "It's never finished," he muses.
   This is probably a good thing.
   Mr. Johnson is serving a 40-year sentence at the Minnesota
Correctional Institute in Stillwater, one of the state's two
maximum security prisons. In 1964, Mr. Johnson robbed, then
killed, a 22-year-old service-station attendant. "The man
kicked me, and I shot him," says Mr. Johnson.
   Today, he is a member of the Stillwater Prison Bonsai
Society -- a select group of murderers and armed robbers who
toil in a prison-yard greenhouse, where flowers bloom and
trees take root. One convict gently bends a branch and coils
a wire around it to keep it crooked. Another snips off buds.
Their bonsai are in various stages of a training that may
last decades.
   Bonsai came to Stillwater four years ago, when inmate
Billy Dye plucked a Time/Life bonsai guide from a pile of
donated books. Intrigued, he practiced on trees that grew
between the cracks in the prison's sidewalks. Then one day,
with the guarded consent of the warden, Mr. Dye called the
president of the Minnesota Bonsai Society.
   "It was weird," recalls Randy Clark, the group's
past-president. "He asked me, `Does bonsai take a long time?
Is it something you can do in a confined space?' I said,
`Yeah,' and he said, `How would you like to teach bonsai to a
crazy bunch of convicts.' I thought, `Oh, God. Criminals
doing the gentle art of bonsai, what next?'"
   From humble beginnings -- a handful of inmates working
with Mr. Clark and using clumsy plastic scissors -- grew a
close-knit group of avid horticulturists. Two years ago, the
prison gardeners won five ribbons in the novice class at the
Minnesota State Fair bonsai show. A year later, they snagged
seven. The society also exhibited at a Mother's Day show in
1988, and again this year.
   The group of 15 -- the maximum number the bonsai
greenhouse can accommodate -- includes 13 murderers and two
armed robbers, perhaps the reason they can't personally
attend the Mother's Day shows or the state fairs. The
society's president, Tim Eling, killed an off-duty police
officer. Mr. Dye, who is 5-feet-5 and called the "Runt
Treeman of Stillwater," (a la the "Birdman of Alcatraz"),
murdered a 24-year-old pizzeria employee.
   Because recruits must be sponsored by an existing member,
then passed on by a two-thirds vote and approved by the
society's two sponsors on the prison staff, members have
virtual control over who gets in. Mostly, it's their friends.
Mostly, they're white. Sex offenders who've abused children,
about 20% of the inmate population, are not welcome. They are
shunned prison-wide.
   With membership come some elements of style -- and
freedom. Members have business cards emblazoned with their
logo: a bonsai tree with a broken chain hanging from the
tree. They have stationery that lists their officers. And for
as many as 50 hours each week, they have the chance to toil
in a thermostat-controlled oasis where ceiling fans whirl.
   In the greenhouse, a rescued cowbird egg sits on a wooden
plank under the warmth of a light bulb. "I will give every
effort for its survival," says one of the society's newest
initiates, Jamie Maxwell, who is serving time for
third-degree murder.
   By contrast, the prison is an ancient stone building
situated on a woodland bluff along the St. Croix River near
the Wisconsin border. Two pairs of cell blocks flank the
sterile hallway that strips through the prison. The dark,
noisy cell blocks each have four tiers of cages, each cage
measuring 6-by-10-feet.
   "This is totally an escape," Mr. Dye says of life amid the
bonsai. "This is ours as much as anything can be in here."
With the exception of volunteer teachers, outsiders aren't
welcome.
   The group boasts that it hasn't had a single greenhouse
assault. (Mr. Dye was accused of hitting a fellow inmate with
a birdhouse, for which he spent time in the "hole," or
solitary confinement. But that incident happened in the
cellblock.) Tools -- wire cutters, branch cutters and branch
benders -- are carefully checked in and out. None has been
stolen. Members know that the smallest infraction could put
an end to their society.
   Still, the prisoners are not without their differences.
They bicker when they can't find one of their trees and think
another inmate has moved it. They grumble when they think a
piece of copper wire has been stolen from their trees. They
rib Mr. Dye about hogging the pay phone to lobby bonsai
boosters for donations.
   Generally though, arguments concern aesthetics. Mr. Dye is
a strict traditionalist -- using an understated planter,
eschewing geegaws. Mr. Johnson breaks the rules. He lays a
mirror below one tree to simulate a lake. He plants another
bonsai in a slice of tree trunk he painted with shiny
polyurethane. Some prisoners put tiny ceramic oxen in their
planters. Others favor figurines of pagodas and Chinese men
wearing coolie hats.
   Mr. Dye had a running tiff with former inmate Karta Singh
over matters of style -- which way to bend a tree branch, for
example -- and substance, whether a bonsai should be
fertilized. They entered their trees at the state fair. Mr.
Dye won a red ribbon. Mr. Singh one-upped him with a blue.
But the bickering didn't end until Mr. Singh was released.
   The inmates' bonsai are considered among the neatest at
shows. "You won't find a single browned needle on their
trees," says Ann Erb, a bonsai volunteer. Occasionally,
though, they are forced to improvise. Last year, when they
couldn't get baby oil, normally used to buff planters into
show condition, they turned to motor oil. "The trees smelled
like a '57 Chevy," says Mr. Clark, the teacher.
   Bonsai aren't suited to all aspects of prison life. When a
shipment of about 100 trees arrived one recent Friday,
officials searched them for hidden contraband. As a result,
bonsai members didn't get the trees until Monday. Half the
trees were dead.
   Bonsai are also at risk during "shakedowns" -- when
officials conduct weapon searches and inmates are locked in
their cells 24 hours a day. During the last shakedown, Mike
Hermerding, a burly guard and a bonsai group sponsor,
surreptitiously tended the trees. "I rolled up my sleeves,
dug in, repotted the plants and washed my hands kind of like
nothing else had happened. I didn't want my peers to get it
on film," he says. When the inmates returned to the
greenhouses more than two weeks later, their beloved trees
were a little scruffy but alive.
   This kind of dedication -- from prisoners and sponsors --
may soon pay off. A local greenhouse maker, Poly-Tex Inc.,
which has donated much of the bonsai equipment to Stillwater,
is negotiating with prison authorities to take the trees
public. Poly-Tex will pay inmates 50 cents to $4.50 per hour,
average for prison wages, to sculpt trees, which local
nurseries will then sell. Possible marketing pitches for the
trees: Hard Rock Bonsai, Hard Times Bonsai, Prison Blue
Bonsai and Ball and Chain Bonsai.
   For the moment, though, inmates pursue their art. They
banter about whether to snip off a low branch on one tree.
Mr. Dye laments a recent loss. "Sometimes these things just
decide they're going to die," he says.
   "You give it all this care. You've done everything right,"
he mulls. "It's like children. You feed 'em. You change its
diapers. You do everything. You give 'em everything in the
world, and the little bastards end up going to prison." He
laughs at the comparison.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0017
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0017.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   Japan's Trade Surplus Falls 10.3%,
   But Is Expected to Widen Again
   ----
   By Christopher J. Chipello
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   JAPAN EUROP FREST
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC NEWS AND STATISTICS (IEN)
</IN>
<LP>
   TOKYO -- Despite a 10.3% decrease in Japan's trade surplus
during July, economists continued to say that the imbalance
is likely to widen later this year.
   The Finance Ministry said Friday that the surplus fell to
$5.38 billion in July from $6 billion a year earlier, as
declines in the surpluses with the U.S. and the European
Community offset a 43% rise in the trade imbalance with other
Asian nations.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Even though the overall surplus narrowed, exports --
measured on a customs-cleared basis -- rose for the second
consecutive month following eight consecutive monthly
declines. They gained 1.8% from a year earlier, to $23.89
billion. And although imports rose 6%, to $18.51 billion,
economists said the growth in imports appears to be tailing
off.
   "Exports are going up and import growth is weakening,"
said Yoichi Tazawa, an economist at Nomura Research
Institute.
   Officials at the Finance Ministry, however, indicated they
didn't share that view. While one-time factors contributed to
a jump in the June surplus, the July figures suggest
continued improvement in the balance, they said.
   The officials also noted that manufactured goods accounted
for 54.3% of total imports in July -- the highest level since
officials began following that measure several years ago.
Imports of manufactured goods are considered significant
because critics of Japanese trade practices assert that the
country tends to discourage imports with a high value-added
content.
   The July figures, of course, didn't reflect the surge in
oil prices that followed Iraq's invasion of Kuwait. Should
oil prices remain high, Japan's import bill would rise.
Nevertheless, at their current levels, it is unlikely that
higher oil prices will prevent Japan's overall surplus from
rising in coming months, economists said.
   The yen's weakening during the past year has increased the
competitiveness of Japanese exports by making them less
expensive in terms of other currencies. At the same time, it
has made imports more costly. And massive investment by
Japanese corporations in plant and equipment has further
strengthened their competitive position.
   S.G. Warburg Securities (Japan) Inc. expects the surplus
to grow in the second half. But chief economist Jesper Koll
said the firm has trimmed its forecast for the overall 1990
surplus to $68 billion from $70 billion and has lowered its
1991 projection to $70.3 billion from $80 billion -- assuming
that oil prices remain between $22 and $25 a barrel. (Oil for
September delivery was quoted at $26.23 a barrel in New York
on Friday.) Japan's trade surplus was $64.32 billion in 1989
and $77.56 billion in 1988.
   In July, the politically sensitive surplus with the U.S.
declined 20.5% from a year earlier, to $3.07 billion from
$3.86 billion. Imports from the U.S. rose 5%, to $4.45
billion. Exports to the U.S. fell 7.2%, to $7.51 billion.
   The surplus with the European Community fell 29.9%, to
$1.15 billion from $1.64 billion. A nearly five-fold increase
in the value of imported paintings helped account for a 36.4%
rise in imports from the EC, to $3.19 billion. Exports to the
EC rose 9.1%, to $4.34 billion.
   Japan's surplus with the rest of Asia, excluding China,
surged for the second consecutive month, jumping 43%, to
$2.49 billion from $1.74 billion. Exports to the rest of Asia
rose 7.3%, to $7.53 billion. Imports from the rest of Asia
declined 4.5%, to $5.04 billion.
   After seasonal adjustment, Japan's overall trade surplus
was $4.76 billion in July, down 30.9% from June.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0016
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0016.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Dividend News:
   La Jolla Bancorp
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C9
</SO>
<CO>
   LJC
</CO>
<IN>
DIVIDENDS (DIV)
</IN>
<LP>
   LA JOLLA BANCORP, La Jolla, Calif., declared a special
one-time cash dividend of 21 cents a share, payable Aug. 23
to stock of record Aug. 20. The bank holding company also
declared a one-time 2% stock dividend, payable Aug. 23 to
stock of record Aug. 21.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0015
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0015.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   EG&amp;G Set to Sell
   Unit to TI Group
   For $240 Million
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3B
</SO>
<CO>
   EGG U.TI
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
</IN>
<LP>
   WELLESLEY, Mass. -- EG&amp;G Inc. said it agreed to sell its
Fluid Components Technology Group to TI Group PLC of the
United Kingdom for $240 million.
   TI Group approached EG&amp;G about three months ago with a
first offer for the fluid components division, said an EG&amp;G
representative. Last month, Nok Corp. of Japan -- a longtime
partner of EG&amp;G's in aerospace and foreign ventures,
exercised its right to make a counter offer of $210 million.
EG&amp;G said it had terminated negotiations with Nok when TI
Group bettered that bid and "will proceed toward a year-end
closing" of the transaction.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   TI Group expects to finance the purchase of the unit,
which had 1989 revenue of $180 million, from its "own cash
resources and existing credit facilities," EG&amp;G said. The
sale to TI Group is subject to a definitive contract and
regulatory approval, EG&amp;G added.
   "We've wanted to put more capital into areas of our
commerical business, but we had not specifically put anything
up for sale," said EG&amp;G spokeswoman Deborah Lorenz, in
explaining why this particular division was sold. "We got a
good offer for fluid components. So we decided it would be
the one."
   The fluid components unit's largest client is the
aerospace industry, for which it makes aircraft sealings and
metal pieces for engines. The unit, which also makes seals
for fluid control systems, amounts to just under 10% of
EG&amp;G's total revenue, which totaled $1.65 billion in 1989.
   While most of EG&amp;G's business, about 65%, is for the
Energy and Defense departments, Ms. Lorenz noted "that we
don't have control over the granting of government contracts.
The area we do have control over is our commercial side,
everything from airport and industrial security to scientific
measuring equipment to components for optical and electronic
devices, all of which this sale will enable us to bolster."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0014
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0014.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   LEISURE &amp; ARTS -- Television:
   L.A. Lawless: Watts Riots Docudrama
   ----
   By Dorothy Rabinowitz
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A8
</SO>
<LP>
   The 1965 Watts riots that left 35 people dead began with
the arrest of a black motorist. Such was the rage against the
police, the grievances over joblessness and discrimination
within this large black Los Angeles neighborhood, that it
required only the sight of a white policeman arresting an
intoxicated black driver to start the Molotov cocktails
flying. That, at any rate, is the premise of "Heat Wave,"
airing tonight on TNT (8-10 p.m. EDT).
   This dramatization of the riots was written by Michael
Lazarou and produced by Jon Avnet and Jordan Kerner. They
deserve notice, first of all, for having produced one of the
most simple-minded sociopolitical tracts seen on a TV screen
in recent years, which is saying a lot. Second, their show is
unremittingly silly, when it is not vicious, in its
stereotyping of whites.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   One learns something about the mindset of this movie from
its efforts to portray a sympathetic white. The only white
uppermiddle-class resident of Los Angeles not represented as
some sort of murderous yahoo, for example, is one Mrs.
Canfield, a spacey, childlike character portrayed by Sally
Kirkland with, it should be said, a certain whiny
effectiveness. If this is what "Heat Wave's" creative minds
have brought forth by way of a token "good" white, you can
imagine the others.
   Based loosely -- one hopes -- on the recollections of the
black Los Angeles Times reporter Bob Richardson, the movie
chronicles a black family's struggles in Los Angeles, the
mecca to which they migrated with high hopes several years
before the riots. They discovered that in the California of
the early '60s, as in the South, facilities for blacks were
separate but not equal, that the police could be abusive and
that good jobs for blacks were rare.
   The family's head, known as Mother-Dear if you should need
a hint as to her character, is the cook, housekeeper and
surrogate grandmother to the wealthy Canfields to whom she
also dispenses spiritual and psychological guidance.
Mother-Dear, (Cicely Tyson) is concerned only with church,
family and with the Canfields, who sorely need her patient
wisdom and care. You get the picture.
   Mother-Dear sees her unemployed son turn to drinking,
along with her grandson who, we are informed, burned with
ambition to be a jet pilot until discouraged by a guidance
counselor. It takes just one session with a high-school
guidance counselor, according to this film, to turn a
zealous, open-hearted, sky's-the-limit ambitious youth into a
snarling ne'er-do-well. Pop into the guidance counselor's
office a few minutes and out comes a criminal. Such is the
magic of character development in our times.
   But even though afflicted by alcoholism and lack of
opportunity, Mother-Dear's own family is an admirable bunch
compared with the unhappy and strife-ridden Canfields.
Insistently and crudely, the stereotypes of the sterile,
loveless, cowardly and materialistic whites are juxtaposed
with portrayals of universally loving, loyal and devoted
black couples. Any failures of character among these blacks,
we are regularly reminded, derive solely from discrimination.
Nevertheless, virtually every black in evidence is a hero of
one kind or another. Every white person in evidence, except
for the childlike Mrs. Canfield, and briefly, a policeman not
much less childlike, is either a redneck thug, a hypocrite or
worse.
   After the Watts uproar begins, and there are attacks on
motorists, rioters announce plans to attack white
neighborhoods, and that threat inspires some whites in the
threatened neighborhoods to try to arm themselves. An
unpleasant-looking crowd of white males in a gun store stands
around looking for all the world like a mob gathered for a
lynching, which is, of course, precisely the way they were
intended to look. Notwithstanding who is threatening whom, it
is clear the film means to portray these weapons-seekers as
the immoral ones.
   In the meantime, the Molotov cocktails are flying
pell-mell through Watts. But these deadly weapons are
evidently to be judged on another scale of morality from the
weapons purchased by whites in self-defense. For in this
case, we are clearly supposed to view the improvised missiles
as political symbols, emblems of rebellion. Lest anyone be
confused over the moral difference, the film makers have
provided an instructive scene, played out at the Canfield
residence. None other than Mother-Dear's employer, the surly
and dyspeptic Mr. Canfield, stands waiting by the window, gun
in hand. Horrified, Mother-Dear offers to pray for him.
   Watts burned for six days thanks to the Molotov cocktails
that helped take out 600 buildings. It can be said of this
film, at least, that it is straightforward about the riot's
ugliness and violence. Still, it manages to glorify this
event in which 30 blacks and five whites died, and to
represent it as a kind of important political act.
   Certain aspects of these events, of course, are harder to
pass off as political activism than others. Representing the
large-scale looting of stores as an act of political
expression, for example, has always been a questionable
proposition, and that applies no less to the Watts riots.
Still, there can be no doubt that the residents of Watts felt
their deprivations keenly, and that their rage fueled the
explosion.
   Watts was a complex tragedy, meriting better than this
hash of politically progressive cliches and stereotypes. The
worst thing about the film's portrayal of blacks is that it
represents them -- with but few exceptions -- as victims
wholly without inner resources, people whose lives and
character are shaped exclusively by their helplessness, lack
of initiative, lack of any focus except resentment against
whites.
   In the '70s there was a great to-do about violent,
so-called black-exploitation films such as "Superfly." This
is another, far more insidious kind of exploitation of blacks
in film. It is also guilty, in its treatment of whites, of
something normally called racism when such stuff is directed
at blacks.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0013
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0013.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Morrison Knudsen Joint Venture
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), NO PAGE CITATION
</SO>
<CO>
   MRN U.LNG
</CO>
<IN>
HEAVY CONSTRUCTION; INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL (CON)
</IN>
<LP>
   BOISE, Idaho -- Morrison Knudsen Corp. said its joint
venture with John Laing PLC of London was selected to manage
construction of an $800 million research campus to be built
30 miles north of London. Galaxo Group Ltd., a London
pharmaceuticals maker, chose the joint venture to build a
75-acre campus in Stevenage, Hertfordshire. The campus will
include chemistry, pharmacology, molecular and cellular
laboratories and support facilities.
</LP>
<TEXT>
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0012
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0012.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Business Brief -- Volkswagen AG:
   Auto Maker Raises Prices
   On Cars Sold Domestically
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3D
</SO>
<CO>
   G.VOW
</CO>
<IN>
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
</IN>
<LP>
   Volkswagen AG said Friday that effective today it is
raising prices of its automobiles in West Germany an average
2.9%.
   Europe's largest car maker said it last raised prices
across the board in December 1989, when prices rose 2.9% as
well. Earlier this year, however, the company cut prices on
certain automobiles equipped with catalytic converters.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The Wolfsburg-based company said the base price of its
popular Golf model, with a 1.3 liter engine, will rise to
18,820 marks ($11,788) from 18,330 marks, and the base price
of the midsized Passat, with a 1.8 liter engine, will rise to
25,790 marks from 24,960 marks.
   Volkswagen derives about 35% of its more than 65 billion
marks in annual sales from the West German domestic market.
Other West German auto makers are likely to follow Volkswagen
and raise prices by somewhat similar margins soon.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0011
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0011.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Pepper...and Salt
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A11
</SO>
<LP>
   Tech Wreck
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   I am a power person.
   I wear a power suit,
   I tote a power briefcase,
   I stride the power route
   Into my power office
   And give a dim, grim frown
   To learn a power outage
   Has shut the whole works down.
   -- Mary Margaret Milbrath.
   ---
   Cautionary Comment
                                                                                                       

   When you think you have someone eating out of your hand,
count your fingers.
   -- Ivern Ball.
   ---
   Daffynition
                                                                                                       

   Crooked judge's domain: reprobate court.
   -- Shannon Rose.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0010
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0010.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Homestead Posts
   $30.2 Million Loss
   In Second Quarter
   ----
   By Richard B. Schmitt
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C15
</SO>
<CO>
   HFL
</CO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
</IN>
<LP>
   MILLBRAE, Calif. -- Homestead Financial Corp. reported a
surprising $30.2 million net loss for the second quarter,
reflecting loss reserves mostly associated with the
California real estate market.
   The $2.7 billion-asset parent of Homestead Savings cited
an $18 million general loss reserve established in the wake
of recent regulatory examinations as well as a $16.7 million
provision for potential losses on the planned sale of four
apartment complexes owned by its land development subsidiary.
The company added that the sale of the apartment complexes,
representing $129.9 million in assets, was part of a plan to
improve capital.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The net loss equaled $2.66 a share, compared with a net
loss of $18.7 million, or $1.65 a share, a year earlier.
Homestead said the latest loss left the thrift unit out of
compliance with federal minimum tangible capital rules, and
that it would be amending a filing with regulators regarding
plans for improving its capital position.
   Homestead's situation points up how the nation's real
estate woes are starting to afflict even the perennially
healthy California market. A number of banks and thrifts in
the state have recently reported growing loan troubles from
real estate, reflecting the effect of high residential
prices, a glut of commercial space and a growing credit
crunch affecting developers that is a direct effect of the
S&amp;L debacle.
   Charles J. Vaughan, Homestead's executive vice president
and chief operating officer, said the latest losses largely
reflect problems with the thrift's real estate subsidiary
that is being hurt because potential developers and buyers
are having trouble getting financing. "If you have to own
real estate in the U.S., most people would rather own it in
California. But what this says is that when you have a
tightening of credit nationwide, no state is totally immune,"
he said.
   Homestead said that, excluding loss provisions, its net
interest income for the quarter increased to $8.7 million
from $5.2 million a year earlier.
   For the six months, Homestead reported a net loss of $25.7
million, or $2.26 a share, compared with a net loss of $40.1
million, or $3.55 a share, a year earlier.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0009
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0009.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Belying Vow to Reform, Zaire's Mobutu
   Still Rules by Force, Rights Group Says
   ----
   By Edward T. Pound
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3C
</SO>
<CO>
   AFRIC EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
BANKS (BNK)
</IN>
<GV>
CONGRESS (CNG)
</GV>
<LP>
   WASHINGTON -- Despite promises this year of political
reforms, Zairean President Mobutu Sese Seko continues to rule
his central African country by violently suppressing
opposition voices, the New York-based Lawyers Committee for
Human Rights charged.
   The committee, in a 231-page report, concluded that Mr.
Mobutu's security forces have maintained control and quashed
"any perceived threat to the president's authority" through a
policy of political killings, torture, arbitrary arrests and
harassment. The report said that security forces have
violently suppressed student protests, killing at least 12
students at the University of Lubumbashi in southeastern
Zaire last May.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "Since President Mobutu took power in a military coup in
1965, thousands of Zaireans have been killed, or subjected to
torture, cruel treatment, or prolonged arbitrary detentions,"
the report charged. It said that Zaire's repressive policy
has "lead to a total breakdown in the rule of law in Zaire."
   The Zairean Embassy in Washington declined to comment. Mr.
Mobutu, reportedly one of the world's richest men, is an
important U.S. ally and a recipient of substantial U.S. aid.
   The lawyers' report comes as President Mobutu finds
himself under increasing attack, both inside and outside
Zaire, because of his alleged plundering of his country's
wealth and serious human-rights abuses. On Capitol Hill, the
House voted to prohibit direct aid to Zaire; Belgium,
meanwhile, froze all assistance to its former colony to
protest the alleged Lubumbashi massacre. In addition, the
World Bank and the International Monetary Fund, concerned by
Mr. Mobutu's persistent misspending, aren't providing new
loans to Zaire.
   The lawyers' committee, formed in 1978, monitors
human-rights conditions world-wide, according to Makau wa
Mutua, who heads the committee's Africa Project and
co-authored the Zaire report, titled "Zaire: Repression as
Policy." The report was based on extensive research, Mr.
Makau said, including interviews with eyewitnesses,
government officials and opposition activists in Zaire.
   Mr. Makau and his co-author, Peter Rosenblum, were
attacked on the street in Kinshasa, the capital, during their
second visit last March. The government, in an investigation
of the incident, denied involvement, but acknowledged that
some of the laywers' movements were monitored by security
forces.
   The report charged that the long history of human-rights
abuses has been carried out by Zaire's four principal
security forces. It said that the security forces "occupy a
privileged position" and "have unrestrained authority to
arrest, abuse and detain the population in detention centers;
these actions are effectively unreviewable by Zaire's
civilian judiciary."
   The government, the report said, routinely arrests and
detains its critics incommunicado "from several days to
several months" without placing charges against them.
Moreover, the report said, "Zaire's armed and security forces
have been involved in extrajudicial executions of students,
peasants and opposition activists during 1989 and 1990."
   It noted that last April President Mobutu announced with
much fanfare that he was lifting a longtime ban on opposition
parties and preparing other political reforms. But within a
week, the report said, security forces, in an apparently
unprovoked attack, disrupted an opposition political rally in
Kinshasa and killed at least three people.
   The report also noted that the U.S. continues to provide
vital economic and military support to Zaire, despite massive
corruption and human-rights violations. It said that the U.S.
shouldn't provide more funds to Zaire unless the government
shows "demonstrable progress" on human rights.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0008
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0008.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Unilever Group
   Profit Rose 12%
   In 2nd Quarter
   ---
   But Rest of Year Is Viewed
   With Caution Amid Fear
   Of Economic Downturn
   ----
   By Bob Hagerty
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3B
</SO>
<CO>
   UN UL EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
EARNINGS (ERN)
HOUSEHOLD AND PERSONAL-CARE PRODUCTS (HHP)
</IN>
<LP>
   Unilever Group said its net income for the second quarter
grew about 12% before taking into account
currency-translation effects.
   But the Anglo-Dutch maker of food, detergents and
toiletries said it views the second half with "a measure of
caution." Floris Maljers, chairman of the group's Dutch arm,
Unilever N.V., said the caution stems from sputtering
economic growth in the U.S. and Britain and from fears that
the recent surge in oil prices will squeeze consumer spending
world-wide.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The results were roughly in line with most forecasts, but
the company's warning made some investors nervous, London
brokers said. On the London Stock Exchange, shares of the
group's British arm, Unilever PLC, traded late Friday at 661
pence, compared with 670 pence late Thursday. Shares of the
Dutch arm, Unilever N.V., closed at $82.125, down 62.5 cents,
compared with 149.30 guilders, on the Amsterdam Stock
Exchange.
   Second-quarter net income grew 18% to $516 million, or
$1.84 a share of Unilever N.V., from $436 million, or $1.56 a
share. Sales climbed 14% to $9.37 billion from $8.19 billion.
   In the first half, net advanced 16% to $898 million, or
$3.20 a share, from $773 million, or $2.76 a share. Sales
totaled $17.77 billion, up 14% from $15.6 billion.
   For the first half, the company's operating profit margin
edged up to 9.1% from 9% a year earlier, although the margin
in North America shrank to 6.5% from 7.6%.
   Operating profit in Europe for the half grew 14% to $978
million. The company said detergents, toiletries, food and
drinks were particularly strong.
   Unilever said it was pleased with its progress in East
Germany. Mr. Maljers said that direct sales to that country
totaled about 60 million marks ($37.5 million) in the half
and that a similar amount of Unilever products made their way
into East Germany via third parties. By contrast, Mr. Maljers
said, Unilever's West German sales are likely to total around
nine billion marks for all of 1990.
   In Hungary, Mr. Maljers said Unilever is still awaiting
decisions from government officials on a proposed joint
venture with a state-owned company. The venture would make
margarine and detergents, and Unilever probably would have
majority control, he said.
   The company's salmon farming unit in Scotland remained a
problem. In 1989, that unit produced a loss estimated at #11
million ($58.8 million). Mr. Maljers said Unilever isn't
ready to abandon the business, despite low prices for salmon.
   North American operating profit in the first half was
unchanged at $254 million. Mr. Maljers said results from
margarine and specialty chemicals improved but competition
intensified in detergents. Unilever, whose detergent brands
include Wisk and Surf, is spending more on promotion to keep
market share, he said.
   Unilever said its new "personal products" lines in the
U.S. performed in line with expectations. The company last
year acquired the U.S.-based Faberge, Elizabeth Arden and
Calvin Klein cosmetic and perfume lines for a total of about
$1.8 billion. Snarls in Faberge's computer system have slowed
integration of that unit.
   Outside Europe and North America, operating profit surged
31% in the half to $385 million. Most of the gains were in
Latin America, where the company said results "advanced
strongly in spite of difficult economic circumstances." Mr.
Maljers said benefits are starting to flow from major
acquisitions of food and detergent companies in Brazil, Chile
and Mexico over the past five years.
   But Unilever said tougher competition hurt results in
Japan. Mr. Maljers said its shampoos were particularly hard
hit. The company sells Timotei and Lux shampoos in Japan.
   In what analysts see as the start of a costly battle,
Unilever recently began test-marketing of concentrated Surf
detergent in Japan; Mr. Maljers said it was too early to
gauge results. Richard Workman, an analyst at Hoare Govett in
London, said a successful launch of Surf in Japan would be a
huge breakthrough. But, he added, "they're playing for high
stakes; they might get a bloody nose."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0007
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0007.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Michael Heseltine Now Sets His Sights
   On a Certain Downing Street Address
   ----
   By Barbara Toman
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A3C
</SO>
<CO>
   EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
BIOGRAPHY (BIO)
</IN>
<LP>
   LONDON -- Nearly 40 years ago, Britain's most flamboyant
politician, then an undergraduate at Oxford University, made
a flamboyant resolution. On the back of an envelope, Michael
Heseltine charted his life plan, noting what he intended to
do during each decade.
   Next to the 1990s, Mr. Heseltine wrote "Downing Street."
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The 1990s are upon us, and many in Britain wonder whether
Mr. Heseltine's time has come. Now 57 years old, the former
Conservative defense secretary has been running a virtual
U.S.-style presidential campaign since he stormed out of
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher's cabinet four years ago in
a disagreement over her leadership.
   Though he professes he won't ever challenge Mrs. Thatcher
directly, he travels the country espousing alternatives to
her policies. He pops up regularly on radio and television,
and he is writing his third book on politics since his
resignation. No one here doubts that he wants to be prime
minister, and opinion polls peg him as the front-runner to
succeed Mrs. Thatcher.
   So who is Michael Heseltine? He is, in some ways, much
like Mrs. Thatcher herself: a strong leader with a clear view
of the world and of Britain's role in it, and formidable
energy to put his ideas in place. "They are both conviction
leaders, which we don't often have in British politics," says
Vernon Bogdanor, a political scientist at Oxford.
   But a Prime Minister Heseltine would differ profoundly
from Mrs. Thatcher in some major respects. Under him, Britain
-- long torn between the U.S. and Europe -- would set its
sights firmly on the latter. Mr. Heseltine would be an eager
European Community leader, in sharp contrast to Mrs.
Thatcher's often grudging attitude. "Once we enter into that
debate" on Europe, he warns in an interview, "we better be at
the leading edge of it."
   Mr. Heseltine is, in fact, the most colorful foe of the
Conservative Party's anti-Europe wing. The alternative he
presents was thrown into even sharper relief by the recent
political exit of Nicholas Ridley, who resigned the post of
trade secretary after an interview in which he said
surrendering sovereignty to the EC was like giving it "to
Adolf Hitler." Although Mrs. Thatcher hastened to distance
herself from Mr. Ridley's remarks, the episode resurrected
embarrassing questions about the prime minister's commitment
to Europe.
   At home, Mr. Heseltine would soften the strict free-market
ethos of the Thatcher era, promoting greater cooperation
between government and industry and reweaving a bit of the
social safety net. "He is going to broaden the appeal of
conservatism from being not just concerned with the creation
of wealth, but how you use it," says Keith Hampson, a fellow
Conservative member of Parliament.
   His critics -- and there are plenty of them -- consider
him too rash to be a good leader, citing episodes from his
long and colorful political career. Some dislike the prospect
of a shift away from Thatcherism. "He'd be inclined to
compromise far more than Mrs. Thatcher," says Sir Marcus Fox,
a senior back-bench Conservative MP. "We wouldn't get the
same style of leadership. That is not a prospect I welcome."
   A tall man with a thick mane of blond hair, Mr. Heseltine
undoubtedly is a politician of grand gestures. He is
restless, churning out opinions on everything from European
defense to rural development in England. "Spitting Image,"
British television's satirical puppet show, portrays him as
"Blond Man" -- a sort of Batman clone, complete with cape.
   He is a renowned entrepreneur and a self-made millionaire.
The son of a middle-class businessman, he grew up in Swansea
in south Wales. Founder and controlling shareholder of
Haymarket Publishing Group, he now ranks among Britain's
richest citizens, with an estimated worth of #50 million ($93
million). He has a house in London's tony Belgravia district
and a country mansion in Northamptonshire.
   Mr. Heseltine stopped running privately held Haymarket,
which publishes trade magazines, in 1970. But his approach to
politics remains businesslike. David Edmonds, a former civil
servant who worked for Mr. Heseltine at the U.K. Environment
Department between 1979 and 1983, recalls the ex-cabinet
secretary running his ministry like a company. For Britain's
"mandarins," or nonpolitical bureaucrats, it was quite a
shock.
   "We rapidly learned he had some very clear objectives,"
Mr. Edmonds says. "He had a reputation for being a
dilettante, but in fact he worked extremely hard."
   Mildly dyslexic, Mr. Heseltine had his staff prepare
one-page briefing memos for him. His reliance on such
support, combined with his wealth and well-cut suits, gave
him a reputation as an intellectual lightweight in some
political circles.
   However, Mr. Edmonds argues, "he does not lack intellect
-- quite the opposite. He has a great ability to absorb
material, mainly by listening to people." Policy was hammered
out, Mr. Edmonds adds, "in meetings which would sometimes go
on for two, three or four hours. What he likes is a clear
object, and then targets to measure success against."
   Nowadays, Mr. Heseltine stresses his credentials as a
businessman when discussing such issues as Britain's role in
Europe. Long an advocate of full membership in the European
Monetary System, he pointedly argues that Britain's inflation
rate wouldn't be nearly 10% if the country had previously
entered fully into the currency arrangement.
   Business decisions, he says, "need to be made against the
confidence of economic stability. Industrialists don't want
to try to double-guess exchange rates. They don't want to
have to calculate their bills in 12 different currencies all
the time."
   While Mrs. Thatcher likes to hold Britain up as an example
of free-market excellence, Mr. Heseltine speaks of what
Britain can learn from others. Currently writing a book about
Japan, he sees many lessons there. "At every stage where
there is an input into their competitive ability, they've
pursued excellence," he says. "Everywhere you look, they are
pushing, pushing, pushing. That's why they're such a
formidable competitor."
   While advocating strong ties to Europe, Mr. Heseltine also
takes worries about national sovereignty seriously; he is too
shrewd a politician to ignore the uneasiness felt by many
British voters. To that end, he likens the EC not to a United
States of Europe but to a club. "There are rules," he
explains. "There are privileges. You are free to join. If you
are a member of it and you want to influence the rules, you'd
better get on the committee."
   Like many of Mr. Heseltine's ideas, his pronouncements on
Europe are short on detail. But leaning back in his chair,
feet propped on his desk, he quotes no less than Winston
Churchill in support: "In these brave endeavors, it is better
to proceed at a pace that is possible for you, and leave to
others the resolution of matters that you yourself cannot
address. They will do so in their own context, against their
own expectations and experiences."
   Mr. Heseltine adds: "That is a very sophisticated way of
looking at it. We must proceed only at a point at which the
nation will accept."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0006
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0006.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Chrysler Faces
   $7.6 Million Fine
   For Mail Fraud
   ----
   By Neal Templin
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C9
</SO>
<CO>
   C
</CO>
<IN>
AUTOMOBILES (AUT)
</IN>
<GV>
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT (JUS)
</GV>
<LP>
   DETROIT -- Chrysler Corp. was sentenced to pay $7.6
million in criminal fines for mail fraud in connection with
the sale of approximately 30 previously wrecked vehicles as
new automobiles.
   The $7.6 million in criminal fines is another embarrassing
reminder of the 1987 scandal in which the auto maker
acknowledged that it sold as new cars that factory officials
had driven, with the odometers disconnected.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The latest judgment comes less than two months after the
company was hit with a $1 million penalty in a Missouri court
for selling a Missouri couple a "new" Chrysler New Yorker
that had been wrecked during a factory official's test drive.
   Chrysler said it is considering appeals of both penalties.
The auto maker already has sent $500 apiece to 27,500
customers as part of the settlement of a class-action lawsuit
stemming from the same issue, said Charles Newman, a Chrysler
lawyer.
   Chrysler pleaded no contest in December 1987 to charges of
selling the wrecked vehicles, as part of a larger case
brought by federal authorities in St. Louis. Federal
officials charged that Chrysler employees disconnected the
odometers on approximately 60,000 new cars that were then
driven by Chrysler executives. The cars were later sold as
new, including some that had been damaged and repaired,
federal officials said.
   The mail fraud charges stemmed from the fact that titles
which described the vehicles as new were sent to consumers
through the mail, the Postal Service said in a statement.
   Shortly after the charges came to light in 1987, Chrysler
Chairman Lee A. Iacocca said disconnecting odomoters to
conduct test drives "went beyond dumb and reached all the way
to stupid." Mr. Iacocca's candor, and his offers to extend
warranties on affected vehicles, largely defused the issue at
the time. Still, the court actions this year are an unwelcome
echo of the episode at a time when Chrysler is trying to
break out of a sales and earnings slump.
   "Certainly the sooner we can get this behind us, the
happier we can be," a Chrysler spokesman said Friday.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0005
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0005.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   New Securities Issues
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C19
</SO>
<CO>
   FNM CCI EUROP J.JUJ
</CO>
<IN>
MORTGAGES, MORTGAGE BANKERS, MORTGAGE-BACKED SECURITIES (MOR)
BOND MARKET NEWS (BON)
</IN>
<LP>
   The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings
in U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and
syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets
Report.
                                                                                                       

                         MORTGAGES
                                                                                                       

</LP>
<TEXT>
   Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of
Remic mortgage securities offered in eight classes by Nomura
Securities International Inc. The offering, Series 1990113,
is backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities with a weighted
average coupon rate of 10.125% and weighted average remaining
term to maturity of 29.58 years. Among classes for which
details were available, planned yield spreads ranged from 80
basis points over two-year Treasury securities to 115 basis
points over 10-year Treasurys.
   Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of
Remic mortgage securities offered in 11 classes by Merrill
Lynch Capital Markets. The offering, Series 1990-115, is
backed by Fannie Mae 10% 30-year securities. Among classes
for which details were available, yields ranged from 8.359%,
or 45 basis points over two-year Treasurys, to 9.851%, or 116
basis points over 10-year Treasurys.
   Residential Funding Mortgage Securities -- $197 million of
1990-9 Remic mortgage securities offered in 10 classes by
Bear Stearns &amp; Co. The offering is backed by whole loans with
a gross weighted average coupon rate of 10.659% and a
weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.67 years.
Price and yield data weren't immediately available.
                                                                                                       

                        ASSET-BACKED
                                                                                                       

   Citicorp Mortgage Trust IV -- $155 million of Remic
mortgage securities offered in eight classes by Nomura. The
collateral consists of 9.80% whole loans with a weighted
average coupon rate of 10.98% and weighted average remaining
term to maturity of 29.33 years and a Sumitomo letter of
credit covering 16% of the deal. Among classes for which
details were available, planned yield spreads ranged from 75
basis points above one-year Treasury securities to 165 basis
points over 30-year Treasurys.
                                                                                                       

                         EUROBONDS
                                                                                                       

   HMC Mortgage Notes 6 PLC (U.K.) -- #140 million of
floating-rate notes due in September 2030 via Credit Suisse
First Boston Ltd. Issued at par, reoffered at a fixed price
of 99.75. Coupon floats at a margin of 0.25 point above the
three-month London interbank offered rate until Sept. 19,
2000. Thereafter, margin is 0.50 point above Libor. Callable
on each coupon date beginning September 1993 at par.
Redemption on pro-rata basis or by open market purchases.
Three years of substitution, then 10 years of further
advances of up to #29.4 million. Average life is expected to
be 7.5 years, based on 15% prepayment. Fees 0.35.
   Jujo Paper Co. (Japan) -- 200 million Swiss francs of
privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1995, with a
fixed 3 3/4% coupon at par via Swiss Bank Corp. Put option
March 31, 1993, at a fixed 109 7/8 to yield 7.29%. Each
50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Sept. 17, 1990, to
Sept. 22, 1995, at an estimated 2 1/2% premium over the
closing share price when terms are fixed Thursday. Fees 1
1/2.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0004
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0004.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Ford to Put Cash
   Into Toronto Auto
   Parts Supplier
   ----
   By Larry M. Greenberg
   Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A12
</SO>
<CO>
   TMG.A F MAGAF
</CO>
<IN>
TENDER OFFERS, MERGERS, ACQUISITIONS (TNM)
AUTO PARTS AND EQUIPMENT INCLUDING TIRES (AUP)
</IN>
<LP>
   TORONTO -- Ford Motor Co. said it has agreed to inject
cash into Magna International Inc., one of Ford's major
outside suppliers of auto parts, in order to ensure a
continued supply of plastic bumpers from the financially
strapped company.
   Neither company would reveal the size of Ford's
investment, but Toronto-based Magna said the deal represents
a "major step" in its program to restructure 1.09 billion
Canadian dollars (US$949.5 million) in debt.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Magna spokesman Brian Colburn called the agreement with
Ford a "vote of confidence" in Magna's ability to continue
operating. Magna, which has been plagued by overcapacity and
a slowdown in the auto industry, supplies parts to all of the
Big Three U.S. auto makers.
   Under terms of the agreement, a Ford subsidiary will
acquire 49% and Magna will own 51% of a new company, Conix
Canada Inc., that has been set up to acquire various assets
from Magna's Decoma International Inc. unit. The assets
include a new 530,000 square-foot plastic bumper
manufacturing plant in Guelph, Ontario. The plant, which will
employ about 500 people after production gets under way early
next year, will eventually replace a smaller facility
currently in use in Toronto, Mr. Colburn said.
   The joint venture company also will acquire Magna's
mould-making plant in Concord, Ontario, which has 130
employees.
   In addition, Magna said Ford has agreed to purchase the
property of Magna's interior component manufacturing plant in
Nashville, Ill., and to lease the facility back to Magna.
Ford also will provide a loan to a Magna subsidiary in the
U.S.
   The pact with Ford is Magna's second significant move to
reduce its debt load since the company announced in March it
was in technical default on some of its bank loans. Last
month, Magna said it agreed to sell its automotive electric
motors division to a unit of Siemens AG of West Germany.
Analysts estimated that deal was worth about C$70 million.
   Mr. Colburn said Magna is negotiating with its creditors
to secure a standstill agreement on the company's loans. He
said Magna aims to cut its debt load by about half over the
next 12 months.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0003
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0003.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Foreign Exchange:
   Dollar Loses Appeal as Haven in a Crisis
   Because of U.S. Economic Fundamentals
   ----
   By Alison Woods and Candace Cumberbatch
   Special to The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C10
</SO>
<CO>
   FREST JAPAN CANDA EUROP
</CO>
<IN>
MONETARY NEWS, FOREIGN EXCHANGE, TRADE (MON)
FOREIGN-EXCHANGE MARKETS (FRX)
PRECIOUS METALS, STONES, GOLD, SILVER (PCS)
COMMODITY NEWS, FARM PRODUCTS (CMD)
</IN>
<LP>
   NEW YORK -- What little safe-harbor appeal the wobbly
dollar had is wearing off, currency analysts say.
   While the Iraq-Kuwait crisis might, in other
circumstances, have prompted an enthusiastic rush to buy
dollars, U.S. economic fundamentals now are simply viewed as
too bearish for the dollar to qualify as a "safe" investment.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   "It's a surprise that the dollar is not higher," given the
events in the Middle East, says Victor Polce, manager of
corporate trading at Algemene Bank Nederland in New York.
   The dollar's movement Friday surprised many market
participants, as it stumbled against most other major
currencies even after statements by Iraqi President Saddam
Hussein sent shock waves through U.S. financial markets.
   When the dollar sagged, gold quickly replaced it as the
investment of choice. On the Commodity Exchange in New York,
gold for current delivery settled at $396.90, up $11.10 an
ounce. Estimated volume was a heavy seven million ounces.
   In late currency trading here Friday, the dollar was
changing hands at 1.5905 marks and 150.45 yen, compared with
1.5965 marks and 149.80 yen late Thursday. Compared with a
week earlier, the dollar was about unchanged, while gold was
up nearly $20 an ounce.
   In early trading in Tokyo Monday, the dollar was quoted at
150.15 yen, up from 149.75 at the close there Friday. The
dollar was also trading at 1.5823 marks.
   "The dollar is going to be heading south," probably to
1.50-1.55 marks and the "low 140s" against the yen, as soon
as the last of its "safe haven" appeal is worn off, Mr. Polce
of Algemene Bank says.
   While the yen is currently being held back by worries that
higher oil prices will aggravate Japan's already substantial
inflation pressures, the recent rise in Japanese money market
rates should help the yen strengthen eventually, according to
Mr. Polce.
   The market's hands-off mood about the dollar stems from a
series of ills that have pushed the U.S. economy to the brink
of recession. Those problems include a troubled banking
industry, a sluggish manufacturing sector and growing
unemployment.
   "There's a good fundamental camp that has wanted to see
the dollar go lower" because of the economy, says Rick
Porter, manager of corporate trading at Westpac Banking Corp.
   Among the U.S. economy's several problems, the most
worrisome at the moment is the surge in oil prices caused by
Iraq's takeover of Kuwait. The September crude oil futures
contract has risen more than $6 a barrel in the past two
weeks to settle Friday at $26.23.
   The higher oil prices couldn't have hit the U.S. at a
worse time: Inflation is already a stubborn problem burdening
the economy, and with the oil-price surge the Federal Reserve
can't ease credit aggressively to stimulate growth.
   At the current rate of economic activity, some analysts
see negative growth as possible for the U.S.'s third and
fourth quarters after a feeble 1.2% annual rate of expansion
in the second quarter and 1.7% in the first quarter.
   Roger Brinner, chief economist at DRI-McGraw Hill in
Lexington, Mass., says U.S. economic growth could be cut by
0.7 percentage point in 1991 if oil stays near its current
price for a lengthy period.
   Mr. Brinner sees better prospects for Europe and Japan,
saying that inflation-adjusted growth in European Community
countries might be curbed by only half a point next year if
oil prices stay up and that growth in Japan may be trimmed by
0.6 percentage point.
   The generally stronger economies of Western Europe and
Japan should help those nations withstand any oil price shock
better than the U.S., Mr. Brinner says.
   In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at
$394.25 an ounce.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0002
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0002.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   International:
   Showa Faces 89 Lawsuits
   In U.S. Over L-Tryptophan
   ----
   Special to The Wall Street Journal
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE A5
</SO>
<CO>
   J.SHD JAPAN
</CO>
<IN>
FOOD PRODUCTS (FOD)
</IN>
<GV>
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION (FDA)
</GV>
<LP>
   TOKYO -- Showa Denko K.K. said Friday that a total of 89
suits have been filed against it in the U.S. for damages
allegedly caused by an amino acid it manufactures.
   Damages requested in the suits total $810 million, a Showa
official confirmed.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   Lots of the dietary supplement L-tryptophan manufactured
by Showa have been linked to outbreaks of a blood disorder
that can cause high fever, weakness, shortness of breath and
even death.
   Showa will pursue further studies of the effects of the
amino acid before deciding whether it will meet the suits in
court or try to settle them privately, the official said.
   "There has been a statistical connection in the U.S. It
hasn't been proven to be a direct cause in animal tests,
however," the official said.
   Both the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and the
Japanese Ministry of Health and Welfare have suspended sales
of L-tryptophan. Until sales were stopped, Showa exported
around 70 tons of L-tryptophan a year to the U.S.
   A report published this week in the New England Journal of
Medicine said that the outbreak of the disease probably
stemmed from a change in Showa's manufacturing process.
Researchers said they found that the problems began after
Showa started using a new strain of microbe in manufacturing
and halved the amount of carbon it used to filter impurities.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>
WSJ900813-0001
</DOCNO>
<DOCID>
900813-0001.
</DOCID>
<HL>
   Program Trades Average
   9.9% of Big Board Activity
</HL>
<DATE>
08/13/90
</DATE>
<SO>
WALL STREET JOURNAL (J), PAGE C9
</SO>
<IN>
STOCK MARKET, OFFERINGS (STK)
STOCK INDEXES (NDX)
COMMODITY NEWS, FARM PRODUCTS (CMD)
SECURITIES INDUSTRY (SCR)
</IN>
<LP>
   Program trading accounted for an average of 9.9% of New
York Stock Exchange volume, or 17 million shares a day, in
the week ended July 27.
   That was up slightly from an average of 9.6%, or 16
million shares a day, in the previous week, the Big Board
said in its weekly report on computer-aided trading.
</LP>
<TEXT>
   The most active program traders for the week were General
Electric Co.'s Kidder, Peabody Group Inc. (16.3 million
shares), Morgan Stanley Group Inc. (12.7 million), Goldman,
Sachs &amp; Co. (7 million), PaineWebber (6.5 million) and
Merrill Lynch &amp; Co. (6.5 million). These five firms accounted
for 58% of all program trading on the exchange.
   On July 23, when the Dow Jones Industrial Average fell
nearly 60 points in the first hour of trading, the Big Board
said Kidder Peabody sold 351,000 shares in program-trading
strategies for its own account and 383,000 shares as an agent
for customers between 10 and 10:30 a.m. Salomon Inc.'s
Salomon Brothers unit sold 543,000 shares for customers in
program-trading strategies.
   The same day, the Dow fell to a loss of 106.94 points by
10:46 a.m., but then rallied 49 points in 14 minutes, paring
losses to 57.94 points by 11 a.m. During that time, Merrill
Lynch bought 805,000 shares for customers. Susquehanna
Investment Group sold 592,000 shares for its own account. CS
First Boston Inc.'s First Boston Corp. unit bought 419,000
shares for its own account and 460,000 shares to facilitate
customer orders.
   Program trading is the purchase or sale of a group of at
least 15 and often hundreds of different stocks. Stock-index
arbitrage, which involves stock purchases and sales with
offsetting trades in futures and options, was led by Kidder
Peabody, which accounted for 38% of the total.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
